yelp数据集测试结果

类别  平均长度   测试集类别数量  我们模型判错数   我们模型Recall   我们模型准确率   BERT判错数         BERT召回率   BERT准确率
 1            136                        533            123(98,14,3,8)               0.769                                          136(104,24,4,4)         0.745
 2            129                        471            246(118,114,6,8)           0.478                                          201(94,96,8,5)           0.573
 3            114                        500            226(19,102,88,17)         0.548               0.6074                222(18,115,87,2)       0.556                  0.6414
 4            94                          510            268(6,18,104,140)         0.475                                          212(5,11,90,106)       0.584
 5            77                          485            118(7,4,13,94)               0.757                                          125(3,2,10,110)         0.742


I was hesitant to rent from this place based on the bad reviews. Literally every other rental company didn't have a van, so I was basically stuck from renting from them. Overall the customer service was very good and so was the prices. My issues was with the vans. They are all dodge caravans and in horrible condition. The first van I got the ac was broke and beat up. They gave me another van and this time I was heading to California. I couldn't go over 60mph and it would shake if you went over. 1 3
Stopped in for lunch. My wife had an iced Starbucks drink and the waitress greeted us with that was not "acceptable in here."  We gladly left because it didn't look that nice anyways. I think there are better choices around town 1 2 
The tiny burrito bowl cost about $12. And all side ingredients except rice, beans cheese and salsa cost extra. A sprinkle of lettuce for 75 cents. Plus the staff is unfriendly at times. I an going to stop giving them a chance. No more for me!!! 1 3 
What happened? We used to love this place. The same items we used to get now taste horrible. And the price seems to be way more. Should have kept the old owner on as a consultant. Will have to drive to coral or Osaka now. 1 2 
I've stumbled upon this restaurant on my vacation to Montreal. We were greeted by the host and seated to our table promptly. The restaurant was beautifully decorated inside and out. Now that is all positives I can give to this restaurant. We waited for over 30 minutes only to be served water. My husband told the waiter that we were ready to order. He nodded his head and disappeared for another 15 minutes. We weren't going to wait longer so we walked out. The waiter could have offered us a drink or something while we wait or even say that they are backed up and apologize for the wait... 1 2 
Sweat is great. Great if you can afford outrageous prices for personalized training that isn't personal as it is done in groups.That isn't the main problem with that place. It's the owner himself. He is rude, arrogant and divides his attention amongst his favorites of the fittest women in there. If you're not his idea of fit, you're not even in the room. The place is small, stuffy and cramped. Josh, the owner, is not pleasant to be around. I am amazed that he's still in business. Keep your money, join any gym in the area and get a trainer that gives only you their attention. 1 2 
Heard some great things about this place so the boyfriend and I decided to check it out since we had no idea what we wanted to eat for dinner.   One word: disappointed.The food selection was decent.  They even had prime rib and snow crab legs.  However, it was the food quality that was horrible.  Everything tasted either too salty or just bland.  By the looks of it, most of food seemed to be sitting out too long.  The service wasn't that great either.  Our server came by at the most two times.  We needed refills on drinks that we never got.  The buffet does unlimited beer.  We are not fans of Miller High-Life so we decided to pass on that. All in all, we will never go back again.  There are far too many buffets in Vegas to venture to if we ever are in the mood.  This place just doesn't have what it takes. 1 2 
Order a Bacardi and coke...... Except don't expect to get Bacardi rum in your drink. You ask for high level liquor and they give u well liquor 1 3 
TAKE NOTE! I have sat with my daughters to get their nails done and it's always been $25 per set plus $5 extra for a gel top coat. The one time I couldn't accompany them, they were charged $70 for the same service. I never thought after years of being a client, they would charge my daughters extra for the same service! Not just that but for some reason, 2 people worked on them. One for acrylic and another to paint. That was also a first. Were you charging them extra for having 2 manicurists? Shotty work this time around! Shameful. Just shameful! CUSTOMER BEWARE! After leaving a negative review, CT Nails have called TWICE to harass me! 1 3 
Honestly was expecting so much more for an Asian place. I ordered noodles and my meal came with both rice and noodles... I don't like rice so there's that. On top of that, noodles were barely flavored and tasted just like regular noodles you'd use to make spaghetti. I was very disappointed. Overpriced too. $8+. Not worth it. 1 2 
This place is really great if you've never eaten at an authentic taqueria.I should have walked out when the unenthused, high-school aged employee didn't know what pastor was and stated they didn't have any. Unfortunately for me, I referred him to the list of meats on the menu. The meat was pretty bland and not even texturally like you'd find in an authentic taqueria. The second sign that I should have just walked out was the price, $6.50 for two tacos. Taqueria tacos are supposed to be simple and cheap, $1.00-$2.50 /taco. The third sign was when the employee asked what kind of rice I wanted on my tacos.Taqueria tacos are traditionally served with only meat, onions, cilantro, and salsa. Despite these warnings, I went through with my purchase, and now I'm writing this review. So to make a long story short, if you want authentic taqueria style tacos, you'll have to look elsewhere. However, if you like subpar customer service with food to match, give this place a shot. 1 2 
Wow, that had to be one of the worst brunches I have ever had. My wife and I arrived shortly after they opened today and were seated at a 2 person table that was wobbly, you know the kind where you have to put a sugar packet underneath it? We proceeded to the food and at first was a little taken aback by how ordinary it was. No prime rib carving station, but instead a pre-carved pork loin slices. The "gourmet" meat station was just pepperoni (no other deli meats), single cheese cubes, and crackers. No omelet or egg stations... The grits were runny and cold. The scrambled eggs were either powered or carton eggs that were also cold. The assorted baked goods, were mainly little muffins that I swore were Lil Bites. The sausage links were shriveled. OMG, I'm not kidding, everything was cold.  I would question whether they are testing the food temperatures. Do yourself a favor and avoid this brunch, at $19 a person I expected a lot better and felt like I  was fleeced. I'll stick to the brunches at the Fish Market in Baxter Village or Waldhorn's Sunday brunch. 1 2 
Thanks to the brutal hangovers I experience several times a month, knowing where to get decent pho is absolutely critical.  It's the only thing that can ease my abused digestive and nervous systems into a state of complacency.  I did not get decent pho here.  In fact, it's the first pho I've ever eaten that made my hangover worse.  Maybe I just got a bad batch.  I don't know.  My bowl was awful.  The broth tasted of nothing but salt.  The subtle flavors of meat and spice that my body craved simply were not there.  I tried to enhance the flavor profile with the usual panel of hot sauces, to no avail.  The meat was alright, if a little tough.  The veggies were pitiful.  Half the leaves on the mint were grayish brown and wilted, and the bean sprouts were slimy.It all made for a bad brew.  I ate all the meat out of it, and that was about it.  I usually drink the broth like it's the elixir of life, but not this time.  I may as well have been sipping on hot brine.  I couldn't even eat the noodles, as they had been steeped in the brackish concoction.The pho left me excessively parched for hours, exacerbating my hangover, and did little to help my stomach ache.  I won't be back.  Which is a shame, because the bahn mi looked great.  At any rate, the food is cheap, and the service is lackadaisical, as is traditional for family-run Asian eateries.  I wouldn't go for the pho, but the bahn mi might be worth a try.One should note that they close somewhat early at 9pm. 1 2 
I am an Elite Plus Member.  I've spent a lot of money here (around $6K in the last 12 months), for a couple of reasons:1. Its convenient, and I like looking/touching/experiencing things before I buy.2. Its not right to use a brick and mortar store to test gear out, and then buy online.3. They would price match the items I found from licensed sellers online.4. Their rewards program incented me to continue to consider them as a viable option for a vendor to purchase all my technology.After today's call, I will no longer be spend money at Best Buy.Scenario:On July 11th, I used a $35 Reward Certificate (the money you get back from purchases you make) to buy a $38 cable.On July 27th, I returned that cable.  I noticed that my return receipt did not reflect the use of my Gift Certificate.  It appeared as though I was only receiving the amount over the $35 Reward Certificate back.I brought this to the attention of the Customer Service Person at the Returns Counter, and he told me that I would see that in my online account in 5 business days.The next day, I call in to the Rewards Support Line to be sure he was telling me the correct thing.  He was not.They tell me they fixed it, and I should see the certificate by August 4th. (that was a twenty minute call or so).I don't see it by August 4th and call back on August 7th.  The phone rep, Tracy, then tells me she has fixed it, and I'll see it by the 13th.  (that was another twenty minute call or so).I don't see it by August 13th, so I call back in today, and the phone rep Ada then tells me she has fixed it, and I should see it within 5 days.I've had enough, and I ask to speak to her supervisor.  Her supervisor, Lisa, reiterates that they can't  issue me the credit instantly (I tell her I get that), but ALSO notices that not all the proper steps were taken in order for me to get the credit back (so I would have waited another 5 days to find that I still didn't get the money back, if I had not asked to speak to her).  She then does some magic, and tells me I'll see the credit back today (even though she told me that was impossible).  That was a 56 minute call.This is where it all went wrong:1. The original sales rep who sold me the cable didn't apply the Rewards Certificate correctly.  2. The rep who accepted the merch return misled me, and told me the credit was going to automatically return to my online account. 3.  The first phone rep told me she fixed it - she did not.4.  The second phone rep, Tracy, told me she fixed it - she did not.5.  The third phone rep, Ada, told me she fixed it - she did not.6. When I told Lisa that I had already lost the value of the certificate by simply having to be on the phone with them for almost 2 HOURS TOTAL, with no credit issued back to me, was enough for me to stop using Best Buy - she said sorry, we hate to lose you - and that's about it.I still have not seen the credit (was she just trying to get a frustrated customer off the phone?).This, combined with the fact that the in store reps seem to always create new Rewards accounts for you, rather than adding purchases to a single account (thereby negating any benefit from the multiple purchases you make there), makes me think that my money is better spent somewhere else.If I'm an Elite Plus member, and they see I spend a relatively large sum of money there, and they treat me like this, how would they treat you, the casual customer?Amazon Same Day Shipping is available in our area when you're a Prime Member. 1 5 
Go to Joe's Diner if you want good food because they've got it. Especially breakfast, which is excellent. Everything I've tried at this place (and their original 16th St. location) has been great. It's not cuisine, it's diner food and it's done right.On the other hand, if you also value good service with your delicious chow, forget this place. On previous visits, the service has often been spotty, but it's easy to cut them some slack because the food's good and, after all, it's a diner. This morning I spent an hour and ten minutes sitting at Joe's counter, with only about 20 minutes devoted to actual eating. And I never got a second cup of coffee.After the folks sitting next to me -- who came in after I did -- received their food, I flagged down another employee to inquire. Apparently, the server failed to give my order to the kitchen. Eventually, my breakfast bowl arrived, hot, delicious and, maybe even worth the wait. The server mumbled an apology for its lateness but had to be asked to provide me with utensils. About that coffee: The personable young woman who took my order was careful to explain that they were out of their special cups for decaf drinkers, so I should watch out in case someone tried to give me a refill with regular. Indeed, the VERY SAME SERVER came back to me later with regular coffee and tried to put it in my cup. As instructed, I stopped her and said I was drinking decaf. My cup remained empty and that was the last I saw of my server. And this was the last time I'll visit Joe's. Great eats just aren't worth the aggravation of being ignored. 1 4 
Interesting experience.  I was not offered a particular type of massage.  Swedish or deep tissue as advertised.  I believe I ended up getting a Swedish massage.  A significant amount of time  focused on my groin area.  ( No happy ending was offered)  I was unable to communicate with my masseuse and his English was very very poor.  When I left and paid what I thought was the HST I was denied a receipt.  When I asked I was told that my masseuses was not a licensed  registered  massage therapist and I would not be able to claim this expense through the extended health care plan. I feel that the Group misrepresented the massage I had bought.   I would not return to this place. 1 2 
The water for the shower was not hot enough. The rooms are pretty old and our refrigerator was faulty. Not the best place to stay. 1 2 
Pretty patio - if you're a smoker.  I felt like I was in the Horseshoe back in the go-go 80s.  Blech.  Food - the salads are always overdressed.  They are soaked and wet with uninspired dressings. The steak was average.  The bright spot was the salmon on the salad - well seared and juicy.  Too bad it was "Atlantic," which invariably means "Farmed."Last word: COCKROACH.  After we'd moved inside because the smokers were literally lighting one cigarette off another like a leg kick sequence in a  Busby Berkeley chorus line, the COCKROACH ambled right up to my friend's elbow, perambulated along the bar, and then went in search of beer.UGH.  Also, COCKROACH. 1 2 
Sports book customer service is inconsistent and arrogant. Decent food joints but nothin to write home about. 1 2 
This is the 2nd wknd I come to this McDonald's and they still don't have the breakfast burritos, they claimed that they ran out of tortillas. I only come here on the wknds bcuz it's close to home. This place needs better management. 1 2 
Had a difficult experience. The rooms were far from the lobby. Th design was shaped like a maze which required a map just to get to the lobby. It rained and there were one inch puddles in the walkway outside my door.  The staff was pleasant and tried to serve but often promised service that was not timely or never happened. Shuttles promised for transportation were often very late or full.  The bar offered food that was tasty. Two of the bellmen were excellent and sheltered us from the rain with umbrellas and a golf cart. Others tried but were exceedingly busy to offer promo service. Overall it was an effort just to survive this experience. Had I known I would have rented a car just to get to the lobby and to get to nearby areas without waiting. 1 2 
Me and my two friends decided to try out this place because there were lots of good reviews about it. When we enter the resto at about 5pm, there were nobody in there except for a table of highschool girls almost done with their food. We decided to help ourselves and chose a table for the three of us. The server (some middle aged chinese guy) gave us the menu without saying anything. SERIOUSLY? Menu book looks good but the food is a little bit pricey like a deep fried chicken wings (5 wings only) for $6. So we ordered then it took them 30 mins to serve our food knowing that there's nobody in there except us. why sooo slow? I could've understand if there's other customers like us but really?? So both of my 2 friends got their order, finish eating them yet there I was waiting for my bbq ribs for an hour. I decided to ask the server for the follow up and he said he'll check it. Okay.After 15 mins, my friend told the other lady server about my food and she said it's coming.After 30 mins, still there was no sign of bbq ribs.After 45 mins, me and my friends decided to cancel the order and pay the bill.It took us 2 hours and a half staying in that place. Two hours waiting for the food, in total.I know the bbt is good but the wings and skewers? mehh. we've had the worst experience there. we even thought that they don't really care wasting their energy serving us with moderate customer service because they thought we were just some cheap college students. UGGHH, i was so furious. 1 2 
The service was good, but we ordered strawberry margaritas and they didn't taste like they had any alcohol in them. 1 3 
Nice office, a good place if you're looking for fast food style service. It's fast and efficient, except for when you have a problem with billing.  I am still waiting for them to fix an issue from six months ago with billing codes so I don't have to pay $300 for preventative services covered by my insurance. Now I have to submit a claim with my insurance which is going to take even more of my time and energy. I feel like a number going in and out of this place. Women's issues are sensitive and should be handled as such but apparently they're more concerned with the business aspect. An example, I just had a visit where they basically gave me information I could have learned from a website or over the phone. They just wanted to get me in office so they could bill for a simple 5 minute consultation. They costed me about $60 in hours missed at work plus my $20 copay and the cost of insurance. I'm quitting this place. 1 3 
The waffle was thick but not crispy - I wish I asked him to leave it on there for another minute. There are other flavours (cinnamon, maple, strawberry) but I don't see myself returning anytime soon...especially since Marbleslab's dark chocolate ice cream is just across the street. 1 2 
This review isn't about the food, which is mostly excellent based on the two times that I've been previously. I tried to go tonight for takeout and was told that I would have to wait in the long line for people actually sitting at the restaurant to order my food because I hadn't called ahead. It's beyond preposterous to make people wait all that time simply to order takeout. I've never heard of this happening at other restaurants. On top of that the employee was brusque and even a little bit rude. I understand that places like this restaurant are really popular and as a result the staff often get overworked, but this policy doesn't make any sense. If you're going to prevent walk up customers from ordering takeout at the restaurant itself in a timely manner, then you shouldn't offer takeout any longer. And if your staff are overworked and having to stay late every night (as other posters have mentioned), maybe you should adjust the closing time accordingly. 1 2 
we have been here 3 times and it has progressively gone downhill. the service sucks. if you want to be ignored in an empty bar, this is your place! the bartender was downright surly and rude and was as ungracious as he could be when he served a beer. the first time we came here we really enjoyed the whole experience. the second time things were getting a tad shaky. this last time IS the last time. we had to get up twice to ask (it is 5:10 pm, by the way, on a Thursday with 4 servers standing around) for beer and food. the food was barely acceptable and the burger I took home and ate later on actually made me seriously sick. the tuna salad is listed as 6 ounces, but in reality was only 2 ounces. the bathroom was like a walk-in freezer, and is dingy, like the rest of the place. low lights everywhere except in the "kitchen", if you drop something, kiss it goodbye, unless you have a flashlight. employees have a "chain-gang" ambience which really makes it a tempting place to be in the historical cleveland heights cavalcade of restaurants. we left 15 per cent because we respect working people but this is one bunch that really did not deserve a penny. our advice glance once and keep on driving! 1 2 
Not sure why I continue to stop at this KFC. First visit food was great. Second visit we got home and bit into the biscuits and they were all raw dough. 3rd visit the forgot a couple items. 4th visit tonight I sat in the drive thru 4ever and then decided to go in. I witnessed the female manager arguing with a male employee who was using f-bombs!! Very unprofessional. The male employee clocked out and left!! I stood for awhile and I think they forgot my order. I was the only one standing and waiting. Place was empty. The service is slow, employees are unprofessional... I'm taking my business back to Canes. It's worth the drive!!! 1 2 
I've read some very negative reviews of this location regarding how young the management staffs are. I personally have no problem with age except when they have no clue how to take care of problem. Apparently they only care about themselves, not customers. My wife & I have never been disrespected & insulted as much as we were yesterday by an employee of this Target. Yes, at this location. I'll call the employee 'Miss B', a young Afro-American female at early 20's or maybe late teens. I'm just trying to give as much description as possible cuz she took her name tag off to hide her identity as this is happening. The supervisor (young male) comes over & hides Miss B in a room by Customer Service after Miss B asked him to get me out of the store? Really? She's asking her supervisor to move customers out of the store? All the supervisor did was trying to lie to me when the store manager showed up. Now the supervisor runs away cuz I caught him lying thru his teeth. As I'm talking to the manager named Kyle, another customer who heard what/how Miss B talked to us passed by and said "she (Miss B) was pretty nasty to these people". Of course Kyle doesn't give shit about this witness. Now This so called store manager (Kyle) refuses to give me her name when I told them I wanted to file official complaint. Everyone is wearing nametags!! After I talked to Kyle, I still hear Miss B talking shit with another woman about me ? Wow, Kyle, who claimed to be the store manager simply gave me a number to call to file a complaint. This store is a Perfect example of how incompetent manager produces incompetent employee. One after the other just lying thru their teeth to cover their own shits. How do I give negative stars? Damm !!! No one deserves to be treated this way when they come here to spend their money. Now, let's see what HQ has to say when I contact them. 1 2 
The service at this establishment does not warrant me wasting any more time typing than this. 1 2 
I like this tanning salon but THIS LOCATION is awful.  The "manager" older lady that is always orange/tan is way too pushy.  I have been there of a total of 3 different times trying to have her recover and each time she pushes and pushes for me a buy something else like a $50 lotion or higher level tanning package.  She acts like she is helping me out when i'm telling her that's not what I want at all.  I literally said you are not understanding me and she kept trying to push on the up sale.  NOT OK. so I walked out for the third time. 1 2 
I have to respectfully disagree with the first reviewer.  I had dinner at Asian Monsoon tonight and the food was really not good at all.I was with my daughter so I wanted something not spicy to share with her. It was clear in my questioning of the server that their sauces come in cans/bottles/vats because there was no chance of adjusting spiciness.  Her advice was to stick to something with no "chili pepper" symbol next to it.  Fair enough.  So I ordered ginger chicken.  The saving grace was that the chicken appeared to be white meat and the veggies were fresh, but it was exceptionally bland.  No hint of ginger, not even any salt.  Just a corn-starch thickened sauce (sauce being a generous word for the gelatanous film covering my food).One of my fellow diners has a bad reaction to MSG, and without recapping the whole conversation it was clear there could be no guarantees about the omission of MSG from any meal.  No report back from my companion on her post-meal MSG status, but she commented that her dish was quite dry and bland.  That explains all the dipping in soy sauce.Thai cooking is known for its balance of flavors--a mix of savory, sweet, sour, salty.  The mango salad, which is typically sweet and sour with some vinegar, was pretty much just sweet.  It wasn't awful, just not good.The service was good and accommodating.  My toddler made the usual mess, and I did the usual hands-and-knees routine to make sure toddlers remain welcome in restaurants, and the server was super nice in insisting she would take care of it.  It's definitely the kind of place that has a cook, not a chef, in the kitchen.  If you're really, really hungry and it's the only place open you may find something passable.  One of my other companions was happy with his meal, though I can't recall what he ordered. 1 2 
I hope management reads this... and our rating of the service is NOT about our waitress, Ms C - she was AWESOME!!! our complaint and it just set the tone - a bad vibe for sure was arriving 7:20 for 7:30 reservations... Very very long line at front check in, but hey it was a Saturday night... we get to the hostess stand and are told that they do not have a reservation for us and that it will be an hour wait... I told "Biotch #1" that I had a confirmation and she said that there was no reservation... then she said oh, our reservation is for 9:30 and that it would be an hour... I showed her the confirmation on my iphone... no matter, what was in the computer was what it was... I was furious!"Biotch #2" before she became a biotch 2 tells  biotch #1 to just change the reservation in the computer... wow problem solved yes - uh er no... in the meantime we see and hear other guests coming in with 7:45 reservations who get seated before us... WTF... really? I'm going postal now... Biotch #2 (who is now truly a biotch) says, they had earlier resi's than us... uh uh... I was standing right next to them and heard them check in... I would like to speak with the manager who I plead my case to, only to hear biotch #2 tell him that they have been trying to seat us and calling us but we didn't answer... FML really??? UGH set the night off to crappollazville...We get seated next and go to the back of the restaurant only to see 3 empty tables for two... that 2 of the 3 sat empty the rest of the night... OMG hello Management are you there??? What was the issue people?Ok, enough with the ranting... our server, Ms C was awesome... smart, funny, whitty... Food was perfect! We finally settled in and put the horrendous hostess f;up behind us and enjoyed a great meal... Notice we're not spending a lot of time talking about the food... Why, cuz it was Lawry's perfect! Somebody should have seen me eating off the bone, cuz it was not very gentlemanly... it was carnivorous.. Very reasonable prices when as it is off strip... Reasonable compared to hotel prices btw...Note to Management... training 101... "Oh, we're terribly sorry for the simple mistake Mr. F... here, we will have a table in just a few moments... thank you so much for your patience... "Note to Upper Management... fire lower management and the hostesses... 1 2 
ProsPrompt and friendly staff.Great Menu SelectionColeslaw is goodConsI had the special (2pc Halibut). It was terrible. Dry and Rubbery.Far too overpriced for the quality of food ($20)Sides were unimpressive. 1 2 
My two friends and I got free passes to The Bank and were super stoked.  Then we each got 3 free drink tickets which we were also stoked about.The environment seemed nice, dark and fun.However, after being there for awhile, we noticed the ambiance wasn't quite right. It had a really strange mix of people in the club and the music was just not upbeat enough. I was not feeling it.My heels were hurting my feet from dancing and walking all over Vegas, I took them off. Then, I got yelled at from some security guy working there to put my shoes back on. That was nice...After we each got a free drink (limited to simple drinks), we went up for round two. However, the free drink tickets ended at midnight. Soo... after already ordering a drink I said, oh well, I'll pay for it anyway. I ordered a red bull and vodka, ran my card through and went to sign the bill which was $19!!!! FOR ONE DRINK?!?! I mean I know Las Vegas is over priced but REALLY? I then refused to pay for the drink, especially since I originally thought it was going to be free. The barmaid told me i would have to leave or else they were going to call security.........I said, "Well we were planning on leaving anyway!"So we left.I would not recommend this place to anyone. Yeah its free to get in and you get free drinks till midnight, but who isn't drinking after midnight? It sounds like a ploy to get you drunk and then get you to spend way too much on drinks at a crappy club. 1 2 
I used to love this place but then I had some 2 bad experiences.  The first time I got a take out and when I got home I (about 15 min later) I opened the food box and my bread was wet.  When I say wet I mean wet like soaked- ughhh.Since I had great experience in the past, I went again and this time I got  food poisoning and spend the whole day in the bathroom-double ughh. I must say one great thing about them is their juices and coffees I would stay away from their food though. 1 2 
We normally enjoy the food at the Cottrelle location but this location just opened so we thought we'd try this one as it was closer to us. We placed an order for pick up. We ordered the pakoras, veg chow mein and veg lo mein (they gave us non veg lo mein instead), chilli chicken, kung pao chicken, garlic paneer, deep fried tofu and veg fried rice. If you like your food bland then this is definitely the place for you. We have had Hakka food many times and enjoy flavourful and spicy dishes and none of these dishes delivered. Very disappointed. 1 3 
Great food but the lady at the cashier is the worse. She must be the owner. Not even a smile. I hate order to go and have to pay with her. The worse, absolutely worse. 1 2 
If I were writing this review on food alone, I'd give the place like 4 stars. They have really good food. They have this awesome pork belly biscuit app that is yummy. Good grilled cheese sandwich with some bacon and arugula that makes it a bit different from the usual. They have a good sangria that's like juice. I was looking forward to trying out different stuff when I went again, but I ran into the same problem, but magnified that I ran into last time I went, and that was poor service. I and a group of my friends went back, wanting them to experience the food as well. And we went on a Friday night around 9:30 and, as expected, it was busy. Now, the last time I went, it was another Friday night around 8 and their place was slow, like the only tables in were ours, a table of 6 on a high top, and a few other patrons at the bar. Service was slow then too. I chalked it up to the fact that our server was pulling double duty and playing bartender. But tonight was different. It was busy. It was like 15-20 minutes before happy hour, the band was going and the place was packed, like the usual restaurants in the area on a Friday night. And tonight, we were seated fairly quickly. Well, more like we were escorted to our table and then stood around, waiting for it to be bussed, but we were fine with that. We were able to sit down and peruse the menu. We were trying to make up our mind, when the person we thought was the server came over. It turned out that the guy wasn't our server, just a guy dropping off the silverware and plates. He apologized and corrected us in our error and assured us that our server would come by shortly. Well that didn't happen. People came by, and they kept on going by. At one time, one my friends attempted to call the restaurant in order to get someone to get to the table, but no one answered. Maybe the band was too loud or maybe they just don't answer their phones. It was then, that was had a glimmer of hope - a server heading in our direction. And what did this server do? Keep on passing us by. Well, needless to say, that was the end of that visit. We had had enough. We don't think we're gonna be back, at least not for a long while. 1 3 
I used to have my gel/shellac manicures done here and Sophia was amazing!!! The nails lasted at least two weeks with no chipping (and I'm hard on my nails). They had comfy chairs and large manicure stations with the UV lights built in. I have been in twice since the new owners came in and I am done. First Sophia is gone, along with all the other recognized nail techs...that should tell you something. The place was empty and looked terrible. The nail stations are old and small. The UV lights are old and dirty. One of the girls even had bedazzled UV light covers!!! I'm sorry, but I think it looks trashy. The chairs are uncomfortable and I had cramps in my arms from the way they had to rest over the lights due to the small area of the station. Plus, the owner is extremely rude. I didn't know they had changed owners and under old ownership, you could put your tip on your card. I didn't have cash and the new owner scolded me saying "Next time, you bring cash." No buddy, there won't be a next time. 1 4 
My boyfriend and I stopped in here for dinner. First we went to the bar directly off of the casino, where we waited about 5 minutes and were not acknowledged once. We figured maybe we would have better luck getting a table. We stood in line at the hostess center, where there was one party of about 6 ahead of us. I'm not sure what was going on, there was a lot of back and forth between the party(who I don't think spoke great English) and the hostess, but we waited our turn for 5 minutes or so, while doing so the line behind us grew even longer of people waiting. At no point did the hostess even look up at any of use, and since the party of 6 was still in front of us, we waited. From the other door a couple walked up around the waiting party, and asked the hostess about seating, and she put them down!!! UMMM Excuse me??? You have a line of people waiting honey, why don't you try looking up! Needless to say we left, plenty of other choices in Vegas, although I think it's important to point out, we looked in the windows after leaving, and there were plenty of open tables. REALLY? 1 2 
I agree with Stacy L. Terrible service. Went for lunch before the basketball game because it's close to Kohl Center.  Some customers got wait staff, some had to wait at the bar to order. No logical way they take or fill orders. Food was just so-so. Should have done what our 2 vegetarians did - walked over to Potbelly & brought food back here to watch the game while they ate. At least I saved money by not tipping & we got to the game early because we couldn't stand the place. Hey guys, you can't run a bar without staff!! 1 2 
Far too pricey for a mediocre massage. I told the therapist several times I didn't want a relaxing massage - I wanted deep tissue- he didn't listen. The flute music is terrible, room was way too hot. The therapist had pointy sharp fingers- a manicure was in order and a better technique - I requested a man with man hands. I tried to give feedback upon leaving and the girl taking your money is there for just that- she couldn't have cared less about the experience. There are too many better places to go for the prices they charge. 1 2 
Went in for the first time today for the awesome price on the smog check.  The workers were pleasant but condescending.  After about a 10 minute wait, the technician informed me that it failed due to the gas cap seal starting to crack with age, but everything else was fine.  He then handed me the invoice with all of the other "recommended services" to the tune of $1105.00. The guy at the counter then told me that once I bought a new gas cap and came back he would charge me the $10 again and redo the whole thing.  After buying a new gas cap, I took my business to another inspection center.  The gentleman there was incredulous they would charge me twice when it was only the gas cap.  In short, go elsewhere to people who care about their customers and not just the money. 1 2 
Sheila kept my money when i ended up not needing the divorce i paud her to do. Two months still has my $600 1 2 
We dodged a bullet with this person.  Wanted to have my bathroom remodeled.  I did my homework, checked the bbb, reg of contractors, etc, all A+ back in november.  He promised the work to be done in ~3 weeks ( in time for christmas).  I finally got most of the work done (gave up on a few of the items we did want done but weren't critical) by Feb 28th.  This one is a good example of why the current system doesn't work too well.  No matter how careful you are there are people out there that can take advantage of you or rip you off.  I managed to get out with the work that was done being ok (because I kept pushing and threatening).  Not my idea of how to get work done. 1 5 
Usually we are pleased with Bahama Breeze. ..However we made reservations a week and a half ahead of time for a going away party and when we show up  early for our time slot and are still standing waiting 40 minutes passed the time the only response we got from an employee when we asked what the hold up is was..."Obviously we get a lot of reservations here! " very disappointing! 1 2 
I will start with the good! Sushi was good!SERVICE SUCKS! We sat for 15 mins before going up to the bar and had to ask for a drink. It was not even crowded. Service was so bad when we wanted anything we would have to go to the bar to get drinks which were weak. The bartender was so rude she acted as if we were putting her out. After being here for over 2 hrs and this going on we asked for a Manager who never came over. We asked again for the manager who walked past us 3 different times before coming over and was so taken back by our comments about her staff. She was RUDE and basically said it looks like the food was good since you eat it. REALLY THATS NOT CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!I think the staff all young girls in their low 20's were more interested in the guys at the bar then servicing the customers they have.  We still tipped the staff but really should not have since the service was so bad.I would NOT suggest going here unless you want MAD SERVICE! 1 2 
Very disappointed that we didn't get all of our order. I ordered 1 lg 1 lg for .30 and our free pizza. the 2 pizza's came but the last one never did. Delivery guy said he was going back to store and would be back with our free pizza NEVER Happened, Very unhappy customer. might have to change pizza companies or change to carry out and change stores... 1 2 
I visited on a Sunday afternoon and was excited just from their punny name alone. It was also a bao time (sorry not sorry) something came to replace use-to-be Go For Tea location. To start, it was very quiet with only another 4 guests sitting down. Maybe it was an odd time (3pm), or maybe most people ordered take out. The service was average, nothing spectacular. I ordered a Korean Beef Bulgogi steamed bao, as well as a Pork Belly steamed bao. Sadly I was disappointed with both of them - the Korean Beef Bulgogi had some flavours but lacked harmony. To be fair, it may just be a personal preference to keep kimchi (spicy sour) separate from bulgogi sauce (sweet). The Pork Belly lacked any sort of taste. Quite literally, it was made with a slice of pork belly and cold lettuce. While there was Hoisin mayo, I could barely taste anything. While I'm giving them two stars (one for idea and one for cleanliness), I don't think this was worth the price/effort. However, I do believe that the restaurant can easily improve their recipes by experimenting and perhaps reading the reviews they've been receiving thus far.I will consider coming back if they improve. 1 2 
We had the noodle soup and rice dish.  The food quality is just OK.  Another "run of the mill" Vietnamese noodle food.  Nothing special - just OK.  Not sure why others rate them high.It is on the expensive side for Vietnamese noodle soup.  The extra large bowl was $8.25 but the size is just a regular size bowl when compare with other restaurant.  A good thing - they do wash and clean their bean sprouts.  The rice and pork chop just come with 1 piece of very THIN AND DRIED CHOP with plenty of rice - again not much food for the amount that they charge for the dish.  NOT GOOD.I have to agree with a couple of other reivews.  NOT MUCH SERVICE.  They just drop the food.  NOT VERY HELPFUL asking about the menu.   COMMUNICATION IS LIMITED. WATCH OUT FOR THE MANDATORY 15% TIPs FOR PARTY OF 6 OR MORE -  EVEN THEY ARE NOT VERY HELPFUL WITH THE SERVICE.  IT IS BURIED IN THE BILL.  I ENDED UP PAYING THE TIPs TWICE FOR NO SERVICE.  WATCH OUT!The bill was a little over $100 for a party of 6.  I think there are better choices to go for the amount that we spent. 1 3 
Entered the "sports bar" at noon today to catch some NCAA basketball tournament games. They were playing country music. I am not sure what they were thinking and I didn't wait around to find out. TV's don't make a sports bar, maybe they should take the word "Sport" out of their name? 1 3 
Seriously just because this is in west springs/ cougar ridge doesn't mean it needs to be over priced.  Felt so ripped off the pastries are tiny and just mediocre.  I get that this is a small business but find it hard to understand how much it would cost to to actually make the sizes to a size that has substance to it. 1 2 
I've been wanting to try this place since I saw it go in, so I went for happy hour with a friend. I got there quite early and sat at the bar; figured I would just have a drink until she got there. I ordered a lemon drop martini--a favorite drink, and something that most bars can handle. I have no idea what the bartender put in this. I think it was sour mix and a very small amount of vodka, based on how incredibly sweet it was. The bartender asked if it was ok; I said it tasted awfully sweet so he kindly offered to add more lemon juice. He added quite a bit more "juice" from a container behind the bar and the drink tasted exactly the same--which is why I think it was sour mix. Oh well, I thought, I can stand to drink this and I'll switch to wine afterwards. The bartender apologetically explained that he "is not a martini person" and left. Fine, I get that...but this isn't a complicated drink and *you are a bartender*. I finished that drink and waited about ten minutes for the bartender to notice (again, at about 5pm on a Tuesday, when the bar was perhaps 1/4 full). He finally came over. I ordered a glass of wine. My friend texted to say she was finally on her way. Five minutes later, still no glass of wine in sight. I told her it wasn't worth coming and we met at Casbah instead.I finally flagged down the bartender ten minutes after this. He seemed to have no recollection of my wine order so I paid and left. Definitely won't be back! The specials were...nothing special, and certainly didn't rival the many better happy hours in the Shadyside area. 1 3 
Overpriced, over rated. The burger wasn't good, the fries were limp.  I will never go back.  In-n-out for me... 1 2 
Came to this location of On Tap after a long day at work.  I was seated immediately, and we got our drinks asap. The food wasn't anything to write home about and our waitress (Miss Brookelynn Estepp) was terrible.  We saw her 2 times the entire time we were there.  We were ending our meal and got our checks.  I paid my $50 tab while my fiancee tipped in cash (how we always prefer to pay at restaurants) I even tipped an extra $2 on my card in addition to his $28 cash.  So in total, we tipped Miss Brookelynne $30!  We leave and get in the car and I see that I have a friend request from our Waitress, Miss Brookelynn. I thought it was odd, so I ignored it.  Not 2 minutes later I see a Facebook post that she tagged me in, I open it to see that this waitress POSTED A PICTURE OF JUST MY SIGNED RECIEPT (signature and FULL name included) the posts says "We don't tip $2 on a $50 tab (my name)".  To which in any other circumstance I WOULD AGREE WHOLE-HEARTEDLY, but in this case this was not true I tipped $2 on my card, yes.... but there was a whole $28 in cash sitting there too honey buns.  So yeah, for posting my signature- on the internet as well as my full name to try to put me "on blast" I will NEVER again eat here or ANY other ON TAP. 1 2 
Meh..... Service is good and our waitress was very nice. The food is mediocre and nothing special at all.  All of our meals and pizza we're cold and tasted like reheated  frozen food that was over priced. 1 2 
your basic DQ the girls are young and don't want to be there! very short with you and not the most personable. 1 3 
My partner and I retired and bought a house in Las Vegas in April, 2010.  At that time we tried out yours and the Aliante Stations buffets and yours was, hands down, the best.  We visited the Cannery several times a month for dinner and a couple times for lunch.  We have always brought our out of town guests there for gaming and food.  The quality of your food has steadily declined since we started coming to what is now inedible.  The prime rib is now a low quality, tough,  underdone steamship round; the tempura shrimp is 'popcorn shrimp' , a dried out bland product that bears no resemblance whatsoever to the shellfish; the seafood fra diavolo is now skimpily scattered atop an overdone spaghetti and your caesar salad is overdressed and limp.  Without exception the other options available appeared to have been held on the steam table until past their prime.  In fairness, I didn't try the pizza.  I don't go to casino buffets for pizza.  Incredibly, while you've lowered quality you've discontinued the bounce-back BOGO that we've enjoyed since arriving here.  Regardless, the meal we had this evening, November 11 at 4:30pm was not worth half of what we paid.  Be assured that the next time we go out to a casino or entertain out  of town guests we will be giving the Aliante Station another try.  A pity, really. 1 2 
I went on a Friday night with a large group of coworkers after a long week. It was one of the most horrendous nightlife experiences in the two years I've lived in Vegas. The atmosphere isn't too bad but it isn't too great either. The only major difference I saw from the former Cadillac Ranch / Ranch House is that the mechanical bull was replaced by a small dance floor. As mentioned in previous reviews, the staff is obliterated early on in the evening which makes it challenging to get a drink in under 15 minutes (after you place your order). Prepare to repeat your order several times. The DJ stopped the music periodically to insist all bars be filled with girls (both bartenders and patrons) who would then dance on the bar while the bartenders poured free "shots" directly into patrons' mouths. The shots were in an unmarked bottle and were an odd purple color. Avoid the mystery bottle that just grazed the mouths of 30 other people.Overall, I understand the idea of a party bar but this one missed the mark. The bartenders had more of a party than any of the patrons. Long story short, spend your money anywhere else nearby for better service from staff sober enough to remember your order. 1 2 
Food was decent, but the service was absolutely terrible. Both servers who served our table were so hostile that I pretty much lost my appetite - which sucks because it's all-you-can-eat here. Would not come back here again. 1 2 
I went here on a Friday night. I had always passed it and wanted to stop by, so I did with three friends. I wish I hadn't.The decor was nice, and we were seated right away. We decided to order the Spring Roll Platter ($10) that was supposed to have four different types of spring rolls on it. When it arrived, we thought they got our order wrong. It was a big pile of mango salad, with about 4 spring rolls cut in half. Not only were there only two kinda (chicken and shrimp curry?) but it was less spring roll platter and more mango salad with a side of spring rolls. We were really disappointed. When the meals came, it was worse. I ordered a peanut pad thai, and it looked like something someone threw up. It was really gloppy and....gross. I ended up not finishing it. My friends were less than plussed with their food, although the stif fried rice seemed to be the best thing on the table.The price and service was ok, but the food is terrible. That was the first and last time I would ever eat there again. 1 2 
Loved the calamari but other food was hit and miss.  Second time which will be the last time was when my husband ordered the Mild chicken wings.  When they were brought to the table I asked him if he had ordered buffalo wings as I could smell the heat in the sauce .  He said no that he had ordered mild.  He hadn't tasted them yet,  When he did taste one he had to put it down.  He flagged the waitress and told her they were not mild and she stated that it was and that their mild was spicy.  No offer to exchange for something else.  Who would expect mild to be spicy??  Another waitress came by for refill and she asked how things were and he said again the chicken was spicier then expected and she said she could tell by the smell that they were hot  and again he mentioned that he had ordered the mild and they were not what he expected.  She politely smiled and walked away.  We ate the other items and he asked for a box to take the wings home as he hates waste.  It was at this time that the original waitress offers  ranch dressing for him to cut the heat and eat them there AFTER we've eaten everything else and are asking for the check as shes dropping off the box.  Not what I would call an honest effort to be helpful because it only came at the time for him to tip.   Completely disappointed with the whole experience.  FYI, I tried the wing and it was  similar to the Buffalo wing sauce, Frank's. 1 2 
Have been going here for years, and getting...and loving the cornbread.  However, as of the 1st of the month, they started charging $3.00 for the cornbread...but neglect to mention that.I would think if they changed the policy just a couple of weeks ago that they would now inform customers that they are charging for cornbread...which was free. 1 3 
There's a golden light that scintillates from this place. It knows of hygiene and cleanliness. I am appreciative. Though, the patissier here is a pretentious she with a head so large I wonder how it fits through the door every morning (figuratively speaking). I walked in to order macarons, this lady did not blink once to withhold her tongue to promptly correct my accent, suggesting I didn't roll my 'r' the way the french do.I'm sorry, I thought I lived in Toronto, a predominantly English-speaking city. Jussayin'.Might I just add, I am fully bilingual, and her accent did not at all come close to the real pronunciation (smh). And then this lady proceeded to say: "Any self-respecting pastry chef knows how to say macaron the correct way" It was callous, and condescending, making me feel very uncomfortable, and belittled. NOT the way a business owner should treat their valuable customers.She must've had God on her side that day. If there wasn't a glass counter filled with maca'R'ons between us, I would've fed her a few open palm wake-up calls. So, though their product may deserve an extra star than I gave credit for, she abates that rating with her temperament, disposition, and ego...WHICH I BELIEVE IS FAIR. You review a business based upon not only their products, but also their service. I got my macarons, the only one worth paying for is the mocha flavoured one, the rest are deplorable, the texture is not what a macaron should be. For someone who is so confident in their macaron expertise, she really falls short in her abilities to prove that. Their viennoiseries such as the croissants are super fluffy & buttery, overly so almost. It oozed transfats. They really do live up do their moniker, 'Butter Avenue'.Just because of her, I'd never return. I'm not trying to go places where I'm disrespected and treated like I've committed the worst crimes known to man.Tip: Go early, they're ALWAYS sold out of their non-macaron items...or DON'T if you don't want to start your day off with a rude glare and a generally sour note. 1 3 
Hole in the wall place that at first glance looks dingy on the inside, forgotten on the outside. Dude at the counter could not stop coughing during my entire order, that should have been a clear signal this place is on life support. Mistakenly didn't order the lunch& went for the Chicken Katsu /Sweet n Sour combo plate (they even throw a ton of rice). The Katsu was old and had zero flavor & below average dipping sauce.  Sweet n Sour chkn was bland and made yesterday. Not recommended nor will I go back voluntarily. 1 2 
Came here to get togo...got a sisig bowl and a tocino bowl wanted to see what it was all about...also ordered side of egg for the bowls $20 wid tip. Got home and saw no eggs!!! checked my receipt and got charged for them too. Also i got garlic rice which was an extra .50cents ea. most of upgrades u hav to pay for extra and i didnt even know until i saw the receipt. Its pretty pricey for a food truck sized order very small. Sisig was very sour and tocino was just ok meats wer shredded. Didnt even fill me up. Id rather go get a 2 item combo at fiesta fililina across the street for $6. Probably wouldnt come back here anymore. 1 2 
Plates were dirty. Coffee cups smells like they were cooking eggs . It makes u feel u dont want to eat eggs anymore. 1 2 
Staff was very friendly, but the dentist called me a liar be because I miss mark something on the form.  This dentist seemed to not know how to pull a fragile tooth. When did dentist become dental monitors? 1 2 
So I went here on a Friday night after work just looking to eat something quick before heading out that night. I got a burger, fries and drink and it came to like $15 lol. Ok so with that price I'm hoping this is going to be a really good meal. Wrong. I got a some kinda bacon cheddar burger and it took 15 minutes to make. Employees didn't really seem to care. Then it turns out the smart cook mixed up my 4oz burger with someone else's 6oz. Then the sandwich lady said she'll just switched the patty's and rubbed a bunch of shit off the burger with paper towel even though I told her not to (YEAH, SWEET). Overall, it's just another burger joint that thinks they're hot shit but they're not 1 2 
First, the owner is not customer friendly, she did not seem to care at all. Second, the prices are outrageous, $3.10 for a donut and $4.50 for a pizza bun which were good but nothing exceptional...Not impress at all...Will not go back... 1 2 
Mixed experience.  Sausages and home fries were cold.  Server seemed genuinely upset.  In summary:  Service? Great!  Food?  Not so much. 1 2 
There wasn't anything special about the food. We went to have all you can eat sushi and didn't feel like we got what we paid for. The service was average. The food literally took 50 mins to come out. Come on the place has a 1 hour time limit and took that long to serve. Basically we only got to order 1 round and that's it. The fish also wasn't really fresh and was obvious.  I felt the place was a rip off. Not everything was horrible, the restaurant has a nice interior design and atmosphere. But other than that theres way more better sushi restaurant better than this in las Vegas. 1 2 
I don't think I will be going back to this place. I was there for over an hour just for a wash and blow dry. And the prices were clearly marked on the pricing board. The lady who did my hair said "oh they put you in for something different" and charged me extra. I was so annoyed that I just paid and left. Also I wanted a specific hair style and was told they didn't know how to achieve it. Less time chatting and more time perfecting your craft and this should help! It was beachy waves I asked for, come on! I did not have a pleasant experience and will NOT be a returning customer, famous hair... I think not. 1 2 
REALLY WANT TO LIKE YOU SAUCY. You are getting 1 star though. Only for the beer. Living in Hingetown I was super excited to find out we were getting a Brewery that also crafted pizza!  I keep trying to give Saucy chances and they keep failing me. July 5 opening day we went in and my first impression was WOW! I liked the look and feel of the space. I sampled all the beers on tap. Really like the IPA and the Hefe. Got the Bees Knees pizza and was very impressed. At this point I was thinking YES, this is going to be my go to spot. Second and third times in this place got a bit peculiar. A day later rolled in here after work. It was packed and the ordering areas were chaos. People seemed to be confused on the beer and pizza ordering lines. The bartenders had trouble pouring beers. There was no seating anywhere. You would think for such a big space they would have better usage of it. Upstairs is nice and open but there is only a few seating options. This puzzles me? Saucy has beer and pizza. These two things require inviting comfortable seating areas. I can tell they tried at this but failed miserably. This is not a place for locals. It's a place for the masses. They want to herd you in like cattle. Get in line. Order beer. Drink beer in a corner while waiting for the pizza you ordered in a separate line. Then shove pizza in your mouth as quick as you can because there is nowhere to sit and enjoy it. Worst part of all is consistency. I've ordered the same pizza 3 times. Always turns out different.  One time my 12 inch pizza was only 9 inches. How does that even happen? One night after work I went in just for beers. I really do like the beers here. The "core" beers weren't even all available. The ASAP IPA and B. F. Hefe weren't on draft!!! Another day I placed a pizza order and got a text it was ready. Went to the counter and long and behold no pizza. They said the order was entered wrong and I will be getting a second text when the pizza is ready. This process took roughly 45 minutes entirely. Overall Saucy is not very welcoming and there pizza blows. Hingetown is a small Pocket of Ohio City that tends to feel more like a community. Saucy has a West 6th / Townhall vibe that doesn't quite fit in our neighborhood. I will be across the street at Jukebox like always wondering what could have been. 1 3 
Very disappointed.  Considering the price was way too expensive, we expected much more in quality.  Service was not good nor bad.    Small burgers and serving size for fries was worse. 1 2 
Slow slow service, very dirty place, menu complicated any topping that you add is an extra charge, food average : Go somewhere else you will be there for at least 1.5 hrs for just breakfast 1 2 
This review is for the Scottsdale Red Robin, at Pima & Shea.  Very disappointing visit.  On a Sunday afternoon and I wanted to take my son to lunch while we watched some football.  I had seen the commercials about their gourmet burgers, and decided to give them a try.  While looking for a booth to sit in, we noticed that several televisions were not working and were unable to find a place to watch football, not a big deal.  We finally found a booth and sat down.  A member of the staff come over and told us that we were not able to sit in that particular booth, because it was too close to the bar!  I couldn't believe it, it wasn't even close to the bar.  It was about 20 feet from the bar, I thought they were kidding.  She said we had to move to the only available table which was in a corner, next to the bathroom without a view of any television.  I kept asking about other tables and booths, she kept telling me that they were too close to the bar area.  I asked if we could sit outside, or was that too close to the bar, but she said that no tables were outside.  I have never in my 50 years experienced a less desirable atmosphere to experience a meal.  Unfortunately I will never get to experience the food at Red Robin.  Not a friendly family environment at all. 1 2 
We went there with high hopes & but got disappointment.Many of the items had just rice with charred vegetables without any spice. Even meat items had no taste. We felt it too costly for the quality we got.Desserts were okay. 1 2 
Las Vegas is known for excellent buffets. And I'd been looking forward to trying this one since my other friends have always raved about it. Maybe this was an off night, but it was so bad, I won't give it another shot. Sorry! Maybe we should have taken it as a sign when there was NO line at 7:30pm on a Saturday night. We had prepared ourselves for an hour wait and thought we had scored when we walked right in... WRONG! Let me start with what was good - the shrimp cocktail, the shrimp over cheesy grits, duck ravioli, the prime rib, and the gelato bar. Now for the bad - a lot of the food was stale, probably because there were not enough people eating to cause them to need to make new food. The ribs, korean short ribs were tough and chewy. The crab legs were small and when you were able to get some meat out of them, it was soaked in brine. You could actually squeeze the solution out of the meat, just like a sponge. The fried chicken was chicken wings and they were cold and not crunchy. The spaghetti and lasagna was Olive Garden quality. The dim sum (har gow) was tough and over cooked. The service was slow and deplorable. At one point, we returned to our table and it had not been cleared, so we put the dirty dishes on the clean table next to us. For the rest of the meal, those dirty dishes stayed there and no one cleared them... We even had a bet going on whether they would be cleared before we left! They weren't... This buffet was so horrible, I spent the whole meal pissed that we had spent $42++ per person and this was maybe a step above Hometown Buffet. We should have saved our money and eaten at Golden Corral on the way here! Save your money. Go to the M Hotel for their buffet. 1 2 
I was in town for business and got back to my hotel around 7PM (dinner time). Having work to do for my client, I decided that I would order food to be delivered to my room and chinese food sounded great! I ordered General Tso's Chicken, a small Pork Lo Mein, and the fried dumplings. I thought I was in for a treat as I don't often get the chance to have chinese food. Little did I know, that the food about to be delivered from Taste of China @ 5415B Monona Dr, Monona, WI was horrible.The chicken smelled a little different, but when i tasted it I could tell that it had been left out on the counter for hours instead of being in a cooler prior to preparation. The pork lo mein was OK, so I ate some of it and the dumplings were edible.The next day, I was sick all day. I called the resteraunt and complained when I got back to the hotel and they offered to replace my order. No way was I going to go for round two of the food poisoning game. Instead I told them that I would be posting this review and reporting them to the health department. DO NOT EAT THERE!! YOU WILL BE VERY SORRY THAT YOU DID!! 1 2 
We purchased the suite of Frigidaire appliances (attached) at a cost of over $5000 a little over two years ago. In that time we have had to replace the microwave and now recently have had this major repair on the $2000 refrigerator to the tune of $700. I was well aware that this was outside the one year warranty but I think this is an exceptional circumstance given the design flaw of this major appliance.I have well researched this issue on the web and have talked to a number of Frigidaire service reps (who all ask to remain anonymous interestingly.)  What I have concluded is that a system where a small plastic ice cube tray which is highly likely, if not guaranteed, to break over time releases a sensor that shorts out an entire system which should not and cannot be classified any other way than a design flaw. In addition as I found out, the company has rectified this flaw in subsequent designs which clearly confirms this was an issue in the previous design whether they  deem it a design "improvement" or not per your consumer help line. I also know that there has been no recall due to this issue.I asked the company by phone and letter to cover these repairs or make good on any on this. They turned  me down flat and said since it was more than 1 year it was all my problem. Shoddiest  work I have ever seen. Dont ever buy an Electrolux product if you are smart 1 5 
Well white spot.... Now you've gone and done it. We have been coming to the white spot for years and noticing the service start to tank. It's been three or four times of hour and a half plus meals because of service/not enough staff/no glasses/no cutlery. I honestly feel bad for the staff having to deal with hordes of angry people on a regular basis. Pity, because the food is always good. No more white spot for me, I'll be taking my business elsewhere. 1 2 
There are only 2 pros to this hotel - location and shopping. With that being said...Where do I begin? I have had PH on my list of hotels to stay when visiting Las Vegas and I was looking forward to staying there. The pictures on line of course, appeared to be well appointed and contemporary. What the hotel offered was contemporary but worn and torn! The lobby is very misleading. It was clean, vibrant and colorful, which made me excited to see my room. As soon as I hit the elevator and saw the doors close, I knew something was very off. There were scuff marks on the walls of the elevator, scratches and initial carvings in the metal and the doors looked like they had been kicked several times with scratches and dents. Approaching my room, the hall way carpet was torn and stained in several spots, unravelling and bubbled in others. I came to discover during my stay that all the elevators were beat up.I got to my room, the Resort Room, and it was covered in a layer of dust everywhere. There were spill marks on the desk with splatter marks down the leg of it. By that point I was uneasy and checked the bed for bed bugs! I opened the closet to hang my clothes and noticed the wood was chipped all throughout the bureau, with the worst of it where the ironing board was placed. One of the drawers didn't open properly.I called to have the room cleaned and dusted. Throughout my entire stay of 3 days, no one cleaned the spill marks down the table leg. There were chips in the wood on the tables as well.The pool - another disaster! PH charges $118 for reserved day beds. That would be great if the daybeds weren't all stained with mysterious spots, some of them questionably large and obvious. Regular deck chairs are wobbly, with support bands busted off or missing. And since they were supposed to be white, they were visibly dingy.The casino - Signs pointing you where to go are confusing. As a group of 6, we got lost quite a bit, continually walking in circles, even when sober, lol! We actually started paying attention to location markers like light fixtures and escalators as points of reference because the signs were useless. Not to mention, the casino constantly had dirty glasses and beer bottles everywhere. The place just couldn't stay cleaned up. The Strip entrance to the casino was horrid. The glass doors were never clean, with a dirt film of finger and handprints covering the inside and outside.Call me partial, but I love a clean, well appointed hotel, no matter if its cheap or expensive. If I'm paying upwards of $800 for 3 days, I want what I paid for which is high quality, good service and cleanliness. I'm very disappointed with the cleanliness and upkeep of Planet Hollywood. I have stayed in many different hotels on the strip from the Stratosphere to the Bellagio and I will not stay at Planet Hollywood again. I will not recommend it to anyone. 1 2 
good food, but if you order To Go, especially for kids, know that you don't any salad or bread for them and hardly any for regular meals. LAME. Their unlimited salad and chicken picata is yummy, but DINE IN for the unlimited salad and bread. 1 3 
I went to Best Buy to purchase a new package on appliances, one of the sales person said that I was going to be next, while I was checking out the appliances I noticed that someone else came up and the started helping them out before me, I'm a Hispanic male so they didn't take me seriously. I did talk to a manager but he couldn't do anything for me. I went across the street to Home depot and they treated me like a customer, so I bought my new appliances there. 1 3 
Slow service all while the front staff was flirting and chatting with each other.  Good food, just hard to come back when service is so poor and your paying a decent cent for the food. 1 3 
I was very disappointed with my visit here. I was here to make  3 copies of legal documents, I was here for less than an hour. I am not savvy with computers so my page kept turning off on me.. To make the story short I was charged a total of $2.79 ( the break down for these charges are as follows: 4 sessions @ .30 each time,  printed document @ .49 each .. hence total of $2.79).  I know $2.79 is not really much but its the principle .. honesty towards everyone.  I was here before and it didn't cost me $.49 each copy .. .. 1 2 
So, I have to start my review by saying that I am a BIG fan of Babbo's and have been frequenting their restaurant in Surprise since they opened. However, since they changed locations, I have been disappointed multiple times, yet...i keep going back thinking this will get better! Nope, wrong! My husband and I went in a few months ago,  45 min wait, so we approached the bar. There were 3 seats open, we went to sit at 2 of them, and were told they were reserved???? I'm sorry, I thought bar seats were for patrons waiting for a table??? Manager tells us otherwise ...she must have been expecting friends??? Ok, so we like the food, so we now resolve to only order takeout. So....tonight  ( Thurs nite in July...not a busy nite) we order takeout at 6:02. Then receive an email that order will be ready in 20 min. Show up 20 min later only to wait for Another 45 min for my order. In the meantime, the poor girl who has to deal with all of the disgruntled takeout orders...because I am clearly not the only one...decides to be bitchy back to us. Never an "I'm sorry for the wait..." Good food, but awful service and management at this location...bigger isn't always better 1 2 
I walked in here to try it and had a Greenhouse Juicery bottle in my hand and I was asked to put it away.  Please.  I was immediately irritated.  In no way was my juice going to take away from the business I gave to you - until you said that.  Then I ordered less simply because of the rudeness.  Your food is nowhere in the same league so you should take whatever business you can get and be glad anyone stops in. 1 2 
So I was at the Bier Markt tonite. It is definitely a packed place but I think they dont like coloured folks going over there. In this day and age that is so sad especially in a city as diverse as Toronto with all its diversity. The waitress was awesome but the patrons are just crazy. There is this small dance floor. I was dancing on the dance floor and for no apparent reason, this guy just kicked me on my chest. Usually when I go out for the weekend, I spend about a 100 bucks. I guess I will be taking my business else where. Sorry Bier Markt, if you cant treat your patrons nice, they will move else where. 1 3 
Highly not recommended.1. Sushi rice was as thick as a pillow2. The sashimi on top of the rice pillow was poorly sliced with rips and tears on it3. Sushi was warm4. Waitress didn't even know what they were serving..reminded her our eel sushi hadn't come yet. . And she pointed to a random sushi already on the table and claimed that to be the eel5. The only thing to compliment was the mango pudding dessertOverall, ranked lowest of the ayce Japanese restaurants I've been to. 1 2 
The food was ok.  The mushroom appetizer was good, and so were the sushi.  The major complaint is the service.  When we are sitting down, a woman was complaining already that the server took a long time to come around.  But her english was bad, and I don't think the hostess took it seriously.  Unless my wife and I experience the same thing.  We order a bottle of decent saki, and our waiter had to be reminding twice to refill our drinks.  And he got two of orders wrong.  He made some excuse about the system, but one order was wrong after I reminded him of my hamachi order after getting the yamato roll.  We told this to the manager, not sure if he will do anything.  I think we was just going to calm the customer, I told him it was one of the worst services in Vegas, and we have been to many places (including cafes and Joel Robuchon's place) of wide range.  I strongly recommend you complain quickly if you see a skinny waiter with glasses and goatee comes over.  A true disappointment. 1 2 
It unfortunate that this is so close and convenient to me. The food is fresh, which is the only reasom I go. The employees have such an attitude EVERY time I go. I have never been there and had a good experience with the workers. They are incredibly rude. Also during times that are busy, especially lunch, they only have one employee in the building. So the line will go to the door. I was in there when that has happened and 3 people came in and waited for a minute then walked right out. Something needs to be done on how rude they are. 1 2 
The noodles may be good but the kung pao chicken was a total dud. Wildly expensive at $18.95 and not nearly as good as airport fast-food Chinese. The dish was sweet (not spicy) and gloopy. The chicken had no saute marks. I think it was boiled. 1 2 
The beef empanada , Chocolate mousse cake and cheese sticks were average at best.Haven't tried their bagels but I doubt they compare to the  bagel shops in toronto.Service was friendly. Decor was non-existent and the food was overpriced.Unfortunately I don't have any childhood memories associated with the place nor am I a fan of overpriced average food to give it more than a star. 1 3 
Very pushy, "buy today" atmosphere. Was not impressed. It is interesting that the salesperson only attempted to communicate with me when I was looking at the more expensive beds... Thankfully, I found another mattress company that was more helpful than pushy. 1 2 
I visited this Capriotti's location at Fort Apache & Tropicana on July 21 around 1pm.  I chose to dine in.  The restaurant was very hot so I don't think a/c was working or it was not turned on.  The workers were sweating.  One kept opening the large refrigerator to fan herself.  The time to receive my meal took way too long.  Looked like they may have been short staffed.  What really blew my mind though was the fact that when I finished my meal I needed to use the restroom & to wash my hands from having a messy sandwich.  I was told that this location does not offer restrooms & that I would have to walk over to KFC to use their restroom.  I said What?!!!!  I am a paying customer & just ate in your restaurant & you cannot offer a restroom?  The worker said no & that's the way it is.  I asked for the manager & was told the same thing.  They do not have restrooms for customers.  I have never heard of such a thing!  I watched as another customer had to walk over to KFC to use their restroom after placing their order.  I was appalled!  There is absolutely no excuse not to offer restroom facilities to paying customers at the very least to wash hands since you are eating a meal there!  I could understand a little if restroom was out of order for a particular reason, but that was not the case.  Needless to say, I will not be back to this location as they obviously do not value their customers.  Bit of advice, if you do visit here, make sure you go to restroom somewhere else beforehand & bring some sanitary hand wipes with you as you will not be able to wash your hands unless you walk over to the KFC which a customer should not have to do. 1 2 
My family used to come here quite a number of times when I was little. I recently came back here since I remember my family talking about how good the food here is. The decor is gorgeous they put a lot of effort into it. Can't say the same for the quality of the food. The prices of the food is reasonable and it looks really good. It also tasted very good especially the lo mein. However, the first time I came back here, my tummy felt a little queasy after eating the food. I thought it might have to do with something else and not the food here, but then I came here a second time. I ended up having very bad food poisoning the second time and I'm positive it's because of the food here. I have no idea what their sanitary rating is but God I am never coming back here. 1 3 
Ugghh. The service makes for an unpleasant experience. Delivered food with no silverware. We had to ask for drink refills, butter, mustard. You name it.. Server was nice enough but just not at all present, so everything was very, very slow.On the good side, my kid liked the gravy. 1 2 
My friend and I were visiting from out of town and decided to try this place out when we saw their groupon. The first thing we noticed was an empty parking lot at 7:30 pm on a holiday weekend. Awful location?Upon entering we felt a little relieved with the warm reception from the young host. He found us a booth quickly and was kind enough to turn off the fan that was blowing our paper table cloth everywhere. Although delivered quickly, after one sip of our Diet "COKE", it was obvious that it was RC Diet Cola and right from a flat 2-liter bottle. The salad bar, if that's what you would call it, was slim pickens and only offered hearts of romaine and three dressings. They had some other Italian appetizers as well, ie. rolled deli ham and cheese cubes. The hot plate section was not labeled and it took an explanation from the young host in order for us to know what the dishes were. The Chicken Cacciatore and Cheese Balls were incredible :) Main course: As the first round of meats arrived, you can tell that they were made very recently. We received italian sausage, grilled pineapple, garlic bread, pork rib, grilled chicken, and top sirloin. They were up to par in taste and served from a hot skewer and the portions were fair.  We never received any tri-tip, leg of lamb, or filet mignon - all of which are advertised on their groupon/website! The highlight of our underwhelming experience was the warm smile and friendly attitude from the head chef and his staff. In all honesty, the groupon price we paid ($65 incl tip) is still a pretty high for what we received. 1 3 
20 minutes late on my pick up, all they had to do was make the pizza I was myOwn delivery boy. I should have got a tip for waiting so long and so patiently. 1 3 
When our waitress was bringing out the food, the plate tilted and grease spilled all over my bag and hat. Needless to say food was overly greasy and salty. They also charged me a few bucks extra for choosing bbq pork as one of the options for the dish but the menu made no mention of extra charge. On top of all that, they placed a mandatory tip of 15% on my bill even when service was crap. 1 2 
Came to Oakville to meet up with a friend and we came to this restaurant, and I have to say I was disappointed. Ordered the crispy beef for myself, and the dish had about 7 pieces of beef and the other 90% of the dish was vegetables. The portion size itself is already small and there was not enough beef in a dish that focuses on mainly beef. It was definitely overpriced, and compared to asian restaurants in Toronto, I've had much better crispy beefs that were cheaper and better portioned. 1 2 
I have tried this place several times. Sadly, the only thing I have ever enjoyed here was the Round Salad. The last time I went I was extremely hesitant because of previous visits, however, I figured one more time couldn't hurt. I was so wrong. The she crab soup was decent but barely warm, my chicken was way overcooked, and a person in our group of 8 found a large piece of plastic in his jambalaya. The service was decent so I cant fault her for the over hour wait for the food. I definitely will not be going back. The manager came over (maybe the owner?) on a Saturday night with a toboggan on his head, which I found a little odd for a place that is supposed to be a little more "upscale". (Especially with the price point) I wish I could say maybe it was an "off night" but with the two previous experiences I don't think that is the case. 1 2 
Food here is ok but overpriced.  Server asks for our drink order and my wife and I ordered apple juice as it was breakfast time.  Our drinks were brought out immediately and the food 20 minutes later.  While we sat of course we sipped and by the time the food arrived my juice was gone.  I asked for a refill to which I was then told oh no refills on that.  1. How do you bring me a drink 20 minutes before my food and then tell me no refills?  2.  Is there a juice shortage?  It's not expensive for juice quit being greedy.  And 3.  If there are no refills tell us, up front and ask if we want something else or juice when the meal comes.  Very shady and I will not be coming here again 1 2 
Though the food is good but they have The most pathetic service ever!!!! They have no idea how to handle service in rush hours 1 2 
Where to begin...I ordered our food (take-out Hibachi) and told them, extra vegetables, hold the rice. When I got home, it was extra rice and not a vegetable in site. My bad, I should have checked but please explain to me why the chicken, steak and shrimp were so over cooked and dry? When you spend over sixty dollars, you have expectations! Everyone's dinner sucked. Perhaps it was just a crappy night, but I doubt I will be headed back anytime soon. 1 2 
Although a beautiful place and overall I am happy to have my grandfather here I am incredibly displeased with the administration.  From the lack of greeting, the general disorganization and forgetting to schedule the honor guard.... My grieving family was every disappointed both in our experience today and in not providing the the last honorable salute for our loved one that he so richly deserved! 1 2 
The previous reviewer got this spot-on.  I mean, who WOULDN'T want to go to the UN-friendly neighborhood bar?  Oh, wait.  EVERYBODY.  The BF and I are new to the DeFo area, and looking for a local hangout.  Upon entering The Landmark, we immediately learned a helpful tip that I am happy to pass along to you: don't try to start a conversation with the bartender/owner, because his personality seems to be a curious mix of hung-over crocodile and rubber spatula.  My conclusion is that he must be independently wealthy:  I'm guessing that the geriatric regulars are not the highest tipping bunch, but how DARE new people walk through his hallowed doorway?! 1 2 
Eli & the rest of the gang here are amazing! Stop in and let them give you a demonstration; you won't regret it! 1 5 
Service was poor - waiter brought us a check that was double the amount ours should be and seemed totally confused when we pointed it outFood was only ok - nothing special enough to warrant the price - the nachos were cold and the tuna and salmon were hardly seasoned Worst part - valet returned our car to us after a rain shower during our meal. Got out and handed us the keys only for us to discover the front leather console and seats were drenched with water. Valet admitted to opening the sunroof and letting the water in. Managers response was "well what do you want me to do about it?"We won't go there again 1 2 
Me and my lady used to come to this spot at least once a month for the amazing sushi. This all changed as of last night as we are currently looking for a new spot. Owner and sushi chef were a little hmmmm let's just say messed up from a tiny bit to much drinking, along comes customer to my left ( we sat in the middle of two different groups at the sushi bar ) drinking and having shots with the head chef, some conversation about where they are from is exchanged and then escalates to the head chef cussing him out taking his shirt off to show his tattoos, which ended up in customer to my right coming out of no where and playing referee for customer and Mr Head Chef who has been in jail and is from LA. Now I'm from LA myself and don't need to hear your story about what part your from or what gang you rolled with when you were younger, years in jail etc.  I don't normally go out of my way to write many reviews and I loved this place for years but if you are thinking about going here I would say try somewhere else ! 1 2 
I must be missing something.  People on here giving this 4 and 5 stars?  I have been eating Mushy Peas my whole life and these are the first I couldn't get down. There is a peculiar taste to them that I can't identify. The chips have a funny taste also.  The pies are average at best.  Service is shaky at best.  I have tried this place at least three times and I am a regular next door at Pipers so it's not like I haven't given it a chance..The people giving this multiple stars have never been to England apparently. Although one night I heard some people talking about Downton Abbey......maybe that counts. 1 2 
After my last visit, I have to wonder why anyone would spend their money at this restaurant.  With the many FINE quality burger joints In the area, this by far is sub par.  Once a nice place to take the family is now run by a crew of misfits starting at the top.  When taking one step in this eatery it's painfully obvious there is tension among the staff, making for an uncomfortable experience from the get go.  I over heard fowl language from "Savana"?  I believe her name was.  When I have a small child with me this is not what I want them to hear.  I asked another employee who was tending to the condiment station who was the manager and they pointed to a short blond young woman who's appearance left something to be desired.  I decided then & there I would observe before speaking with her...just as I thought.  She too conducted herself like a child & not like a leader. I have spent the better of 30 years in a profession where I was required to notice small details. These details tell a lot about a person, situation or environment. Fuddruckers fell short in all areas. If the "feel" is off when u enter a place the meal is less enjoyable. I hardly noticed the quality of food because i was so put off by the first 10 minutes. The food was somewhat enjoyable, but nothing like it used to be. I feel as though if I'm going to pay 12 bucks for a burger meal, it should be served to me. (I can go across the street & get a nice steak dinner for 10 bucks!) With that being said, if everything is spectacular, these are the little things I'd over look. The charm of the place, if u will...I can get a cheaper, better tasting burger in 5 other places with in a mile of Fudds.  Overall this place need a complete makeover from management to menu.  If u don't care about your restaurant then why should I?  I sure hope this place can be saved,  it once was a great fun family spot! 1 2 
I rarely write reviews but maybe this will help some readers... Two positives-- the good selection of dresses and the very sweet and understanding head of alterations. Other than that, Missy was patient with me... to a point. I'm very indecisive so I was there for a long time trying dresses. I was apologetic for not being able to make up my mind, but at the same time I realize that it is her job to help me. I also work in the customer service industry and understand the importance of making sure the guest has a great experience and feels comfortable, even if it's not ideal for the employee. Missy told me that if I purchased within 24 hours of trying on I could get a 20% off the dress to apply towards alterations or a veil. Because of that alone I "said yes to the dress" and picked out a veil. At checkout my mind was all over the place thinking "Did I make the right choice?! There's no going back now! Oh no! What did I do?!? Blah blah blah..." and I did not realize that they didn't apply the credit towards the veil until later. I figured that it wasn't a big deal thigh because I could still apply that credit towards alterations, but when I went in a few months later the price they quoted me was crazy so we said "no way!" We tried explaining to one of the employees that back in May we were told we would be able to apply the credit to the veil but they made an error on their end and did not apply it. This employee said that she couldn't do anything for us but would have the manager call us. We waited a few weeks to hear back (they were in the process of changing locations so we understood the delay), but when no one ever called us my mom had to call them. She spoke to the manager who still refused, even though giving us this credit on the veil would only take a little bit of work on her end. So much for customer service!! Now we are stuck with a hefty store credit that I don't know if we'll ever get the chance to use, and honestly, I would prefer to not ever return to the store to use it... Moral of the story, if they tell you that you will receive a discount, make sure they apply it!!! 1 3 
Been here at pickup area for 45 minutes after spending 480 bucks on a mattress. I guess it would be helpful if these people didnt have heads so far up asses. 1 2 
I had actually read the reviews before I went so my expectations were super low but they still managed to disappoint.I waited so long for someone to take my drink order that I ended up ordering at the bar. The food was dropped off so quickly that we didn't have a chance to ask for cutlery (and no one noticed we didn't have any). We ended up taking it from another table. When the mains came, they didn't clear the appetizer plates. Then when the desserts came, they didn't remove ANY of the dinner or appetizer plates. Seriously? We also didn't get cutlery for dessert and had to once again pillage another table.  And don't even bother trying to get a glass of water... Bottom line: mediocre food, terrible service. 1 2 
Maybe the "Kid Friendly" should be updated to say NO. FYI I used to love this place, I would go here all the time when I was at university. I grew up...and I had a baby. Now I came back with the stroller on a not so busy Saturday afternoon, only to come in and be told that strollers were not allowed...and it wasn't like I had some gigantic stroller either. There were a few empty tables.Would you have turned away someone in a wheel chair? I don't think so. Absurd. I was so insulted. Way to stick it to your loyal customers. Never going back, and if you have small children I advise you not to go there either. 1 2 
True disappointment. Bland food and long wait for it. The service was the only positive part. 1 2 
For the price that I paid, it was definitely not worth it.  I would understand if it was a school, where stylists are still learning, then you get what you paid for, but that is not true here.  When I got home I noticed an area on my scalp that had dye and melted saran wrap stuck to it, which was super awkward to get out of my hair & now the area is very sensitive.  I also noticed there was a huge bleach stain on my t-shirt as well.  For such an expensive hair cut and dye I don't think I should have had to suffer through peeling dye off my scalp at home or a ruined t-shirt. 1 2 
I don't know why I come here. Their buy 1 get 1 promo is misleading. Buying toppings on top make it more expensive than Chatime and their staff have zero personality.  Chatime is busier for a reason. 1 2 
Waitress was adorable and service good, but Sunday brunch took an hour to be served!  Perhaps they were short-staffed in the kitchen, but you would at least expect a manager to be out to apologize.  Everyone in the place looked unhappy and....hungry.  When the food did arrive it was decent breakfast food, but after so long of a wait, I'm not sure it really mattered.  Perhaps it was an isolated incident, but the lack of any managerial contact suggests a lack of professional management, or maybe they were so short staffed that the manager was busy cooking! 1 2 
To be fair, the restaurant apparently has a new owner and is presumably under new management. So I do not know if things have changed but hopefully they have. 1 2 
All I have to say is I changed my daughters dentist. First off they forget to call me when my daughters retainer arrived, they said I should be expecting a call 3 to 4 weeks. Okay 2 months past and still no call. I finally called and asked them about it so they but me on hold, umm yeah they couldn't find it. They call me back and asked if I wanted to set an appointment, of course I do since my daughter needed it to get her teeth pulled. That was the very last time she went there. Tips for finding the right dentist for your child: Make sure the place is kid friendly (Names will get you) Clean Staff is friendly Your child feels welcomed (there is nothing more important then finding the right dentist that makes your child feel comfortable) 1 2 
Perfect on the drop off of rented tables and chairs but when it came to pick up on the Monday morning absolutely useless. My wife and I took a day off work with the plan that we would go out for the day once these people had picked up but when I hadn't heard from them by 11.40 I decided to call. The response was we are running behind schedule because Monday's are always busy but we should be there in another couple of hours so there goes our vacation day wasted. I would not recommend this company. 1 2 
Great sashimi.  Thought I'd test the so called "world class" tuna melt, like there really is such a thing, but if one wants to use great tuna then possibly,  but otherwise not world class by any  means except the tuna, which great, but then really just a great piece of tuna between 2 sliced of bread.... Hard to beat a "real" tuna melt folks!  Especially for the price! 1 4 
Me and my girlfriend went to go eat there for lunch on a Wednesday. We sat down in the bar area. There was maybe 10 customers in the whole place. For about 7 to 10 min no one said hi, or anything. They made eye contact and would walk right by you. Just poor customer service. I could understand if it was busy but it was a ghost town and I could see the workers on there phone. 1 2 
This ramen is all oil. Packaged Ramen is even better than this. The chicken karage is horrible Wendy's chicken nuggets is way better also it is way cheaper than this overpriced crap 1 4 
We thought we would try them through a groupon promotion.  The guy that came out to clean was lucky if he was working on our pool for no more than 5 minutes.  I didn't see him brush the pool and anything on the bottom of the pool stayed on the bottom.  The promotion was for 1 month of cleanings otherwise 4 cleanings.  They called before the 4th cleaning to see if we were going to continue, and when I told them no, they have not been back to do the 4th cleaning.  I called I have been told that they argued with me that my time expired a week earlier, but then after 5 minutes of telling them it hasn't they realized they had the wrong account.  Was told they would be out Monday and now two weeks later have not been out.  I would not recommend this company unless you like giving money away for services not rendered and that you end up doing yourself.  They talk a great game but follow through is horrible. 1 2 
Disclaimer: a vegan's viewI often don't bother reviewing restaurants with poor vegan choices, but feel compelled to here because this one couldn't even get me a salad that was sufficient.I thought I'd get pizza with no cheese. Their pizza dough has egg in it.Ok, salad. ALL of their dressings except for one also has egg whites in them. That's odd, but whatever. So I get the chopped vegetable salad with the one dressing they can offer. The salad was mediocre and meager in portion size. So after lunch here I had to go find something to eat. 1 2 
We always thought the Farm Grill was great, but were very disappointed this trip! Whom ever sold them on the idea of the drinks offered at the fountain, really did them a disservice! The need to go back to offering adult selections like Coke or Dr Pepper again instead of the crappy flavors like "Tractor Cola". It tasted awful, so both my wife and I tried a couple of others. They were all terrible. I settled for water, and my wife drank the root beer, which was tolerable! We liked the do over in tables and atmosphere, but did the burgers shrink, or was our disappointment in the drinks just putting us in a crappy mood! 1 2 
I've been here twice now and both times have been disappointed. Both times it took at least 20 minutes to get our food. That the longest I've ever waited at a Noodles & Company. The staff isn't very friendly or helpful. The first time we went I paid for extra mushrooms and there were 3 mushrooms in my food, my food which was supposed to already had mushrooms and was supposed to have extra added in it. When I said something to one of the staff, she got an attitude and said that they are busy and that's extra mushrooms. Once I showed her and said there are only 3 in there, she reluctantly offered to get me more. She then slammed it down on the table and said "here." Tonight I got my food to go and was very disappointed. I got the Pesto Cavatappi and there was almost no pesto on it. I got a side salad which has the dressing container inside so cutting my salad in about half. The dressing container was less than 1/3 full so it makes it seem like they are just using it to take up space so they don't have to give you as much. I am VERY disappointed in this location. Noodles & Company is one of my favorite places to eat. Even though this one is the closest to my house, I don't think I'll be returning. 1 2 
I wouldn't come back here. I've visited JM's before, and had a great experience a few years back. However, visiting here for a friend's birthday, we got the privilege of having Jen as our waitress. Not only did we wait over an hour for our food, we had parties around us sit, order bad get our food before us. I ordered a burrito, which used to make Chipotle feel like a poor man's burrito. No, my burrito was a sorry excuse for a Taco Bell soft taco. And it was $11. Jen swapped it out for a Quesadilla, which was much better. However, Jen wanted to charge me an extra $1.50 for rice. At that point in time, there was no excuse to try to charge me another buck for rice. Just make me happy. The quesadilla did come with rice, and it was very good, however the waitress left me with a very bad taste in my mouth about Johnny Mango's. I had very good experiences here in the past, but as long as JM hires and employees people like Jen, I won't be coming back to this place, ever. I'm much better off going to the local liquor store, getting a quart of Jose, and grabbing a few chalupa's say TB. This place is a sorry excuse of Ameri-Mex, especially if you want to drop a couple hundo and have a good night out with some Margaritas. I did not have a good experience, and I only blame Jen half-heartedly. There was no manager asking about our experience, and there was one trying to make our experience better. Heading home, disappointed. 1 2 
Both my mom and I ordered the New slow roasted sliced sirloin and it ended up being tough, chewy, and too rare for us! Our baked potatoes were very over done and we couldn't eat those either. It was difficult to get our servers attention after he brought our food to the table and disappeared so my mom (who is handicapped) flagged down another server who was rude. We then asked to speak to the manager (who was on the phone.) When she finally came out to the hostess station, she said they could cook us something else, but she seemed annoyed and really didn't care, defending her cooks and time potatoes were in the oven. We walked out, without eating or wanting to chance another bad meal. Quality has really gone downhill and my husband and I used to rave about their steaks. And, my mom (who doesn't eat out much) was so disappointed after our experience at this location. 1 2 
My family and I went to Aji Sai last weekend for lunch. They renovated their FOTH and it looks pretty decent. They also printed new menus since the last time we were there. We've always enjoyed coming to this place in the past, but we had a different experience this time.Food:- Their wakame salad (a cooked seaweed salad) is tasty. - Their fish does not taste fresh and has a mushy texture- Their rolls have very very little flavour (the spicy salmon rolls has NO taste. It's not even a bit spicy).- They do not have shrimp tempura during lunch service (whereas Sushi on 7, Maison du Japon, Yang's Kitchen all do)- Soft drinks are not included in the price (whereas again, the other AYCE restaurants nearby do)Service:- Servers are indifferent-- I don't mind, as long as you bring the food- Servers don't bring food. I think this is the problem. It's happened more than once. They bring the first round quickly, but the second round either takes forever, or does not come AT ALL. We waited 30 minutes for the second round orders, and finally gave up because we got full from sitting and waiting. When we told the manager to cancel or order and to just give us the bill, he looked annoyed and asked us what we ordered, and when told that we don't want it anymore and just the bill, he walked off w/o saying anything. Had to ask for the bill a second time. Hmm.I'm a low maint. kind of guy. I ain't rich, I don't go to high class restaurants, I don't care about decor-- I just don't like getting shafted.By the way, it definitely is a popular and busy restaurant. But look around you when you go.. you'll see that going to Aji Sai for Japanese food is kind of like going to Mandarin for Chinese... 1 2 
-----------------------------

One thing you should take into consideration before going in...1.) This place is located across the street from the abandoned Festival Mall. 2.) Sit in the parking garage lot and watch the clientele that enters. Yeah. So, one the hostess was terrible and rude. Did not greet us. We walked the buffet line. Very odd dishes to say the least and disorganized in the way it was presented. I wish I could have taken pictures. Tacos next to soup next to crab legs. We sit down at a table and look up--spider webs, dust, table was terrible sticky. Think of the worst episode of kitchen nightmares and times that by 7. Food was the most store bought garbage. I've definitely had the same spring rolls in a sample station at Costco. At least those were warm. So unless your into taking risks and eating sketchy chinese/ taco/ store bought macaroons would not recommend. 2 1 
Decent place with nice deco but the noodle soup is too too too salty, even for Chinese visitors. My friend guesses that maybe the owner is Japanese and goes with Ramen style. 2 3 
I spent over $10,000 on new carpet, appliances fans and lighting at this Home Depot to renovate my home and the customer service was horrible, especially in flooring.  They were rude and not very helpful. 2 1 
We went to this restaurant yesterday, and I should have read the yelp reviews. I would have passed.We arrived relatively early because we were going to see a play at the Royal Alexandria.  Service was nice and friendly and for the most part prompt. The decor was warm, inviting and modern. I was really excited to try this place out. We ordered the deep fried calamari and shrimp. While it was cooked well and breaded tastily, it did not come with any dipping sauce. I've never not been served dipping sauce with this dish, so it was really quite boring after the 5th piece.My cousin ordered the $30 Buonanotte pizza. For $30, canned, squishy mushrooms is NOT acceptable. She loves mushrooms and has to leave them on the side. She did say the dough was cooked well.I ordered the seafood pasta. For $26 the portion was quite small. All my 7 mussels were out of their shells (but they still put the empty shells in the bowl?? I got 1 shrimp and 3 pieces of calamari. The sauce was SUPER oily and the pasta was ridiculously undercooked. I know al dente, and this was like al dente's frigid aunt forgotten outside after a night of partying (aka super dehydrated). Now, I am a pretty passive aggressive person (hence, writing a review in lieu of making a fuss in the restaurant), however, I really would have liked to bring this to the chef's attention if we weren't in a rush to make it to the play. I needed SOMETHING to eat and was seriously contemplating the street meat at the corner of John and King St.Anyway, will not be going back and will be telling all my friends to avoid this place. I don't know how they will make it with food lacking this much. 2 3 
Mixed Bag. Used the transit system on a Saturday as a tourist. Here's what I liked: The day pass was $10.75 for our family, pretty reasonable. The subway was clean. I didn't see any rats like I saw in NYC. The drivers/operators were helpful and friendly. The announcements of upcoming stops were clearly announced audibly and visually. The map (when we found one) w/ routes was clear and easy to follow. Here is what I didn't like: The TTC map was not available at the Spadina 7-11 store where we purchased the pass. We looked for maps at the Subway station and could not find a rack dispensing it. The attendant was not present. The day pass is not a card you swipe at the turnstiles and busses like the Metrocard in NYC. The pass is a flimsy ticket, by the end of the day it was pretty beat up. When we went to ride the subway at the first station, there was not an attendant to show the pass to, so we stood around with other tourists looking confused a minute and then my husband just tried the turnstile and we walked through. The subway is not as expansive as NYC. I think there are only two lines. You have to walk to an island in the middle of the street to catch some streetcars. Delays for streetcars. We had to wait a half hour for most. Then when one came, there was another close behind. They were clumped together. One was running late while we were on it, and had to abort it's route. 2 3 
I've been here twice now because sometimes you just want a burrito. However, I can do better myself (and in fact, every time I go by this place I think I should quit my job and open a near-campus taco stand). The chicken tinga burrito was quite good and pretty close to California style. The burrito portions are small enough to finish and not make you too fat, which is a plus I think.Nachos are likewise quite good. Good for sharing, disappear fast.However, this place serves the worst enchiladas I've had in long time. Decent tortillas and shredded chicken filling, but the sauce is canned and they top them with wilted lettuce and cheese that is dry and crumbly like parmesan in a can. Ick.Also, the stools are really uncomfortable, and they serve their sodas in styrofoam cups. 2 3 
REALLY dry ribs, pulled pork tasted like watered down sauce was added after cooking. Mac and cheese was creamy and good not over cooked Slaw was good- just normal slaw I honestly could not believe how dry my ribs were.... It was pretty heart breaking as I had been looking forward to going there just for that for sooooo long ! Brisket was cooked well ... For most of the pieces I got because again part of it was dry. Tip***The sauces are good but they need to leave the ribs in for a longer cooking time seriously tho .... Please do.... Ribs are suppose to fall of the bone not be like jerky .... If I wanted jerky I wouldn't order ribs. Customer service was great! Very friendly and helpful. This place has a LOT of potential to go so far ... The major loss of stars for me was because when you are a bbq house that advertises ribs like that I expect them to know it is suppose to fall off the bone. 2 3 
The place is good and the hotel rooms are also great. What I did not like about the whole thing was they tricking us into a 'timeshare presentation'. They will just tell you that you need to fill a 'survey' and there is a free brunch and some gifts. Well, the gifts are not really 'free' gifts, its discounted show tickets in Vegas. So spending 3 hrs on this 'timeshare presentation' (they take you around the resort to sell their timeshare property) for a free brunch and tickets, don't make sense at all! All my friends and I were so irritated by the end of it. They do not tell how long the whole thing will take, and one would never guess a 'survey' taking 3 hrs to say no to it.So, just stay from this 'timeshare' scam and buy your tkts elsewhere if you can! 2 3 
I wasn't a bride shopping here, but my best friend was and I have DEFINITELY been to better places with other friends. My friend found her dress fairly quickly and was very excited about it. I went with her 2 or 3 times after she found her dress. Once, to see her in the dress. And the other times were for alterations. Holy rude service :-( My poor friend! She is one of the sweetest, patient people I know and I was sad to see Vera's consultants treating her so rudely. On my friends wedding day, the buttons for her bustle broke off within 20 minutes. When she told Vera's about it, they said there would be a charge to fix it! A charge to fix something that should have been more durable on Vera's end in the first place! Vera herself seems very sweet...but her consultants are lacking in charm and grace. I hope this improves for any other future brides that decide to buy from there. 2 1 
Called in an order for delivery to my home, 2 miles from the shop.  Medium, 3-ingedient pizza and a small greek salad...$33 and change!  Add to that the five bucks I would give the delivery guy and I'm into it for just shy of $40.  Their pizza is o.k., but not even close to the quality that would command that price.  I know, delivery charge, taxes, blah blah blah...it's just a bottom line issue...waaay too much for an average pizza.  Sorry Rosati's, but we're done. 2 1 
Haven't yet tried this Oyster Bar in Santa Fe....because unlike Texas Station, this one doesn't open until 4 or 5 pm.  Hey!!! F & B Manager....people love fish for LUNCH too!! 2 4 
This place is terribly slow. There is never anything ready in their hot n ready zone. I come because it's supposed to be convenient but it's not convenient to wait 15 min for a cheese pizza. 2 1 
Friday night they got a really bad JD, who plays the same music every time a few sons only and keep repeating it all night it gets boring. Some people call this a salsa club, but it is not, they don't play salsa. This place does not attract a lot of people; it is small and plays bad Latin music. Don't waste your night there! 2 1 
My boyfriend & I went to Jozo yesterday after the gym and thought to check this place out since we've been seeing a lot of hype. The place is nice and quiet. Menu has a good variety of options from boba to coffee to smoothies. We ordered two drinks which was the Classic Taiwanese Milk Tea and the Signature Thai Tea. Milk tea was alright, it wasn't as sweet nor milky as most boba places. Thai tea was just like your regular Thai tea that you get at restaurants. And the boba was unusually smaller than your regular boba which was surprising coming from a boba place.What was really disappointing was the amount of ice that was in the drink! My boyfriend and I took two sips of the milk tea to try the flavor and noticed that the cup was pretty much ice! The 12oz cup (not even the bottle) was filled with 2/3 ice & 1/3 tea. I know it's being nit picky but I feel like I got gypped paying $4.50. Mind you, they were out of their cool bottles which comes standard with their drinks and still payed for the same price for a plain regular plastic cup - no name or anything. Overall, I think Jozo is jumping in with the trend of hipster branding but is lacking quality on the flavor. Wish I had a better experience! 2 3 
Reviewed Dish: Palabok (Noodles with an egg on top)Reviewed during: Mon - Fri Lunch timeService Speed: 3 / 5Cooking speed: 3 / 5Food Quality: 3 / 5Food Quantity: 2 / 5Price: 3 / 5 Cleanness: 3 / 5 Repeat: Repeat for a snack, but not for a full size lunchIt took them a while a get the noddle ready. It came in a smaller container than I expected. Unfortunately it wasn't very flavorful. It's good for a snack, but not for a full meal. 2 3 
The place is overrated... It's a full service salon that is dramatically overpriced considering the quality of their service. 2 3 
Yuck! We went there tonight and first found the cutlery to be dirty, second it took a lot of time to be served. Third my food was tasteless. The bean paste was bland, not a speck of salt, i know I can salt my own but it should just be an adjustment.I ordered the beef fajitas, the beef was chewy, I just chewed it and discreetly spit it out.I told the server(nicely) and he did say sorry but did not take it off the bill.We will not be visiting again! 2 1 
I looked forward to visiting rock salt since its opening. Finally had the opportunity this past weekend and unfortunately, I was very disappointed. The restaurant was moderately full but certainly not jammed with patrons.  My wife and I were greeted quickly and offered either indoor or outdoor seating. We opted for outdoor due to my wife's previous experience with the noise level inside. After 10 minutes our waitress took drink order. She returned 15 minutes later to ask if we were ready to order dinner although we were still waiting for our drinks. She apologized that they only had one bartender. One bartender on a weekend dinner service running 25 minutes behind?We ordered oysters and smoked trout roe as appetizers. Oysters were arguably the smallest oysters I have ever seen, smaller than a typical cherry stone clam. The roe was good but served with a bag of potato chips, a bag of potatoes chips for $29!I had the fish of the day which was amberjack and my wife had the scallops. She enjoyed the scallops very much. The amberjack however was cold and raw in the middle. I typically enjoy fish medium but this was actually raw and drowning in salt. Served with Swiss chard that was also so heavily salted as to be inedible.  We finished quickly and moved on to dessert elsewhere, leaving the menus that the waitress had never bothered to pick up from our table behind. Great concept, very poor execution 2 1 
Myself and a friend were visiting the area from The United States.  We have a friend in Montreal who was able to get us a reservation at this restaurant.  We were very excited to be able to eat here during our trip.  We had an 830 reservation and we walked from our hotel not that far away.  We arrived about 20 minutes early and we were told we could sit and have a drink at the bar.  When we approached the bar to sit the bartender asked if we had "permission" to sit at the bar, which i thought was kind of strange.  After informing him that we did have "permission", he asked us what we would like to drink.  Two of us ordered a Pinot Noir and one ordered a mixed drink.  We sat chatting until our table was ready.  The waitress was very nice but must have been very busy that evening because she was slow coming to the table.  We ordered another round of drinks.  When she came back she poured a different wine and we told her we had the Pinot Noir.  She came back to the table and told us that they didn't have any Pinot Noir that evening and wasn't sure which wine the bartender had given us. They finally figured it out and it wasn't what we had even asked for originally.  We decided to just have the original wine and let it slide being we were so excited to be there.  We ordered the Lobster Poutin to start and also placed our dinner orders.  We were served bread thankfully because it took forever to get the Poutin which the three of us ate in no time because the portion (and we ordered the meal size) was quite small.  We had to cut the lobster pieces on top so that the three of us would at least get some lobster.  We sat talking and waiting for dinner for a very long time.  Finally the food came out and we started to eat.  The waitress then came over and kept trying to clear dishes while we were eating.  We finished up dinner and were waiting for the waitress to come back to give us the desert menu but that didn't happen.  A male came over and put a small piece of cheesecake down and said this is on the house and could we please hurry because they needed our table!!! Are they kidding me.  It was not our fault that they took so long serving us dinner but now they didn't offer us a desert menu or coffee and they throw our one small desert for 3 people and ask us to hurry so they can have the table.  We paid the overpriced bill and left and got our coffee elsewhere.  Not happy was an understatement.  Overpriced, small portions, slow service (until they need your table), never offered a dessert and coffee menu.... We ate at much better restaurants during our week long trip... 2 1 
Beer is good. Food seemed appropriate. Service was a bit scatterbrained. Everyone was very nice. If you're in the area stop in. Otherwise seek out a brewpub near you for similar fare. 2 3 
Good location. Cramped but cute interior. Bland yet salty ramen. Toppings were eh (overcooked/bland). Service: only one person looked like they knew what they were doing. Their system of seating and taking orders could be improved upon. 2 3 
I love what they do. But I just had my puppy there for their spay/neuter clinic. He came home, the next day he showed signs of a UTI, (bloody urine, straining to pee). So I took him to his veterinarian and they said they were even disappointed, and prescribed him antibiotic. Yes, you're getting money for it. But be a little bit easier on the little guys, no he wasn't dropped all the way but pulling and tugging and poking resulted in a bloody UTI. I'm very disappointed. Just because it's cheap doesn't mean it's worth it. Please reconsider their clinic, but continue to adopt and visit them as the staff was somewhat friendly... I'm almost afraid to know how they treated my dog when I left. On a better note, his incision isn't infected and seems to be alright. 2 3 
I go to Fabulous Freddy's and when I moved on other side of town I found this Country Club car wash. The ultimate exterior wash was $11 which I purchased and man did they do a bad job. They don't wipe your rims down plus they don't shine your tires. When I go to Fabulous for the same price of $11 they wipe your rims with a towel and shine your tires for the same price as Country Club car wash. I will not be going back to this place at anytime. Find fabulous at your area. They do a fabulous job for your buck! 2 5 
Just like the previous reviewers, we arrived on time only to be told there would be a delay - about 30 minutes. The photographer insisted, even verbally fighting with me in front of my kids, that she wanted to take my son's pictures first. My son is shy and takes awhile to warm up so this was a terrible idea - but the photographer just wouldn't listen to reason and I decided it was easier to just let her take his pictures first since I had waited to the last minute to take holiday pictures. I asked for our toddler to be next, followed by group pics, and then my older two girls. The photographer again disregarded my wishes and wanted to do all of the individual pictures first, so by the time she was ready for the group shots - my toddler was in full meltdown and we left before we could finish. We made an appointment two days later to come back and take the group pictures - what a hassle with 4 kids during the busy holiday season. They didn't have time to review the pictures at that time so I'm still waiting for a call back to finally see if any of the pictures turned out! I was glad to have a Groupon, but still a waste of time and energy - probably better off using a different studio with better reviews next time. 2 1 
I am NOT a restaurant snob.  In general I think Buca is great, with decent food, big portions, and a fun atmosphere to hang out with friends.But the service at this particular location was pretty bad.  We stopped by to get lunch before a Pirates game, but the place was packed and the line was really long.  We tried again for dinner after the game, and again the wait was very long.  We only got a table right away by being one of the few groups willing to sit on the patio after a very hot day out in the sun.Our pitcher of sangria came pretty quickly, but we had to spend a good ten minutes staring at it longingly before we got any glasses we could use to actually drink it.  We never got any bread, which I'm pretty sure they automatically serve to every table, right?  None of our drinks were ever refilled (not even the water, which sort of sucked; see above about spending the previous 4 hours in bleacher seats in direct sun).  Our food came after a pretty long wait, and was typical Buca food- tasty by my standards, anyway!  We ordered dessert, but our brownie sundae had no brownies.  That was a pretty big letdown, let me tell you.Mostly I felt bad for the servers.  It's not like they were just standing around while we waited for food, they were constantly running back and forth and looked really stressed.  There was a big group at the table next to us (a bachelorette party, I think) and they didn't get several of their dishes until well after everyone else at their table had finished eating.  Understandably they sent them back.  Between running to serve all of her tables and trying to apologize to this angry group about a problem that wasn't even her fault, their poor waitress was in tears by the time we left.From my experience and other reviews, it seems like they are chronically understaffed.  It is a very busy location in a very popular area, and it sounds like the management has not gotten that memo.  The end result is that the customers end up entertaining themselves while they wait for their food by chatting with the other tables about how bad the service is.  That WAS at least entertaining, but not exactly the reason I stopped by. 2 3 
We are frequent visitors of the HT franchise. We were excited to try the new one here in Indian Trail. Sadly, this restaurant is not up to Hickory Tavern standards.  Restaurant is too small. Tables are on top of each other. There isn't a separation from bar to dining area. After waiting for 20 mins for a seat in the "dining room " we we jammed in up against the bar stools.  We were dining with a toddler, which can be challenging. After placing our order our waitress did not return. After waiting 45 minutes I did seek out a manager. Our food was brought out finally !  Portions seem smaller than a typical HT. Meal literally came with six fries. The server actually remarked that my burger was sadly lacking bleu cheese crumbles.   At this point with a screaming, tired, toddler we just wanted to leave. 2 1 
Bland bland bland! I was thoroughly unimpressed. Although the portions were huge, there was absolutely no flavor to the food- just bland chicken and cheese inside an overly fried shell. I will not be returning 2 1 
The Salty Senorita is one of those places that's "not the worst, not the best." I've only eaten here when I've had family visiting, as the location is pretty convenient.This restaurant seems like it would be a lot better if they didn't have such a high volume of customers. I can never tell if they're going for piss drunk college kid-or fancy white pants Scottsdale. Maybe they're going for "I barfed up Jager on my $800 tuxedo." Who knows.Their menu is great, the concepts are great, but the execution is always sloppy, bland, and never quite hits the mark.And you can totally tell that they only hire based on looks because their staff is a joke. Literally some of the worst servers I've ever encountered. Like bloody hell get your act together people, this is your job not your spring break. 2 3 
We ordered a carry out thin crust pizza which was ready on time and accurate.  The online ordering process is very efficient and great when you want to get a pizza quickly and take it home.  I like the thin crust and it was done correctly but they were very stingy on the ingredients.  The tomato sauce was not spread across the entire pizza making the outer pieces somewhat dry.  The amount of crumbled Italian sausage was minuscule and I could barely taste the onions or mushrooms.  They did get the half sausage and half anchovies correct and those were in appropriate amounts.  I like Domino's pizza but was disappointed in the overall taste. 2 3 
Since i moved in here near the boca park area, this is the closest pet store that i could get my dog's food. As a dog lover myself, it breaks my heart that everytime i go there, those poor puppies looks sad and sickly, they are stepping on their own poop and seems skin and bones hiding on their fur. I tried not to look and just grab the food/stuff i wanted (which is kinda overpriced!), pay at the counter and leave as soon as possible. The staffs there, which consists mostly bunch of teenagers who have no idea what their doing rather than to asked a generic question "what kind of dog do you have?". They handle the pups poorly and one of them almost dropped the yorkie. Its just so sad that theyre very much engaged in gossiping and chitchatting (and theyre not even shy to tone it down even just a bit). 2 1 
After seeing this reviewed in so many other places I am surprised that it hasn't been written up on yelp yet.After reading so many of those great reviews I am thoroughly disappointed in the food and service that my family and I received at the Hartwood Restaurant. We ate lunch on a Saturday afternoon in October. The place was not that busy and we were promptly seated. I don't know if it was because of all the dust in the air and on the bookshelves around us but my husband immediately began having an allergic reaction to something. After a few minutes the worst of it subsided but his eyes remained quite red and watery for the remainder of the meal.We all ordered our meals and drinks at the same time. I ordered a Pepsi and as soon as I took a drink had to spit it out. The syrup in the machine must have been low and it tasted like bland carbonated water. I asked the waitress to get me a new one and she looked at me like I was crazy but went and got one anyways. She must have got it from the same machine though and the second one was just as bad. Figuring that since a decent glass of Pepsi was too much to ask I wasn't expecting much from the meal.I ordered an Angus Cheeseburger and fries. My husband ordered the Beer Battered Fish Sandwich and Chips. My burger was so greasy I couldn't stomach eating more than a few bites and my fries were both burnt and cold. My husband said he would trade me so he gave me his fish and it was flavorless and also too greasy to eat.Since I don't live in the area The Hartwood Restaurant is not someplace I will be frequenting and if I visit the area again it is definitely not on my short list of places to eat. Pittsburgh has so many other fine dining restaurants I am sure there are much better places out there. 2 1 
I arrived to the spa 30 minutes prior to my appointment as requested.  I was told I had missed my appointment.  I had called a week prior to have the appointment time moved; clearly a mistake had been made by the staff member I spoke with.  I was offered an appointment three hours later.  I felt as though I was being inconvenienced because of a mistake they had made.  I explained that the available appointment did not work for my schedule(or for my friend whose appointment HAD been set appropriately).  The staff member was not proactive with further suggestions(think ::awkward silence::), so I politely asked for a manager.  I provided a solution(allow me to use the spa amenities while my friend received her service, reschedule my service for another day).  Upon entry, I noticed the spa is quite small.  There is minimal seating(7 chairs throughout, we had to sit on the locker room benches part of the time).  The massage rooms are located off a hallway in the center of the spa(clearly a design flaw as the noise of flip-flops shuffling down the hall throughout your massage cannot be relaxing)...the same hallway that every visitor must walk through to get from point A(lockers, vanities, lounge) to point B(steam room, sauna, hot tub).  There are only two showers, both of which had clumps of hair and used razors in them on each of my visits.  Clearly, with only two, they need to be cleaned more frequently.  The staff, while hospitable overall, were too talkative for what is to be a relaxing environment.  As someone who frequents spas(of equal pricing), I have experienced much better.  I now understand why this spa was featured for a $60 for $120 Groupon offer.  While my facial itself was satisfactory(though the room light should not have remained on throughout it), this is really a "starter" spa. 2 1 
Poor customer service by our waitress named "Natalie" ruined our first time here. We ordered a few glasses of wine and a couple of appetizers. None of which were worth the price we paid. (wings + lobster dip) Took forever to even get to order which I didn't quite understand seeing as it was not a busy night and there were only a few other tables occupied. Upon ordering an appetizer I went back less than 3 MINUTUES after asking if I could change the order due to allergies at which point Natalie bluntly said "no the order has already been put through to the kitchen". I should have requested to speak w/ a manager about her attitude but this yelp review will have to do instead.  Will definitely NOT be returning to this restaurant. 2 1 
If there is one consistent character about this particular coffee bean- it  is INCONSISTENCY in quality and service.  I use the drive thru a lot and it feels like my simple order is never right.. Creating an issue where I have to park and ask to have it remade correctly, or ask for the correct size I ordered and paid for.  I really want to like this place..  It's the closest coffee shop near my house as I'm on my way to work.  I just went through with my husband on our way to the other side of town..and once again the sub par quality is disappointing.  Both of our orders were wrong again.  Yuck. 2 1 
starts and ends with terribly bad service; food is mediocre at best and not served hot; food tastes terrible and certainly not Indian in taste; would never visit again. 2 1 
We went here for a friend's birthday dinner and did the restaurant week menu. I was severely disappointed. The amount of food and the quality of food is really not up to par. The steak that we were served was cold. I've had much better sushi on Ventura Blvd. Avoid this place. Overrated. 2 1 
Don't reserve a U-Box at this location. They only have room for six boxes, so it is likely that the reservation will be moved to a different location.  And you won't find out about it until the night before you plan to load. 2 3 
I went there for the first and last time last night. The food was ok.The service was very bad. We were a group for a b-day dinner. We brought a cake with us and They cut the cake before singing happy birthday, if that's not bad enough, they tried to charge us 2$ for each piece of cake for cutting it!?!They tried to convince the birthday girl that her meal was the entree size rather then appetizer even after she told them about her doubts. It took the manager to convene to get her the right dish. When asked for an empty wine glass they brought a filled one and charged for it.There was also very few choices for the vegetarian guests.The manager was nice enough to try to fix everything by giving shots to everyone but it was far from smooth sailing all night! Good thing they have wine for Saq prices. 2 1 
I was staying in town for a week. I wanted to try new places while i was here. I read reviews for Jet. Couldn't wait to bite into it. When i did i was very bummed out. Nothing like the reviews at all. Altho delivery was fast and food was hot. 2 3 
Tons of picture dics.  Many records that you would find in dollar bins, priced like they were new.  But, I guess if your the only store in town...Thank G I dont live in Vegas. 2 3 
I have ordered albos 3 times while visiting Las Vegas. The food is affordable and tasty. That said the people on the phone don't seem to understand what people expect out of a cashier at a delivery place. The person seemed more interested in making me laugh than making sure my order was right and they could deliver it. This time my delivery driver was kicked out of my hotel and I had to come to the entrance to get my food. If I wanted to walk through my hotel I wouldn't have ordered delivery, I would have gotten food from the food court.The previous time I ordered they had no problem getting into our room but we discovered on the receipt had my ENTIRE CREDIT CARD NUMBER, EXPIRATION DATE, CC2 CODE, AND ZIP WRITTEN ON THE RECEIPT. The driver kept a copy. This is completely unacceptable as it invites identity theft.The person answering the phone also seems very distracted and set the phone down twice (for 5 min or so each time) to take an order from a customer in the store rather than taking the minute or two to finish our transaction or placing me on hold to deal with the in store customer.In short fast, cheap, food with a very poor execution. 2 3 
Just an OK chain restaurant. I don't see the value for the cost. I've been to this location twice and both times items on the market buffet line were not well stocked and staff appears to do very little  maintenance on the area to keep it clean, wipe up the spills, etc. that are typical of self-service. There were at least 3 sauces that had run out and we had to ask someone to refill. They should have someone monitoring. We had a big appetizer platter on the previous visit that everyone really liked for the variety. Still, I think there are better local options in the area when it comes to value for the money. Even some chains like PF Chang's nearby I've had more enjoyable experiences. 2 3 
In the words of the philosopher M.Jagger: you can't always get what you want. but if you try sometimes .. you get what you need. (after wasting a few hours)For new years 2012/13 we enjoyed our stay in a HRH Tower King Suite with the lovely "Tea for Two" Tub. Since our plans for this trip included Journey at the Hard Rock and Ka at MGM Grand we went back to the HRH Tower King Suite. I'm 6'8" so a big tub is a big plus in my book, in fact, it's exactly why we got this room again. Imagine my surprise when we checked in to the room and found a lousy 'standard' tub. Odd, since their web site explicitly states: Each 701 square foot king room includes .. with cast iron "Tea for Two" tub' .. nope. After spending far too long on hold we were promised the *right* room for our 2nd night. It was busy, I get it, you take what you can get. We followed up in person with the HRH Tower guest services people that we're not looking for an upgrade, just the 'tea for two' tub that was advertised. The next day we picked up the keys for our new room in the Casino Tower. A lovely room, although a bit loud since it's 'pool view' .. with a *terrible* 'shower / bathtub combo' deal.  Seriously ? Did you not *just* promise us the room we booked with the bath tub we *explicitly* asked for ?After more time on hold and dealing with a front desk manager who didn't know the difference between a standard King Suite and an ADA Accessible King Suite we finally got the keys to another room in the HRH Tower, with the advertised 'Tea for Two' tub. We probably wasted over an hour in the process but that's how you want to spend your precious weekend off, right ? Pro-Tip and Pet Peeve: you have *two* nice 40" Sony Bravia LCD TVs. Why can't you correctly set brightness/contrast and get HD content on them ?  Their 'commitment to excellence' was lacking in other areas as well I'm afraid. Exposed electronics in the mini-bar, poor service in the taxi line (there are two taxis waiting around the corner, could you maybe call them over?) and generally unacceptable wait times for simple room service orders. Coffee and some eggs shouldn't take over an hour. Rather than risk going through the same ordeal once more I think we'll just go with the MGM Grand Spa suite next time. 2 4 
Our first visit was so great that we brought friends and family for our 2nd visit. Unfortunately, the 2nd time around was not as pleasant. The owner was not friendly at all, he was very condescending and he wasn't happy to talk about his beers. In my opinion, he did not do a good job of selling his product or showing customer appreciation.I would give some of his beers 3.5 stars and some of them 4 stars. He makes good beer but who want's to buy and support people like him. My advise would be to let your wife work the taps (since she made our first visit great) and you should stay in the back and brew.I was embarrassed that I talked it up so much and it turned out to be such an unpleasant experience for my friends and family. There are plenty of other local brewing around to support, so none of us will be coming back here again. 2 3 
Bad time today. Dirty windows, table sticky, handy payment/menu gadget yucky. Used my fork to enter info.Food was burned and dry.Only dark chocolate desserts.Adios. 2 1 
Staff is very nice. Food is waaaay over priced. My wife got wings and they may have been the worst chicken wings I've ever tasted at a restaurant. Frozen Tyson wings taste the same. We got the filet mignon nachos and I'd love to see the "filet mignon" they used. Food gets 1 star. Staff gets five. Edited this review. Staff is nice but it's taking forever to get the check. Legitimately 15-20 mins after we were done eating. 2 1 
I liked the price for a mani/pedi $30.  I did not like a man doing a mani/pedi, I like a little conversation.  He almost clipped my cuticle too far. Also,  I do not think the place used sanitized tools.  I should have left.  That is big for me.  I have gotten toenail fungus from a different shop that did not sterilize. I asked if  he used sterilized tools & he acted like he didn't understand what I asked. He did a good job of applying the polish. 2 3 
Tried it after reading all the raving reviews. There's no doubt, it's the cheapest Chinese I've come across in the East Valley. As far as flavor, far from the best. 2 3 
Went there for lunch and had all you can eat soup and salad.  My salads were not very tasteful and the soup was okay.  My friend ordered a pizza and that too was just okay.  The place is absolutely quaint and cozy but I like tasteful quality meals for a good value no matter how cute the place is.  They have wine and beer tastings that might be worth trying. 2 3 
We had to wait an hour for mediocre food. The manager comped our drinks, but should've comped our whole meal. Won't be coming back here anytime soon. It's too bad because this was not our first time here. 2 1 
Just food for when you get hungry. Don't expect much. In keeping with Mandalay bays high prices, you will be overpaying for everything you get. 2 3 
Bad cheessteak. Dry bread. The meat looked funny and dry too. Tasted below average. Won't be rushing back anytime soon. 2 1 
It's definitely a small little hidden spot in Mississauga to take pictures and explore. I find that it needs a little more maintenance as the upkeep has been lacking over the years. If you're in the area then sure, but I would make more of an effort to go to lakeshore area or high park.Hope this helps!-jT 2 3 
The setup looks good but the food was okayish , actually a little over priced. 2 3 
Their nachos are my favourite and possibly one of the best in town! I've even requested BBQ sauce in the side as an extra dip. The price for the huge plate is a great value :):) But this is probably the only thing I like there, with an iceberg beer.The poutines were awful (I had it a year ago and never ordered it again) Hope this helps!-jT 2 4 
My friend was getting married in Las Vegas over the Memorial Day holiday and instead of having everyone spend a fortune at the fancy strip hotels, she picked the Tuscany, so everyone was able to get a good rate.I was traveling with another one of my friend's and her husband and we got to the hotel around 2 p.m.  We waited in line to check in and asked if we could check in early.  We were told that the room that they held for us were given to people that stayed longer and that our rooms were not guaranteed, even though we booked them about a year in advance.  That makes no sense whatsoever.  We told her we were part of a wedding party that had blocked a bunch of rooms, but they still didn't care.  When they said they had 2 rooms available, the rooms were in 2 separate buildings away from where the bride had wanted us to stay.  We told the lady where we wanted to stay and she said come back in a hour and they should be ready.We came back exactly an hour later, only to be told they weren't ready yet.  The lady had us sit and wait 20 more minutes while she waited on a call back to make sure the rooms were clean.  They also had one room with a King bed and one room with 2 doubles, even though my friend and I had both booked rooms with King beds.  I let her have the King room, but once again, what's the point of reserving a room, if you aren't going to get what you asked for.My room was okay.  I didn't have problems like my friend had with the sink and safe.  I did not like that you could hear people above you walking or running.  That was really loud.  Also, even though there are shades to keep the light out, it was still bright once the sun started to rise and that made me wake up way earlier than I wanted to.After the first day, my room was not cleaned by 3:00 p.m.  When I was getting ready to meet my friends, the cleaning lady came back around 3:30 p.m. and I told her I will be leaving soon and to come back.  On the day I was leaving, she knocked on my door at 9:00 a.m. to see when she could clean my room and I told her I was leaving today.  Shouldn't she know that?The food at the Mexican restaurant and Marilyn's Cafe was just so-so.  We only ate there b/c there was noting else, but it wasn't that great.  I would have gone somewhere else, if there was something else close by.The bar in the lobby would have been okay if it wasn't for the jazz music.  I'm not a fan of jazz and did not want to hear it.  Also, the prices for drinks in that bar are ridiculous!!!  My friend and I ordered Shirley Temple's, which consist of Sprite and cherry flavor and they cost $4 each!!!!!!!!  What the heck!?  Also, a small bottle of water, about half the size of a regular bottle, was $4!!!  That is so ridiculous!The pool was probably the only thing that wasn't that bad.  We were able to get lounge chairs both times we went to the pool.  I know people I was with were annoyed with the one waitress that was going around getting drink and food orders.  She was taking forever on some things and even gave food to the wrong people.  On my last day, I had checked out and wanted to spend a few hours at the pool.  I went into the bathroom to change and I came out and put my stuff on the counter.  The cleaning lady was in there staring at me with an annoyed look, so I asked her if I was in her way.  She rudely said yes and I asked her if I should move to one side or something and she huffed out saying, something about coming back.  So uncalled for!!When it was time to leave, we asked the bellman to get us a cab and he waited about 10-15 mins until he called for one, which of course made us late to get to the airport.I definitely won't be staying at this hotel again.  I appreciate that my friend picked a  place to help all the wedding guests save money, but it was an awful experience. 2 1 
My wife and I came here trying to diversify our restaurant portfolio.  Food across the board was okay.  Lettuce a little brown, rolls very out of bag from store feeling.  Many things lacked flavor when the creative names and combos made me expect something bold.  I'm not sure what some of the yelpers liked so much ?  The snickers pie was blah.  My salad was plain.  My wifes quiche was like a frozen pot pie. I liked my app, but not so much I'd order it twice.  The only thing we like was our butter finger shake, but madison has a few thousand places to get custard.  Our server was nice and helpful, but lacked courage in guiding our selection.  Not a awful experience, but not very good.  Would not give 2nd try. 2 3 
The room was ok. Very basic, but we were only using it to spend one night and we got a deal for $22 through Trivago.I don't really have any complaints about the room. Was small but clean. There was a shuttle to the strip. We got off at the Flamingo. What I have a problem with is the staff and how they handled (or didn't handle) a barking dog. I called the ask if they could get the person in the room next to me to please have their dog quiet down. They sent down security, by the time they got there the go's had stopped barking. Fast forward 2:30 in the morning. Dog STILL barking. I call back down there, get told it's a pet friendly hotel and there's nothing they can do. Not acceptable. This darn dog barked ALL. NIGHT. 2 3 
This restaurant is way, way, way too casual and  unprofessional. I ordered a several items which were fine but then sushi roll, and a bug literally walked casually off my plate onto my napkin. I showed it to the bartender and the bartender said  "that is just a fruit fly. It goes after sweet food". Really?!   This time I got a whole new order sushi, and I took it to go. She said she was gonna tell a manager And the bartender said to me we went ahead and took it off of your bill As if they were doing me a favor. Never apologized. Then waited over 20 minutes for my replacement. Too long. I have visited over a dozen P F Chang's  around the country. This one is too reliant on traffic and people could literally fall from the casino into the restaurant. So I don't think they care about service or professionalism given they have so much easy traffic. May need to retrain some staff. 2 1 
This place really grossed me out. I had ordered a fresh coconut drink but never even took a sip when it came after seeing the waitress grab the ice cubes with her bare hands and tossing them into my drink. A waitress who handles money, cleans tables and takes away dirty dishes should NOT directly touch your food and drinks with her bare hands. This is how disease spreads.I was a good sport and decided not to complain because I'm not one to complain before my food arrives, if you know what I mean. A minute into my bun cuon, I pulled out a thick black hair. The food was mediocre. The place was comfortable because the air conditioner gave the place a nice breeze. The staff were generally pretty nice, despite the nasty surprises, which is why I'm not giving them a 1 star. But they really need to be more hygienic. 2 1 
I love getting the bean and cheese burrito. Honestly that's all I get from here. The two times I've been to this location however, it's taken over 15 min to gets through the drive thru. Don't go through unless you have extra time. 2 3 
Been here 3x and no beef #45, will stop coming; what's the point if it's always out. Take it off the menu since it's never available. Portions getting smaller, prices going up. And the table that came after us got to order first. 2 1 
mediocre food, asshole servers (but thats the charm?) personally i dislike being treated badly, especially after 2 days in vegas, hungover, tired, and hungry... entertaining, but hope to NEVER go backhad very well priced special menu for sunday football some fat guy with a tattoo that said "TACO" on his beer belly was quite vulgar and unappetizing...he was also wearing a black thong which he proceeded to pull out of his pants so everyone could see the straps.... you looked better with your shirt ON buddy... yuk 2 1 
I've been coming here for a long time as it's the closest one. I must say that it's dirty and gross. The pool always something if it's a bandaid or just a fluff of dirt, it's always gross. There is nothing interesting in the pool. Very boring. Though it's a good time if you have good peopleThey do have a gym and workout room. It's always crowded in the workout room and you can never find a treadmill. The gym is full ALSO but there are some pretty chill people there. They added a piano upstairs which is nice. And I adore the jugo juice too. Though the library has outdated book but still good reads. Overall it's not the best place as it's also pretty expensive and boring but if you are looking for a place to just chill, Vivo is your place 2 3 
I had been here before it's an ok buffet for dinner in Vegas. It's a good place for when you just get off the plane and are ready to eat.  Atmosphere is not really a good thing for Vegas was hoping for  a little more atmosphere for the price. 2 3 
Eating in. Bring a parka. No seriously. This place is freezing. The food mediocre. The service, not so good. Coffee was not even made when we arrived at 6:15 PM. Salt, pepper, sauce.....etc are available at the courtesy area. Are you kidding me. It should be on the tables. They apologized for the service, because it 'got kind of busy'. What!!! Welcome to the restaurant business, you WANT to be busy. Two couples left while we were waiting and they were ordering take out. If there is a way to order ahead of time and pick it up, do that. I sincerely hope the other locations are managed better. My last time visiting this location. 2 1 
Very long wait to be given prescriptions for back pain. Over a two hour wait with no one in the waiting room. Once the Dr. Came in had to wait again for the actual prescription. There should be more Drs on staff and the wait should be told up front to give pet owners options to go elsewhere. 2 1 
Had the brisket sandwich. What can I say about it? Bleh. Never coming back here again. the brisket was so charred and dry I couldn't eat half the meat in the sandwich. And it was really greasy and salty. Usually I like the fat on brisket but this fat was just gross salty greasy and hard. The bun was good tho. That's the only think I actually liked. Very disappointing. The restaurant was hot and very dingy. The girls were nice. The bbq sauce isn't the best I had but it helped cover up the taste of the brisket. 2 1 
Tonight was my first and last visit to this restaurant.  A friend had recommend we give it a try, so my wife, mother-in-law, and myself decided we would go on their recommendation.  There were very few cars parked outside the restaurant, which should have tipped me off.  In the end, the service was very slow - not sure why, but they may have simply been understaffed.  The waiter was nice and polite, but we ran out of chips and had to ask to get more, and then had to wait a long time for our check at the end of the meal.  All three of us thought the food was very subpar.  I had cheese enchiladas, which are kinda hard to mess up, but they were dry and had a weird taste.  The rice was not very good, and was also very dry.  The refried beans were the best part of the meal, which my mother-in-law agreed with.  My wife had the vegetable plate, and thought it was passable, but nothing to write home about.  We all gave it a thumbs down and agreed it would not be worth it to come back.  We had just gone to Arriba for mexican food just a few days ago, and found it to be a few steps above El Palacio.in addition, they do not allow firearms into the restaurant, so if you are a law abiding concealed-carry kind of person, you should know that you are not welcome at this restaurant...another reason for a less then stellar review. 2 1 
Manager did not care about my experience. Mindy, the server was amazing and friendly and always smiling. Unfortunate that the manager was so flippant and unhelpful 2 3 
If you are paying 7.50 for .3 liters of beer, at least the glass shouldn't have 1 1/2 inches of foam on top. 2 1 
I cannot understand the raves for this place.  The forgettable experience began before we even got through the door.  The heavy glass door does not swing easily but the three staff member standing just inside just stared without offing assistance.   The service never got any better.  The hostess was better suited for an Outback, too casual and familiar for a place with $50 lobster.Our waitress finally sashayed over with an air of condensation, like we should know who she once was but isn't now.  Neither the waitress nor the helper cold find the energy to step around next diner when serving the plates and drinks.  He was probably never taught how to serve, she was probably just lazy and annoyed. Did I mention that there were only three other diners, a booth of two and a table of one.The food was fine, exactly what should be expected for those prices.  I had duck and shrimp tacos.  This first visit will be our last! 2 1 
Took an hour and a half to get to my location even though it ran on the same main streets as them. Found a hair in my egg rolls, and did not receive the correct amount. Nor was there any napkins or forks, wtf! Never again. 2 1 
Subway has bigger and better tasting sandwiches. For the price I expected something delicious, but it was pretty meh. 2 3 
The food and beer tasted good, but overpriced. German street food at a premium. The waitress steered us to more expensive choices, but not necessarily better choices. It felt more like a rainforest cafe experience than the authentic Hofbrauhaus, which I visited several years ago. Not a bad choice, but trust your instinct on the menu! Cheers! 2 3 
Way over priced. I got the VIP Pedicure, no different than the deluxe pedicure. At the mall they charge 35 and here it is 45. Hot stone massage was a joke, it was stone cold. When I asked the technician she said that's how it is supposed to be. Plus the nail color I picked , she said there is an extra 3 dollars for that, I ended picking up a different color. Never going back. 2 1 
1. Sat outside on patio metallic chairs and tables, when we made reservation expecting to sit in the restaurant, not outside! There was no information about this. If the restaurant inside seats g is full. Then they should mention to the customers making reservations that they will be sitting outside!!!2. Food is mediocre at best! They even screwed my order. Asked for risotto and got some pasta, not sure what.3. Asked for two cabs, someone at restaurant changed it to one big cab instead which could not hold all of us so we had to wait for another 25 mins for another one!! Would not recommend to anyone. Enough other good restaurants in Pittsburgh to go to. They have to have paid their way into magazines rating them highly! 2 1 
I was looking forward to coming here for quite a while as I've heard really good things about the food here. I got 3 chillies for my food, but it was disappointing... There wasn't much flavour and it was really, really loud. Hard to hold a conversation here. 2 3 
Have relied on AZ shuttle for years but now will try new shuttle service or drive.  Disappointed they have stopped providing water.  This is disgraceful and frankly stupid given the AZ heat.  What are they saving?  Five or Ten cents?  So bring your own water, oh and be prepared for stops at Denny's in Phoenix to delay your journey to and from PHX.  Fords they now use are noisier and less comfortable then Mercedes of the past.  Drivers remain courteous and competent. 2 1 
Stopped in with my son to get lunch on a weekend last month. We found a booth right away, which is nice. We sat for some time waiting to have our order taken and we watched while a waitress cleaned other tables before she took our order.  It wasn't busy. I ordered the greek salad and my son, a bacon cheeseburger.  The greek salad was a large portion but wasn't anything to write home about. Not much flavor. My son's cheeseburger was "ok" Our waitress didn't seem to have much "flavor" either and she didn't really seem to care about our dining experience. We sat for a while before we realized that we had to pay our bill up front.I walked over to grab a fountain drink recently 15 minutes before closing, and the door was locked with customers inside. When I tried to open the door, that same waitress (the blond one) just looked over and then ignored me. 2 3 
Walked in 30 minutes before close.. All chairs stacked. Stood in line with everyone working just looking at us in line but no one taking orders. Everyone was too busy closing. Then when a lady came up to take our orders she was extremely rude.  Burrito was good but awful customer service. 2 1 
1. I went to your store yesterday with a 50% off coupon.  Could not use it on an adult coloring books.  I looked around the store for something else but even with the coupon I found most items are pricey.  You have too many restrictions on coupons.   2. I have purchased items from 50% signage and when checking out the discount is more like 40%.  3. There is not enough staff on floor to answer questions. 2 1 
So decided to make a trip to Jamie's restaurant for some good food and ambience. Eight weeks after opening, its now a first come first serve, no reservations.Waited 3 hours for a table of five. Does that make sense? Why? Noticed a party of 6 who waited less time and were seated ahead of us, hmm. Another table of 12 is seated ahead of us. Manager, told they don't seat a party of 5 in a table of 6. Why would they lose that one seat. Really? Translation/interpretation, if u don't like it u can leave. Not a good start, and the attitude from the Manager, was astonishing. Once I complained further, got a table of 4 in which they seated 5. So ambience was missing...and accommodation. The food, ordered the garlic bread and ravioli fritti's. Ravioli frittis were very good. Garlic bread was a Naan (homemade pizza dough) with garlic bread and rosemary, really? Main course, salmon and the 10oz ribeye, both were very good.  The ribeye was very thin for a steak, but was tasty. No time for dessert as we were very tired. The waiter was very accommodating and friendly, a positive.Overall, my experience at Jaime's: money over customer experience, food was nothing special or different then other similar type restaurants. Two words, very disappointed. 2 1 
The ceasar is fantastic! Stick to the appies and dim sum. The mains are over priced. Pretty sure they cut the scallop up three times and charged $23 for it. Huge disappointment. 2 3 
Bad bad bad services. I ordered 4 items, and they came on the table almost together. The table was too small, it could not to be placed all of the foods we ordered, and there was no more spaces of the table for the bowls, fork and spoon, but the waiter did not aware it, and we asked him to change other bigger table or add one more table beside us. He looks not willing to do so. He just put the dishes on the table, and then went away. At the last, the printed the wrong bills to us. BAD!!! 2 1 
Not really a Chinese restaurant, but an Asian restaurant that serves selected Chinese, Thai and Sushi dishes.Late on a weekday afternoon I sampled from the dinner menu. I tried the hot and sour soup. Most of the hot seasoning was on one side of the bowl. I had to finish mixing it up.The pot stickers were not inspired either: tough and overdone.The atmosphere was comfortable: dark and good for conversation. The service was excellent.House of Hunan left me longing for the Chinese restaurants of Northern California. 2 3 
My wife went to get take out at this establishment tonight. We didn't order anything fancy or complicated to make. After waiting in the restaurant for more than 30 minutes for our food (2 falafels), we ate them immediately because we were so hungry. They were not even warm, they were cold. The lamb was so chewy it was nearly impossible to eat. Cold, chewy lamb is not what I had in mind. There are lots of great restaurants in the city now. If you can't nail down some Greek food standards, and serve food hot, people will choose to go somewhere else. I know I will. 2 1 
We have booked 2 rooms for 2 nights for us and for our 2 teenager boys. The drama started when we checked in and there was no room available with separate beds for the boys. That got resolved when we agreed to pay extra (700$ for the 2 nights). We were told we cannot use the refrigiratore in the room because it is full of items for sale and a removal of an item will immediatly cause a charge to the room. Just to clarify its 106 in Vegas right now. When we came up to the rooms I was shocked to find out that in order to make my self coffee in the room in a disposable cup I have to pay 5$. The boys wanted to use the gym and were told it will cost additional 35$. Apperantly the is no limit to being greedy. Furthermore, an old sock was waiting for us by the dresser. And to top it all, an Ice Cube party is taking place right now and its 2:20 AM and we are all wide awake with no chance of being able to sleep. Guest services just told me it could continue until 4 AM. How are we supposed to be able to drive to LA in the morning. This is the worst ever.In all fairness I had to add to my review the fact that at checkout I told the manager about our experiance and we got compt for the last night. 2 1 
had a $20 slow cooked pork dish (cochinito pibil) that was described as a house speciality.  Nothing special.  Salty, a little dry...lots of spices. Obvious sauce drips on plate rim were partially wiped off...made the plate look unapetizingly dirty at first.  The $7 Modelo tasted great! 2 3 
Lemme start of by saying the low rating is not because of the food quality or service. Both of those are average. But honestly, this place is thievery. Maybe people who like this place aren't middle eastern or haven't been to a restaurant that serves this type of food because at this place, they think it's fine to serve you HUMMUS for $16!!!!!!!!! We asked for some hot sauce, and they charged us for a tiny bit. When we asked why, they let us know it's made with 12 intricate ingredients. Come on man we weren't born in rural Canada, we know you don't charge for hot sauce. The icing on the cake is when you ask for more pita, and they bring you 4 tiny triangle pieces and then charge you. Kabob for $31? Dawg.... that should never exceed $20, idc what meat quality you're using. Lamb kofta is two smaller than usual kofta with beans. Yes because beans are very pricey and worth $25. To the manager, your food quality is fine. Just don't expect people from the region to buy into this prices. We know pita is worth 0.05 cents. I felt insulted lol. 2 1 
First time there, was not too bad, service was ok.  Second time, food tasted like a frozen dinner, service is very poor.  Will not eat here again. 2 1 
used to have good wings in the past; however, last couple of times--ordered the thai wings--really dry and tasteless (seemed refried and had no meat or sauce on them); since then, have been avoiding this place; lots of better places for wings. 2 1 
10$ for a 3 piece tender meal.  I got the world's smallest tenders. Definitely not worth the price. Very disappointed.  They didn't even offer to switch out tenders.. 2 1 
First off the customer service in this place is great.I walked in to the mac shack wanting and hoping for a warm, cheesy, goodness that would be the next new level in my mac and cheese arsenal.so I ordered the "smoke house" mac and cheese, which by the description from the menu sounded ridiculous. I was pumped, I thought to my self man this is going to be epic!!!also got the garlic bread (because I love some good garlic bread) so I sat down in there very well done restaurant areaThen a short time after I got the soup...I mean mac ... well it could have passed for soup. looking at it stomach rumbling I take a bite, instantly an overwhelming taste of very sweet bbq sauce hit my taste buds and not a hint of the smoked gouda as promised from the menu. The dish resembled vodka sauce and mac elbows, no cheese and so much soupy sauce that I could soke it up with the garlic butter covered little Cesar's style bread sticks.after about 6 bites I gave up and abandoned the dish.I do really wish that I would have had a better experience at this fast casual restaurant. maybe the cook needs to be retrained or replaced either way they wont getting any $13 lunches from me. to me first impressions are everything and should be. this places food did not impress me in the slightest. 2 4 
Delivery was fast. Got a free Sweet potato roll, but that couldn't take away from a rancid flavour and very wet almost mushy rice in the sushi. 2 3 
I don't understand how so many people have had great experiences with the owner. He gets grumpy when we use a card instead of cash and it's not like we're placing a piddly order -- we're buying more than enough to justify it. I prefer to get the food to go (I love the tzatziki) but recently decided to eat in and realized I won't ever do that again. I had ordered Greek fries but received regular fries instead. When I mentioned this to the waitress, who was really nice, she told the owner who then complained about me in the nearby kitchen. I like to think that cashiers, waiters, and customer service people in general appreciate my patience and kindness but this guy makes me feel like it's such a hassle for him to even bother with me. I had another bad experience ordering lunch today and I'm done with this place...I just don't get it. :( 2 1 
I was at this particular Popeyes, about an hour ago. I'm more of a KFC kind of person but, I was right by and decided to give it a try. I drove up to the speaker box on their drive thru lane; I was immediately greeted, I was offered to listen to their specials, I ordered a special combo with chicken, fries, a biscuit & a drink for $4.99. I asked the order taker if it was possible for her to hold the biscuit and substitute for fries instead, she kindly said it wasn't possible, so I said that's fine just hold the biscuit; I wasn't going to eat it, & I didn't want it to go to waste.. Before completing my order I asked her to upsize my drink to a large, and so I thought she did. When drove up to the window, she was nice, but not enthusiastic, just the minimum.. I paid she gave me my drink a SMALL drink, and when I got home I opened the box & the first thing I see is a golden buttery BISCUIT. I rated my overall experience 2 stars, because the service was fast, but my order wasn't correct due to the lack of attention to detail. From other reviews I've read it seems the employees should be oriented on customer service. 2 4 
The place was clean and service was ok. Wanted the fish tacos but they pony had the shrimp do I decide on the al pastors.  Should have had the chicken or beef because the pork was very oily and more fat than I would expect from an upper end street taco place. 2 3 
Meh. Came here 3 years ago and recently visited again. About $40 for brunch and an additional $10 for mimosas/bloody marys. Wait time prior to getting seated was about an hour. There's 1 line to pay and 1 line to get seated.Food was alright. Didn't have a particular favorite and wasn't wow-ed by anything. There is pork belly, kalbi ribs, prime rib, bone marrow, and the crabs rolled in at around 3p. I liked the kale salad and farro salad but I was here to get fat. Dessert, although presentation wise looked appealing, were not that great. I'd stick with the gelatos and chocolate covered strawberries. Our server was attentive but chefs didn't seem happy to be there.Honestly, it'll probably be another 3 years for me to visit again. Over-priced for what they have to offer. I'd wait longer and pay more for Bacchanal. 2 3 
After multiple times asking for a medium rare steak it came back well done . A lot of money for a over cooked steak 2 3 
I had dinner here a couple of times and I would have to say that I've yet to be overly impressed with the food. Everything has been sorta "meh."  The service is absolutely great, and the wine list is also very good but dinner has felt very anticlimactic. In addition, is it just me or does the decor in the restaurant  cross the border from classy into cheesy? I mean, I realize what they are trying to do but the painted brick/landscape....really? Feels a bit Olive Garden-y to me. I may be up for trying it one more time, but honestly, with so many better options in Tremont the odds aren't looking so good... 2 3 
$20 an hour, I've paid for less and gotten more in LA.  I have to tell the lady to go harder like 3 times and they still expect a $10 tip.Definitely not coming back for sure. 2 1 
The pretzel bread and spread is amazingly delicious. The food is really tasty. The servers are horrible. If you ever get Rodger run in the opposite direction. We Ate here two nights in a row thinking maybe the first server was new, but no both nights received the same low class service. The best part of the staff is the bus men and woman and the hostess. We have learned that the servers "pool" their tips this could indicate why they do not care about service or it may just be that they have better things to do than give halfway decent service at one of the best casinos and hotel in vegas? 2 3 
Having been to every brewery in CLT multiple times, I can easily say, this is my least favorite.  Not trying to be too mean to the place but first and foremost, the beers are very 'meh'.  None of them stands out for quality or taste.  I always get a weird vibe in this place, the crowd is just a little off, certainly comprised of the locals that live within walking distance.. which is not terribly appealing.  I would go to Lenny Boy or Triple C any day over Syc if i'm in that area. 2 3 
A bit disappointing.  The food is edible, but nothing to swoon over. Its a trendy little spot that relies on hipsters. Think white guys in sweater vests wearing Kangol hats with women in pashminas and colorful cowboy boots. The bartenders appeared to be required to mix all their drinks over their heads.To call the food there Mexican would be a bit of a stretch. Possibly Mexican inspired or if you want to stick with trendy nomenclature Mexican fusion, but definitely not something that makes you think that there is a pack of a Mexicans in the kitchen. The mole sauce on my dish was quite thin and bland, and the yucca fries were tragically flavorless. The chicken was well cooked but poorly seasoned. The side of black beans was delicious but seasoned in a way that make me think of India, not Mexico.The dinner was by no means unpleasant, but I'm not going to be racing to get back there. 2 3 
The food was all right, nothing too outstanding about it and nothing too bad about it. The service was all right. I find that the price was a bit much. I can understand paying extra if they were including their hot pot in the price, but they don't; they charge extra. 2 3 
Was looking forward to having a late dinner here and all was going well. Ordered the Greek salad, potato wedge and falafel box. Wedges were okay pretty sure they were cooked from frozen as they had a mash potato mouth feel, seasoning was decent though. Greek salad was iceberg lettuce with peppers, onions and a few small black olives (also both the "me-salad" and the Greek came with the same vinaigrette). Finally we get to the falafels... Looked pretty great but they were basically chickpea-ran-through-it doughnuts. Wasn't a fan of the taste or texture, soft spongy with that distinct timbit taste. Tahini sauce was runny and flavourless. Maybe I'm being picky as the rest of my table enjoyed their dishes, but I'd rather go to one of a thousand hole in the wall shawarma places than come back here. 2 3 
This is our second time visiting Claim Jumper and this time I was extremely disappointed with the service. We arrived at the restaurant around 1:30 and it wasn't crowded at all either. My waitress name was Cinthya and she was very rude. We came in to celebrate my daughter's birthday. After we placed an order it took very long for them to bring out the food to us and it was another waitress that brought out the food and I asked politely if she could bring me some chipotle sauce and she never came around to doing that. Almost at the end of the meal I barley saw my server at all.      Then I went up to one of the other servers at the front and told them that it was my daughter's birthday and then a few minutes later my server Cinthya came to the table and questioned out loud in front of everyone at the table and asked "is there someone's birthday at this table?" very rudely. This was a surprise for my daughter from my husband and I and for her to ruin that was unbelievably frustrating. My husband responded for a no because it was meant to be a surprise so I corrected it that yes it was my daughter's birthday. A few minutes later she brought out a red velvet cupcake and she light the candle and just threw it on the table without having the courtesy to even wish my daughter a happy birthday.    Then we asked for a to-go boxes and bags, she brought out the boxes but not the bags then she disappeared off somewhere! If this is how Claim Jumper training their employees to treat their customers then mostly likely we will never return to Claim Jumper again. 2 1 
My boyfriend is kind of a down home, "we love Amurrica" kind of guy, It's part of his charm, it's what I love about him, but the kind of cuisine that accompanies this quality isn't my cup of tea. I rarely eat red meat. I avoid fried foods whenever possible. That being said, I like to see my man happy - a knife in one hand, a fork in the other, and a big plate of Western goodness between the two. TEXAZ seemed perfect. I read reviews, (not on Yelp, unfortunately), scoped out the location, and surprised him by taking him there a few months ago. I, for one, loved the atmosphere. It was loud, a little rowdy, and filled to the ceiling with junk! An eclectic assortment of ephemera clung to the walls, accented with knick-knacks and taxidermied animals here and there. Imagine the inside of an Applebee's, except 10 times darker and decorated with items people actually accumulated over time, not stuff that came out of some corporate "wacky interiors!" starter kit. The waitress was pleasant, but inattentive. The portions were huge, but bland. Even the biscuits were especially boring, and it's hard to make a buttermilk biscuit any more boring than it naturally is, just by existing. I tried to score some honey mustard to liven up my tasteless chicken entree, but no go - no sauces were available! What?! Even my boyfriend seemed less than thrilled by his big ol' meaty hunk of meat, served with a side of some bland starch or another. My boyfriend also found the beer selection to be lacking, but I can't vouch for the accuracy of this observation as I do not care about beer in the slightest. For what it was, it was pricey. I felt like we could've gone to almost any other sit-down restaurant in a 2 mile radius and had a better experience for less cash. We left full, but with nothing good to say other than "my, that was a lot of food." Hardly ringing praise for a $50+ dinner bill. I don't think we'll be back...the lure of the 1970s concert posters and deer skulls isn't enough to justify a second visit. 2 3 
Charging customers for decaf coffee or requesting to have same type of ice cream on your Profiteroles is a bad practice to keep faithful clientele. 2 1 
Chompies changed their corned beef a while back. It's not the same quality and flavor. Scott's and Goldman's corned beef is superior . We  used to be regulars, now we are occasionals 2 3 
I can't even tell you how much business I gave this place... two words: never again.I got my hair cut/coloured there for about 3 years. They did a good job, but the service is really not up to par with the other salons I've recently been to. Firstly, I hate it when people try to hard sell me stuff. They are masters at trying to sell you Aveda products. I'm sorry, but I'm not interested in purchasing a 30$ bottle of shampoo. Secondly, I don't like trekking 30 minutes to a salon only to hear "Oh, your appointment is cancelled, oh your hairdresser moved you to another time..." In other words, "your hairdresser is booking other, more important people in your time slot." I know this for a fact because when I arrived for my 11 am appointment (which she who shall not be named "suddenly couldn't attend,") she was at her station with another client, one whom she seemed to be very friendly with. Lest we forget the time I had a wedding and had to wait 2 hours for a stylist (one which I didn't even book) to start working on my updo--- which was apparently impossible. 3 different stylists tried to do a simple braid before 1 finally got it done. and when i got my makeup done, i told the artist i wanted a nude lip colour... she put dark red. i kindly asked her to change it and she gave me major attitude and said it looked good. I'm just beyond turned off. I'm sure many people have had great experiences, but I've been very unhappy with the neglectful service. Screw up my appointment once, shame on you. Screw it up at least 5 times, peace out. 2 1 
Tonight was the first time I have ever walked out of a restaurant because the food was taking so long.  After waiting an hour, numerous tables received orders ahead of us who had arrived after we were seated.  Manager did not show up to talk with us after waiter said he would. We have eaten here many times and enjoyed the food. This might be our last visit.  Management showed no interest in even talking to us. 2 1 
I think it's too expensive for the type of food served. I've been there a couple of time and food is ok. Service is good and I guess it takes the usual time time prepare food as any other Mexican restaurant. Not bad for the family. 2 3 
This was my second time eating Ethiopian food and my friend recommended this place. We shared three main dishes amongst the three of us. I enjoyed having a taste of all the food but I felt that I was mostly filled up on oil and not substance. Also there wasn't much difference between the dishes; a few stood out though it got tiring at the end. I did enjoy the bread though; it was nice and moist with a little bit of sour taste. (like sourdough bread?)Service wasn't very good as we waited a long time for water, ordering and the bill. The tablecloths are also pretty gross since there's leftover food other people spilled all over it.It was a good experience for trying new foods but I'd rather go somewhere else to fill up and leave a smaller dent in my wallet. 2 3 
They have some delicious mulitas!!! I've been coming here for over a decade and the last 2 times I had bad experience . The first time was they but way too much ice on my raspado and charged me extra for additional fruit and they didn't put the extra fruit . Btw everything is expensive here which I don't mind paying . I came another time after that and the pineapple was bitter, the mango was old and squishy and the strawberries were sour , I am so disappointed . Their raspado game is weak now . So I will be looking for a new raspado place . But I will still keep coming for the food 2 3 
We're not going back for a long time.  There was crap, bits of food and paper, of one sort or another under the tables that we could see from sitting on the patio.  The tables weren't all that clean.  Our waitress dropped my salad order on the ground and cleaned up only half of it.  She left the rest there until half way through the meal when she came back to our table to refill our waters and I pointed it out to her.  She cleaned up so little of what was still on the floor that when we left, I put my napkin down on the mess she couldn't be bothered to clean up so that we wouldn't step in it on our way out.  They weren't busy this evening; she certainly had the time to clean the floor.  Cleanliness isn't a priority on the patio; it makes one wonder what the kitchen is like.  Not cleaning up her spill lacked courtesy and was just a bit of an insult.  The food was just meh. 2 1 
Went here to see what the hype what about this place, I wasn't that great like I thought it would be. Their cupcakes were okay, just way too much frosting which made it too sweet. However, they do have a variety of different flavors to choose from but they just need to lay off the frosting a tad bit. 2 3 
I ordered chicken fingers, bacon cheese fries & a oreo cookie shake. The delivery took 1 hr & 45 minutes. The food was cold & the fingers were over cooked. The shake was described as a custard ice cream shake but it tasted like crushed ice-milk with that consistency too. If thats a  custard milkshake, which I have eaten, then im a blonde lol...On the plus side was that they put a lot of bacon on the bacon cheese fries. But, thats about it. Needless to say, im never ordering from this place again. 2 1 
I don't understand what all the fuss is about. They're oversized, overpriced sloppy donuts. Nothing new or fancy. Just a fad. 2 1 
This was my first experience eating Ethiopian food.  It was a fun communal experience as our dinner club ate with our hands getting food from the center of the table.  We ordered the combination platter to sample a variety of food which I enjoyed.  My friend had the Ethiopian wine which had a smell that I wasn't use to, but was different to me.  Service was fine and the waitress was friendly.  She educated us on what to order.  I did notice a roach in the bathroom crawling on the sink. I hope they exterminate.  The place is in an old strip mall that doesn't look like the most visually appealing area near the strip, but its a hidden ethnic joint for Las Vegas foodies. 2 3 
My wife and I have been a member of the gym for over 4 years.  While the freeweight area is nice, the powered equipment has gone way downhill over the last 6-8 months.  3 of 4 bikes do not turn on/work at all.  3 of 6 treadmills don't turn on, the 3 that do may or may not incline, and every single treadmill has a ripped seam in the tread, some are to the point of posing the potential of tripping.  1 of 3 ellipticals are out of order and the one that remains is a machine that most avoid after giving it a try, it's just not a good machine.  It's frustrating to know that the $90 per month isn't being used to repair the equipment that is the reason for our membership.  Yes, most of the machines are outdated - but at this point I would be pleased just to have them be functional.I would email the owner but they have no website or email listed anywhere, and when we are there in the off-hours it's just an hourly employee using facebook behind the desk. 2 1 
Found the staff to be rather rude, maybe they are just used to dealing with unsavory people when it comes to complimentary drinks and gaming at the bar. Maybe they are burnt out and need young blood and energy behind their bars. We moved to a little bar across the street next to a liquor store that had some cheap drinks and good bartenders. A real dive, but if you like dives this one is a great find considering the location.   Then made out way to the Cromwell. 2 3 
I am debating 1 or 2 stars.... I am not a very picky person - it doesn't take much to make me happy. However, I have had my car cleaned at various Danny's and I am honestly never happy. The job is less than average, but sometimes I just want a cleaner car, quick and easy. There are always spots missed, sometimes I take time to point them out and they get addressed, other times, I just want to be on my way. Today we got "The Works". The guy said our window was chipped and if we signed up to get it replaced through them, today's wash would be free. We declined and noted that there were no chips. I always detest the window repair piece.... They didn't do much of a vacuum job and didn't bother to clean out the cup holders. I pulled the Dyson out to the garage and did it myself when I returned home, on Mother's Day. I also cleaned out the cup holders and retreated the leather seats. $15.99 for what they did and 30 minutes more of my own labor, it looks nice now. 2 1 
I used to come frequently until one day the food became inedible. Today, after more than a year, I decided to give it another try. Warm pop, inedible taboule salad and ok shawarma. 2 1 
Decent pho place. A little skimpy on the meat (only about 3-4 beef balls in my large). 2 3 
Feeney's used to be a wonderful restaurant.  However, I have not enjoyed the last 3 meals I received there.  You should get more than 4 shrimp in the shrimp scampi for the price, there is simply something wrong with the cheese on the pasta, and the I had to throw away the last steak because it was just fat.  Hopefully, things will improve in the future. 2 3 
Food *** - Service *** - Ambience ****Fairly mediocre food. Their curries are palatable but no matter what curry you off of their menu, they all taste the same. At $10 a curry, and for that portion size, they are fairly over priced. The ambience and staff are ok. Restaurant is quite clean.I would go back here if I had no other options. 2 3 
Rooms were acceptable, great pools, good restaurants.  The valets and servers in the pool areas were great. However, the service and the attitudes of the concierges and housekeepers at this JW made me a lifetime Hilton customer. 2 3 
This hotel was actually fairly nice for being so cheap. The rooms were clean and they have a free continental breakfast. I would have given this place 4 stars but their free wifi was broken and they've charged my credit cars 4 times now for this room. I understand that mix ups happen when charging hotel rooms, so I placed a call to the front desk to clear this up. The front desk clerk basically went psycho on phone screaming at me he can't help me. Didn't offer to take down my phone number and have me called back, just went straight to screaming as soon as I explained my situation. So now I'm dealing with their corporate office and my bank. Super 8 is a franchise, so there's not much their corporate offices can do to help even though they can view the transaction history and that I've been charged 4 times for the same room. What a headache! I would have saved myself a bunch of stress by staying at the Hilton Garden Inn for $25 more 2 3 
Food was good the service on the other hand was terrible. Upon arriving we did get greeted and seated. However, we had to get the two servers attention to take our order. When we told one of the ladies we are ready to order she gave us attitude. When she brought our drinks over she just slammed it on the table and didn't even give us any straws. Now to the food. We ordered the beef soup dumpling, beef dumpling, house fried rice, deep fried squid, and duck. All were delicious! You can tell that the dumpling are made fresh. Overall, I would of gave this place a better review if the service wasn't bad. 2 3 
Ehh. Ok. Nice looking spot, but the entrees left something to be desired. Bar was full, but would be a good spot to just drink. 2 3 
I hate this airport!! The security lines are consistently the worst I've ever experienced.  They have TWO tsa lines for the ENTIRE airport.  That's right, TWO!  I once missed a flight because it took me 45 minutes to get through.  And the parking is terrible, too.  The lots are usually near full, forcing me to plan an extra half hour just for parking and walking.  And the tram is such a pain...they are understandable in larger airports, but PIT can find a way around it.  I fly out of Cleveland whenever possible.  They have security lines for each airline, parking is WAY easier, and the airport is much quicker and easier to navigate. 2 1 
I decided to try this Salon based on the reviews and I was disappointed. The salon was very nice inside and clean.  However I was disappointed in my stylist who I felt had no idea what she was doing.  I went in for a simple trim and my hair came out uneven.  I also noticed they l'oreal hair products, that doesn't exactly scream high class salon to me. 2 3 
Christmas Eve / Morning. Only place open in town. Understaffed, extremely slow service. The ladies room smells of sick so profusely that it can be smelled strongly in the vestibule. The hostess is oblivious as to why they are so busy (not even half full). One egg over cooked and the other under. 2 1 
I walked around the building 3 times before figuring out the entrance was in the back. Then figuring out where to order was a challenge as there are 2 areas that look like they could be ordering stations. Terrible service. The people that work there have an attitude. I ordered a coffee with whipped cream. They put maybe less than a tablespoon on top. So I asked for more. The woman looked at me and disappeared. I assumed she was getting more whip, she comes back and calls my name for my coffee. I'm already standing in front of her and I ask again for more and she leaves again this time comes back with the whip and puts less than a teaspoon on. Needless to say the whip was amazing but why be stingey with it?! The coffee tasted watered down. 2 1 
Seemed completely over staffed. While that's fine, someone in that staff should be competent, associates seem fine, but even manager/lead seemed incompetent. Employees should be trained better, and that does not exclude the manager. Don't tell customers false information, if you don't know, just admit it. 2 1 
Beer = good. Sliders = burnt meat nuggets on cold stale bread. Nice servers. Nice atmosphere. 2 3 
The views are fabulous down at Harbourfront and this place tops it when it comes to views.  We waited 15-20 min on a Sat which isn't bad. But they sat us at a really dirty (filthy) table. They came to clean it but it was still dirty. We moved inside. The menu is rather simple. Very very little in terms of vegetarian or vegan options. Add a gluten free or vegan option and this place would come up a notch. Coffee selections poor. Bathrooms not quite up to what they should be. Staff friendly. We preferred the IL fornello by far.  This place could be great and I hope they give attention to a few finer details. Some of the nicest summer views in the city! 2 3 
I don't get it regarding the Lamars reputation. The donuts are so average. The coffee is nothing special either. It may sound snobby but I have high standards because I have had donuts from bakeries in New York. Now those are a real treat to look forward to. I'm glad LaMar's has their fans but I will not be going back.I'm done trying them and each time hoping it will be better than the last visit. The Bell and 23rd Ave location is clean and comfortable. The service is friendly. I don't care for the twenty something music playing overhead and it is too loud. 2 3 
First time ordering from this location...and most likely my last. This review is based on the delivery and customer service, not the food. I use to deliver pizza when I was younger (before everyone had GPS on there phone) and if I was lost, I either called my boss or the customer to get directions so I could get there on time...no excuses for a cold pizza nowadays in my opinion. Well, to start things out...the driver took an hour and 20 minutes to deliver, didn't have my credit card receipt, then wanted to copy down my whole credit card number! I wasn't ok with that...(I started calling the store to confirm that policy and then she changed her story and said she only needed the last 4 digits!) and to top it off...she didn't even have a pen for me to sign her delivery receipt! So I was left with a cold pizza, cold chicken poppers, no receipt for my transaction and a bad taste in my mouth about Papa John's. I use to love this pizza, but today made me reconsider that. There's way too many choices in pizza to have to put up with this kind of service. I called the store after the driver left and the manager was apologetic and offered a free pizza on my next order but it didn't make up for the fact that my dinner was ruined. I gave it two stars because I'm sure the food would have been fine had it been hot. Customer service can make or break a business. I hope they figure that out soon over there. 2 1 
Not just noodles!  Stomach discomfort and gas that could kill a small child, too! (presumably from the greasy, MSG-laden food). 2 1 
It's been a long time since I have been here and now I remember why. Seriously the food is just not good. Items missing on the dish, rotting vegetables in the salad. There was no seasoning in the pasta. There was not one spring of fresh herbs anywhere.  Not worth the money. 2 1 
First time here. Walked into the restaurant and half the tables I saw were piled with dirty dished with half eaten food on them (I have no idea how long they've been sitting there for). Waited 10minutes for servers to clean a table for us to sit. They used a dirty cloth to clean the table with!! I know this because the table smelt horrible after!! This definetly made me lose my apetite. I had to call the server 3 times to take down my order cause evertime i said "excuse me" she would brush me off and say "wait a moment" then go to the back to chat with her friends. (what the hell?!") After the third time i was finally able to order, but had to wait another 30minutes for the food!! Service was sooooo SLOW!When i got my food, I tasted the curry and I thought it was okay but was really chunky compared to other places I've had. I know malaysian curry and this was definetly not worth a 45min drive to try. I dont think I'll be going back. The only thing i really really enjoyed was the Coconut Shrimp. 2 1 
Stayed here because it's one of the lesser expensive places on the strip.We booked online a couple of months in advance.  When we go to check in (which was a zoo, but the lines moved along fairly quickly) we were told that the room was paid for but that they needed our credit card for the $8 resort fee (!!!!??)  I knew some of the resorts had fees but it said so on their site!  I never saw anything about a resort fee when we booked so that ticked me off.  We were famished by the time we got in (flew in from oakland) and had met up with some friends so we went over to Rock & Ritas for a bite to eat.  Decent margaritas, food was so so, definitely not worth what they charged for it, but it was ok.  Checked into our room. I was pleased to find that it had a large bathroom, but our view was terrible.  We were on the 3rd floor of the Skyrise Tower and had a view of the roof.  Meh, get what you pay for I spose.  The bed was surprisingly comfy, but smelled slightly of cigarettes.  Thanks to the very loud A/C, I didn't get but 2 hours of sleep that night.  Only blew air about 30% of the time and it wasn't even cold air so our room was not only noisy, but muggy the entire night.  We tried turning it off but then it got even hotter so we just dealt with the noise. (not good when I had to fly home and be to work the next day!)The Adventuredome was not what I remembered it 10 years ago during my first trip to Vegas.  The sign said open til midnight and we got there around 4 and when we went to get the wristbands we were told they were only open until 6 and if we wanted to stay til midnight it's an extra $10 (some sort of halloween fest).  We said forget it and used our free ride coupons we got upon checkin to ride the rollercoaster and left. The midway was the typical Circus Circus midway, with the games and shows.  I was disappointed to see that the carousel bar was out of service.We didn't gamble here (we went down the strip) so I can't review their games.For the price and how little we stayed in the rooms it was ok.  I will definitly try other places next time I'm in town. 2 3 
Wasn't thrilled with the place! Very hard to find. And no lasagna!!  What the heck. We won't be back. 2 1 
Came here for lunch excited for some bbq. Saw the reviews and thought I was worth a shot. Ordered the wing and onion rings as an app. The wings were great with good flavor and no extra fat. The blue cheese was so watered down I ate the wings without it. The onion rings were good but nothing extra special.My fiancee ordered the pulled pork plater with Mac and cheese and baked beans. The pulled pork was cold with no flavor. The sweet bbq sauce we added on was watered down with now spice. The hot bbq sauce wasn't hot at all and again no flavor. The mac and cheese was more like soup and feel like they forgot to bake it. It was very bland and needed tons of salt to even eat. The baked beans also had zero flavor but had large pieces of pork in them. Wish they were warm and had salt because it had potential. Overall we were not impressed with the bbq and would recommend going to Mac's instead. I would come back for the wings but even then I would take them home and use my own blue cheese. 2 3 
Wanted BBQ. low-and-behold two joints right next to eat other. The only reason we chose Rudy's was because it was busier, we assumed because it was better of the two....Scanned the restaurant; picnic tables, clean and open. OK., awesome I can bring my toddler and not worry about her ruining other peoples' meals.Greeted right away by a lady at the "country store". She asked us if have been before which we hadn't, I replied that we needed help (I have a20mo and a 4mo infant in a carrier). She came over to show us the menu, the line to place our orders and let us know that the cashier can give us samples of the meats. Fan-frickin-tabulous.We figured out our order then went to the counter. ALL DOWNHILL FROM HERE. Miss boring-as-all-get-out brunette. She didn't even look at us. HELLooooo.She wasn't even up at the register, but back about a foot. I asked if they had a kid's menu, she mumbled something incoherent. What??? So 2 registers down was a young man so we passed on miss head in the clouds. As we head to the other register the cashier left. ARGGGGGG! Back to the brunette.I start the order..... turkey sandwich and brisket sandwich..... to which she yells back and a man starts carving. Sandwiches were brought FAST. Then we ordered potato salad (get it yourself from the fridge), corn and new potatoes. She turns and gets the corn and potatoes, meanwhile my sandwiches are getting cold. COLD.She tap-types on her register and then says our total. Excuse me, can I order drinks????? Her bubbly reply (add sarcasm) "oh yeah".We grab napkins and a table, apply the bbq sauce and dig in..... to ice COLD meat sandwiches.Quick back track to the menu...NO KID's MENU?No mac and cheese?No fries?No cornbread?No green beans?No salad?The goodTurkey was moist and had a good flavor, would have been excellent if warm.Husband said brisket was really really good, but cold.The bad-Sause sucks, worse sauce I ever tasted. Like water and pepper. They have 2 sauces and both taste the same. One has a ton of pepper, the other has more.-Potato salad, really is potato salad so difficult?-Corn was soggy and had no flavor.-Red potatoes (called NEW POTATOES here) are water logged gross.The ugly-Napkins on the other side of the restaurant in a dispenser on the wall (bathroom 3-fold paper towel dispenser).-STYROFOAM- THE DEVIL OF THE PLANET.One star for the country store greeting gal.One star for the turkey.I'll be back for the turkey and a soda, skip the sides and bring my own sauce. 2 3 
I tried Thai House after having recently returning from a trip to San Antonio where I was forced to go to a Thai place for lunch.  It was a highly recommended place and I loved it.  I immediately thought "when I return home I am going to Thai House to try it."I had high expectations that this would be a great place, but after one visit my expectations are much lower.  I ordered Tom Yum soup and the Spicy Basil Chicken.Tom Yum soup was tasty and I did enjoy that.  If I had the taste for just that soup, I would order it again.  The Spicy Basil Chicken (same dish I ordered in San Antonio) was not good at all.  It was listed as a "spicy" dish, so to find it bland when it it supposed to be spicy was a major disappointment.  There was also too much of it pilled onto the plate.  You need room to move the food around to let it cool from just being cooked but to also give you room to separate and eat what you like and see the food.I may try other menu items again sometime, but I wouldn't go out of my way to eat here again, would have a backup plan, and would not recommend this to anyone. 2 3 
A few of us went here for lunch on a Friday and while the food was very good the service was very slow and inattentive.   I had the Blue Petit Mignon and the portion size was just right for lunch. 2 3 
I've been wanting to try this restaurant for a while now and finally made it out for Arizona Restaurant Week. Unfortunately I did not have a good experience. The waiter my partner and I had was so unattentive. After we were seated we had to specifically ask for the restaurant week menus since they weren't provided to us to make sure we were only charged the special price for Restaurant Week. Not once throughout our entire meal did our waiter come by to refill our drinks and we were never offered a bread basket that all of our surrounding tables were provided by other waiters. It took forever to get our food while parties that were seated after us were receiving their meals before us. We both ordered the pina colada cake dessert it took over twenty minutes for us to receive our cake slices. Food was okay, service was horrible. 2 1 
??????????????????...?? ?? ?? ??????????????? ???????? ?????????? ...????? ????????? (???)?????????????  ???????????????????? ????????????????? ??????..  ???????????????????????????????????? ????????????????  VEGAS?????  ???????????????????????????  ???????????????????????????????????????  ??????????????VEGAS?????OK ????? 2 4 
Avoid at all costs if you are coming here for food. Coming from a mexican household, my dad was disgraced by what they call authentic Mexican cuisine. I got the steak tacos that were dry and bland, while my sister got a burrito that was cold dry and tasteless, you could tell that the meat they use is frozen. My dad got enchiladas that were a soggy depressing mess. Will not return unless they fix the food quality. 2 1 
I went to Queen Margherita as a corporate outing and was very excited to try out this pizza spot (HUGE PIZZA LOVER). I was starving and still had quite a few people to wait for before ordering so I asked the male waiter if there were any appetizers available as there weren't any on the menu. Very rudely he snaps at me and says "let me tell you how this menu works so you understand!" .. I was taken back by this as to me it was a simple question. He then points to a chalk board BEHIND ME and explains the prix fix menu with the choice of appetizers on the chalk board.. BEHIND ME... As if I can see behind me or even know the chalk board is a menu. I then asked for water, and I had asked for a straw.. Apparently that is too much since he snarled at me "YOU NEED A STRAW FOR YOUR WATER?!" .. I thought yes, that's why I asked for one but simply replied "yes, please." By this time I was still very hungry and not impressed with this location but it was a corporate event and the option of leaving was not realistic. Aside from the unnecessary attitude the food was really good and I absolutely loved the Vegetarian Pizza. The Citrus Salad they offered at the time was incredible and the Caramel Funnel Cake as dessert.. opted for Ice cream with it (additional 3$) which was half a scoop.. no point in asking the staff for anything else since they were unpleasant. Nonetheless the food was really good and I recommend you order ice cream with your funnel cake.. wasn't as pleasant when the half scoop was gone.. When it came to the bill, our waitress started to complain to my manager that she's been waiting on tables all day and is too "crazy" and the system is "too much" for her to separate the bills when this was requested at reservations.. All in all I just wish I had a better experience at this location since I love pizza, the food was incredible and the environment was indeed cozy. Because of this horrible service I probably won't return nor send people I know there. Food good, service unacceptable. 2 1 
Definitely has the cheapest fruits and vegetables you will find in the valley. Only problem, is that most are within a day or two of rotting. I'll pass.  I find price matching Food City or Sunflower prices at Walmart is a much better deal overall. 2 3 
I have been to the Strip location of the Pittsburgh Popcorn Company and I would give that location 4.5 stars. Today I ran into the Oakland location which I hadn't visited prior. When I entered the location was a mess. It looked like behind the counter had not been cleaned in a while. I am assuming that this was because of the business of the location, but the Strip location appears to be much cleaner. I purchased two bags, one of the chocolate caramel and the rice krispy. Both were good. My only concern about the product itself was my bag of rice krispy was had other types of popcorn in it. When I ordered rice krispy, I wasn't hoping to get cheddar or dill pickle. I would suggest that if only is coming to Pittsburgh Popcorn Company for the first time, go to the Strip location. I 2 3 
Arrived to check in for a reserved room at 9:00 pm in September. AC was not on in the room so the room temperature was 89 degrees. Called front desk to get bedding for the sleeper sofa for our kids and were told that we would have to come down to the front desk to get the bedding. Really inconvenient when you check in to a room expecting it ready so you can put children to bed. 2 1 
Why oh why can these people not make a latte that takes 6 layers of skin off your tongue? Seriously people, hot drinks should be just that. HOT. Not lukewarm by the time I've made the 5 minute dash through the Path back to work! 2 3 
I noticed that the shopping carts seem to be smaller than other Fry's? Not a single person that worked there acknowledged me other than the check out lady who seemed very unhappy with her job. Won't be coming here again unless it's an emergency. 2 1 
Prepare to wait. They blame everything on other companies, they don't keep in contact to keep the customer updated. Waited twice as long as a friend who went solar with another company! 2 1 
Have driven by this place several times and finally decided to give it a try.  Got a hamburger with cheese, clive style toppings with jalapenos and onion.  Quite honestly I've had better burgers, was expecting a juicy burger but the patty was thin and well blah.  Did order fries though and must admit it was the best part of the meal.  Also ordered a chocolate milkshake, it was good but not good enough to be $5 bucks. 2 3 
The room was large and luxurious but I would rate it low due to the following reasons:They force you to pay a resort fee which is only disclosed after you book and provide your cc on their website. You cannot not pay even if you don't use the services offered.Secondly this place is not kid friendly at all, to get to the room one has to walk the whole    building. Also due to the free alcohol offered there are very rowdy people all around, we found a few on the elevator, that were using very filthy language and talking inappropriately for a public place. 2 1 
nice restaurant, all you can eat but it is not a buffet so you have to order.  Foods are good however, the rolls are very big.  only 3 pieces will make you full already.  you can't enjoy much if they make too big. 2 3 
Lack of attention to detail.  Called them to replace a Wayne Dalton garage door opener that that no longer is in production. They were not able to service it, ok, I understand it's an aged opener.My issue starts with the quoting process that happened on site.  Was quoted on a brand name garage door opener and was told that it was wireless so there would be no need to bury the line in the walls.  Also was quoted a price on a 7' door, when in actuality it's an 8' door, (I have a tape measure if you needed to borrow it). As well as told that it connects to the internet so that a smart phone can be used to open door remotely.Day of installation, find out that it's an 8' door so there is an up charge for additional rail. As for the wireless, that was a false statement as there is now a wire stapled diagonally across the ceiling.  The standard wire is also only x number of feet long, so now the open button is not near the interior door.....but 18 feet from the interior door where the existing wireless button was located.  Lastly, the internet connectivity mentioned would come with an additional purchase of hardware so is not native to the garage door opener itself.At the end of the day it was a low ball quote to win the business with none of the proposed features delivered.  I didn't stay in the garage to micromanage installation so the end result was a lack luster completed job.There has to be a better service out there. Should have went with the referral from a friend instead of the manufacturer's contractor. 2 1 
This place is like an old flame. You know why you swore to never go back but you end up returning because, while not good, it's also not totally horrible. The service is meh, the food is edible, and the prices are decent but there's really nothing that keeps me coming back except for the fact that it's close, so its got that going for it. 2 3 
I go there for breakfast sometimes, but the last couple of times they've not had the muffins to make their breakfast sandwiches, which is odd because I go into work earlier than most.  Location is near the Clinic, so I imagine it would attract a lot of customers, but whoever is running this place seems to have no interest in actually managing the place.  There's a Burger King nearby and you can just go there. 2 3 
I started going to LA Fitness a few years ago when they bought out Ballys.  The only reason I keep going there is because I have a low rate locked in.  I've been to 2 other locations in Pittsburgh (North Hills and East Liberty) and this is definitely my least favorite.  The equipment is nice and they will validate your parking in the garages--I can't really think of anything else positive.  The gym is packed with college age kids. I have no idea why they choose to pay $35 a month here instead of going to the free university gym.   The first floor smells OK.  Try to breathe through your mouth if you're on the 2nd floor in the summer.  The locker rooms are pretty dirty and usually packed.    If you're not comfortable around  crowds definitely stay away in peak hours.  LA Fitness corporate really pushes their sales people  to keep their gyms at maximum capacity.  They know how cheap Pittsburghers are so they will deal with it.   I also would advise some noise-canceling headphones because the music (Katy Perry, Bruno Mars, etc.) is really loud.  It's not a terrible place, but they do deserve all these bad reviews. 2 3 
I really expected something more refined. The entrance is so grand with its own elevator and lobby area. They use universal wine glasses for water glasses, which I found quite off. I ordered the flat iron steak special, it was bland. Thankfully there was bacon on the side to the rescue  my husband ordered the lamb sausage hash. It very tasty but wasn't balanced. They sausage was overwhelming and needed more potatoes to level the dish. The brio he bread was really good. For some reason, the waitrons have table cloths wrapped around their waist. Service was just like their food, bland, nothing special. If you want a fancy breakfast with good food, go to tableau at the Wynn. 2 3 
I didn't know whether it would be fair to review THEhotel when they were ambushed by hordes of pre-teens attending back-to-back One Direction concerts. Being surrounded by "I love 1D" and "1D 4 Lyfe" shirts would be enough to drive anyone batty. So, I've tried my best to take these extenuating circumstances into account when thinking about my recent stay there.I hate to say that the first (bad) thing that hits you right as you step into the lobby is this...stench (which a previous reviewer delicately coined "STANK"). Now I know that a lot of Vegas hotels like to perfume their lobbies, but this took it to a whole other level. A friend summed it up best as "sewage mixed with cheap air freshener to cover the sewage". Another thing we encountered was a 1+ hour check-in line. Never have I had to deal with such a wait, anywhere - the line was at a standstill for most of the time. Now whether you work at a grocery store, a movie theatre, or a hotel, if you see a long line of customers growing steadily...wouldn't you call for reinforcements to help expedite? No? Maybe it's just me.The rooms were fine, and more spacious than what you get at a lot of other hotels. Each room has a separate bedroom and living area, a large washroom and a smaller powder room. However (and this may be the handiwork of the One Directioners), THEhotel was woefully understaffed and lacking supplies the weekend we were there. Not once were we able to get in touch with the front desk for anything. They also ran out of extra bedding, meaning the poor soul sleeping on the sofa had to use bathrobes and towels as blankets. One huge selling point of the Mandalay Bay / THEhotel complex is the huge pool area, complete with wave pool and lazy river. I suspect this is what gives it a much more "kid-friendly" vibe than other hotels, as there was very few adults-only areas available. That being said, I was happy to note that even on such a busy weekend, there were still empty chairs to be had and easy access to the bar, free water, and food. If given the choice, I definitely would not stay here again - unless I had kids. It wasn't the worst, but I'd rather stay at the Palazzo, Venetian, Wynn, or Encore any day, or Paris, MGM or Planet Hollywood for comparable pricing. 2 1 
Wow, one must seriously wonder why Britney Spears or Nicky Hilton or the likes of them would want to hang out here? Perhaps celebs get better treatment or perhaps this is a new spot? The space was not much of an expansion from the previous Ra Club although they changed the entrance walkway and we were certainly not wow'ed by the interior or the music. For a Thurs evening with a rather full crowd, the DJ was playing old Usher, Michael Jackson and Madonna's Like a Virgin. We were glad not to have to pay the cover charge since we had free passes, thank gawd! Certainly not impressed, perhaps it's better on Fridays or Saturdays but I would certainly check out Mix or Pure or Tryst which are supposedly some hotter clubs... 2 3 
Have been to the Garage twice now and they are batting 1 for 2.   Went there on a Saturday for lunch and the food and service was excellent.  I had the pulled pork sandwich with sweet potatoe fries which was original for pulled pork served on a pizza crust bun.  My girlfriend had the buffalo chicken salad which was really good, grilled chicken in buffalo sauce on top of baby greens.  Excellent beer selection.Went there on a Friday for happy hour and got there a little before 6, there was a 30 min wait for a indoor table or immediate seating on the patio, so we decided to sit on the patio.  Hostess sat us and said a server will be by shortly, normal procedure.  About 10 minutes later no server had come by and the hostess returned and asked us if we ave been helped yet, we said no so the hostess said she will get someone.  Another 10 minutes and no server.  It wasn't busy on the patio about 5 tables occupied, all with food and drink.  We decided that they must not want our business, so we went next door to Sushi Eye.Will try again, just won't sit on the patio. 2 4 
Fun but most games are 2.00 dollars to play and hard to win anything but penny toys with tickets. 2 3 
Happened to walk past this place and thought we'd give it try after seeing the beautiful patio. My boyfriend and I each had a margarita and split queso. It took FOREVER for someone to take our drink order. Once our food and drinks arrived we didn't see our waiter again for another 45 minutes. When he dropped off our check it took nearly 20 minutes for him to pick it back up (we timed it). Our incredibly mediocre food cost over $40. I can't imagine the cost or time it would have taken if we ordered a full meal. An absolutely underwhelming experience. 2 1 
Overall: Unless I was in the area, I wouldn't go out of my way to go back. Service: Our food took a while to arrive but they all came around the same time. Food: I liked the dosa and curries. My mango lassi was room temperature. 2 3 
Food was relatively tasteless, some was served cold, some overcooked so it was tough. I won't be back. 2 1 
Teriyaki chicken tasted like rubber. Water tasted like kerosene. Very expensive for a buffet..more expensive than Golden Corral.. and mostly seafood. 2 1 
We had a terrible experience at smelly dog. We take our dog to get groomed regularly. This was our first time trying smelly dog and they completely butchered our dog. We have specific directions for how we would like her to groomed. They said it would not be a problem. When we returned to pick up our dog she was groomed in a completely different manner than we requested. The woman at the front desk said she "didn't think the groomer cut her as we requested." When we asked for the groomer to fix it they refused. I am absolutely disappointed that groomer refused to cut her as we had asked. Not to mention the total cost was 100 dollars. Needless to say this was not a good experience and wouldn't recommend anyone taking their beloved dog there to be groomed. I do have to add that when we contacted management about the grooming the management did refund us out money. And therefore I am change the rating from one star to two stars. 2 1 
I must say that I'm disappointed with Alexander Michael's. For the most part, each time I've dined there I've enjoyed the food. I'm a huge fan of the veggie burger and fries, and the prices are reasonable. The space is great, and I adore the 4th Ward neighborhood. In fact, I live there. That said, I've been consistently underwhelmed with the quality of service that Al Mike's delivers to its patrons. On a couple of occasions I've felt as though the server did not really care much about my dining experience. As an example, recently I went with a friend who explained to the server that she was gluten intolerant and order the GF pasta. Despite that, her pasta came with two slices of bread on top. To me, that seems like something that should have been considered, and if it was an honest mistake, that would have been ok. However, the server acted as though it was preposterous that she asked for another plate. She was extremely disrespectful despite the fact that my party was respectful towards her. I really want to like and enjoy this spot and I think the food is great, but the experience of eating out is 100 percent framed by your service and on a couple of occasions it's been subpar to horrible at Al Mike's. 2 3 
Never again.  I went to get a massage to relax- the place was so noisy- what with the reception radio coming thru the walls, a car idling below with hip hop coming thru the window and two ladies who worked there- talked in rapid-fire foreign language outside the door for up to 10 minutes at the top of their lungs- I know it wasn't urgent- cause they laughed in between their non stop talking- so it was pure discourtesy to be doing that outside a door of someone getting a massage.  The receptionist seemed like she never smiled in her life and the masseuse seemed bored and was either too hard or too soft.  Plus there was a heater in the room but she didn't turn it on so it was drafty.  The area of town was all high traffic and concrete and hard to read the number signs so I had to drive around a bit to find it- the oppositte of the relaxing treat I sought to find.  I don''t recommend. 2 1 
Just joined this gym a week ago...not impressed at all. The one in Scottsdale seemed to be ran a lot better when I was going to that one. I've come here every day, the spray bottles to wipe the machines and weights have been missing twice, this is unacceptable. I don't pay a fee to come use a machine covered in someone else's sweat. I can understand if a bottle needs to be refilled but to have NO way to clean the machines is unprofessional. I know I would never recommend this gym to anyone else.  I cannot wait until I move...I hope the Walnut Creek location is better than this Tempe one!! They got a star for being open and another for air conditioning. Not much else here. 2 1 
My wedding, the BIG day that I have waited 33 years to say YES to.  My soon to be sister in law introduced me to Kaira's as she had bought her dress here - she raved about it and on first visit we were thrilled!  I found my dress, the price was right and I was a happy bride.The owner was polite and helped me with everything on my first visit, she let me know my dress could be "rushed" to come in three months from then and told me the day to call to follow up.  When I called on them on the designated day I was informed my dress was slated to come in AFTER my wedding and to their credit it was an error and was resolved verbally about 48 hours later.My fitting was a disaster - when I originally tried on the dress I had requested changes be made with the owner (a new sleeve) and she informed me it was "no problem" only when it came time to make the changes it was a problem - the sleeve was never ordered and it was apparently my fault.  After being told it was "very expensive" by the owner (again) it was resolved when I told her plainly that this was what I wanted, spare no expense and let's make it happen.Today I went to pick up my dress - I was so happy! The seamstress who did the alterations is FANTASTIC!  I was simply delighted.  After thinking my balance was pain in full (over $1300 which was reasonable in my mind) an associate asked me if I had PURCHASED a garment bag to take the dress home in!  As a former pageant girl this was so obnoxious that they would not include a $10 bag with a $1300 dress?  Even better - if there is an extra charge let your bride know in the beginning - after all was said and done I ran my credit card THREE TIMES!The resolve I have is that I have my wedding dress, it is splendid although I would save myself the headache and NEVER shop there again. 2 5 
The mall is just ok, typical mall stores. They are doing some remodeling which helps, but our biggest complaint is the only sit down restaurant is pretty much Johnny Rockets which needs a serious visit from the health department. Very sad for being the only mall on the west side. 2 3 
Well since my last visit I must say without Joe behind the service counter the place is changed for the worse Joe is a great guy to work with and it seems to me understands people's problems a lot more than the guys that are at buddy Stubbs service counter now. FYI Joe now works at Chester's Harley Davidson they will get my business. 2 5 
Scenery is very nice food not so nice ordered bacon wasnt fully cooked ordered toast wasnt toasted ordered sliced tomatoes w basil got a little cup with mostly juice and a few tomato cubes in a cup about 1 oz no basil and unseasoned eggs. maybe just an off day for the cook hopefully it will b bettet next time. 2 3 
Alrighty...so I'm Vietnamese and for me to give a high rating for Vietnamese restaurant is a mighty challenge in itself.If I end my meal with out drinking all the broth (for Pho) or throwing back the shot of fish sauce then it's not high on my list.  This place is close to home and we didn't feel like putting on our kevlar to head over to my fav Vietnamese restaurant. Got seated right away, but took a bit for our order to be taken.  I make it a point to order in Vietnamese with hopes they prep the dish with a little bit more of an authentic touch.  Call me crazy but that's how my mind works. For the food, we ordered the lemon grass pork on rice which came with two spring rolls and fried egg.  One large pho sate chicken and also one large pho sate beef.The rice dish, is ok.  I don't know how to explain it, nothing stood out to me and screamed eat me!  It wasn't bad, just ok..The pho sate, I honestly believe they just used the regular broth and added the sate hot sauce to it afterwards and in my humble option that's a no no.  I love pho sate when the broth is specifically made with the intent to be sate, my absolute fav is the sate that has a strong peanut flavour to it.  Unfortunately this wasn't that.Again it was alright.  Next time I get a craving from the motherland, I'll make the trek across town.Oh, and no complementary hot tea, what!? 2 4 
Food was not good.  I had the bacon, eggs and pancakes.  Bacon was cheap.  Eggs were disgusting. Pancakes were bad.   Wife had steak and eggs.  Both were gross.  Also, waiter was in attentive and rude.  Last time I come to place.  Something positive. 2 1 
Today was the first time i went there. The food was special. The crust of the crepe was crunchy, the dressing of the salad was too thick. The service was really disappointing. 2 3 
Had a great waitress and is not to blame for a poorly run restaurant.  We've been here before and love the food. Food still good when you finally get it. When we entered restaurant we were told there would be a 15 minute wait. There were empty tables but they didn't have wait staff to service them. Our service was very slow and we got our entree before the salad. Granted there could be problems but why put it on the wait staff to explain everything.  Where's the manager? Will not return. Lots of other options in Surprise now for Italian. 2 3 
Saw an outdoor concert there this weekend and had a decent experience. Only recommendation would be for AE stage to have their staff clear the outdoor trash cans. They were overflowing beyond belief and trash ended up all in the walk way - so gross. Additionally - because of the las vegas incident last week - once we were inside on the grass - we looked for all the "exits". Nothing was marked anywhere in sight. Please fix this asap!!!! 2 3 
Four friends and myself ate at Alloy for my Birthday dinner last night and I must say I was not overly impressed. The decor is unique and the atmosphere was cool but that just does not make up for average food at an above average price. If it were not for the food I think I would give this place a 4! But in the end that is what tells the real story for me. We all tried a different starter, main and we shared a few salads so I can certainly say I gave it a fair chance. Service was friendly but did not seem overly knowledgeable, no food descriptions or desire created,Dish presentation was quite nice, Food was sub par, I kept expecting to be wowed by one of the 12 + dishes we ordered but in the end the candle burnt out and we were left with a hefty bill and disappointed taste buds. I may go back when the patio is open on a nice day to give it one more shot but that will be long after I try several other places on the bookmark list including some repeats to places like The Muse and Rouge where I would gladly spend my time and money :) 2 3 
We went here for lunch and I ordered the veal parm . I sent it back cause it was a veal pattie that had been deep fried . No bueno . So instead I had a corned beef sandwich which wasn't bad , a little dry but better then the veal . The fries were good and so was the gravy I poured over them . 2 3 
highly disappointed....not by the quality of the food, but by the accuracy. i ordered spicy fried rice w/ chicken to go. how one would mistaken "noodles" for "fried rice" i have no idea, but for the price, i'd at least expect my order to be accurate. strike 1. fyi, i never give places a chance for strike 3. hope the next time they get my order right. 2 1 
Avoid this place if you can. Although you can find a pretty good gelati the rest of the fair is pretty crap. The coffee is terrible and the service is complete crap. I tried it a few times and it stayed crap. 2 1 
This is a family owned business. They are nice people except for the mother who kicked us out badly once because we brought our small Yorkie inside. She was not even polite about it. But we never see her too much anymore. Prices are definitely cheaper But a lot of vitamins are on sale once they are very close to expiry or expired already! I don't like that. Another thing is that the food in the bins - nuts, granola etc are never fresh. Evergreen natural foods on roncesvalles is more expensive but definitely more fresh. But the naturopathic doctor here is helpful. But I wish she would ask if I had pre-existing conditions before recommending anything. Because I did buy something that I later found out is not good for people with autoimmune conditions. 2 3 
Had dinner here and nothing really special compared to Louisiana buffets.  King crab and snow crab are on the menu but they are served cold and almost frozen.  Louisiana casino buffets actually steam their crabs which I believe taste better.  Everything else on the buffet was just nasty or below standards in taste.  If it wasn't for the crabs, I'd give this place a 1 star.Seems like all Vegas buffets suffer from the same disease, they are large in square footage but small in selections and high in price.  They are built for flash. 2 1 
Food was awful and overpriced. Carpaccio was smothered in mayo and inedible. Tomatoes in Caprese salad were pale and not flavorful. Fries were pale and flaccid. So disappointed as I support Lakewood businesses. Loved its former incarnation, Players. Second time I've been to Sarnitas and most likely will not return. 2 1 
very disappointing I ordered xlarge pizza for $10.99 I got a large 8 pieces is a large .greasy pizza ! won't go back. 2 1 
We purchased a groupon for dinner.  We got married there several years ago and felt it was a great way to revisit.  We were so disappointed!  The view was spectacular as well as the mansion but our food was mediocre for such a nice place.  We were sat by the wine closet and were interrupted numerous times.  Clearly there was available tables we could have otherwise dined at.  When our coffee came at the end of dinner it was cold and had been sitting for quite awhile.  We WON'T be back for the food. :( 2 1 
I was really excited to go here, as it has been hyped up time and time again by my friends.  This is why I am so shocked at how bad the food ended up being.  Something must have happened that has caused this place to go downhill.  Lobster pasta appetizer - This was very bland, very mediocre.  Not a terrible dish, but not what I would expect at this caliber of restaurant.Branzino - Fish with Chicken Pate and Baguette.  This was the weirdest dish I may have ever had.  The fish itself came out mostly whole and was dry and bland and not seasoned.  There was no sauce, yet it had a huge loaf of bread broken in half and laid on top of the fish.  Then, for no apparent reason, there was a scoop of dry chicken pate on the side.  Three dry items and no sauce, liquid, or flavoring.  Hands down the most disappointing dish ever ordered at what is supposed to be an upscale/modern restaurant.  Hanger Steak - The hanger steak itself was cooked a little more rare than the medium rare that we ordered, but no big deal.  It was a good cut of meat, but again very bland.  Could've used SOME salt.  There were some vegetables on the plate that were overcooked, under-seasoned, and uninspiring.  Desert - Chocolate cake with banana puree and ice cream.  This was a tiny little cake, just the right amount for a desert if you ask me, but was so boring that four people didn't even bother finishing the dish.All in all - I can't believe for a place with salt in the title, how under seasoned and bland everything was.   I am giving two stars for the atmosphere - it is a beautiful restaurant.  Given that the reviews have dropped off over time, I hope that the owners and staff can reclaim the magic that they'd once apparently had at this place.  I am holding out hope! 2 1 
my first time in value v. i like to help a cause so i don't mind shopping but what to buy??? i was shocked by their clothing prices, all smelly, dirty my fingers got sticky from dirt, 35 bucks for a non-brand torn garment??? yucki bought vases for my plants nothing else was in a buy-able condition, i would never dress my kid from here, holes and stains in the clothes, if target and walmart so cheap then why not buy new, the toys were extremely dirty or broken, they sold kids chairs for the same price you buy new and they were black from years of filth!!! i also saw they were selling a 15 yr old OLD and USED ELECTRIC SHAVER omg, full of germs, would you use it on your skin and risk infection??? 2 1 
Ordered two pizzas from here recently.  Not my taste, overly greasy and layered with salty garlic butter. I enjoy the simple taste of pizza and prefer not to have a layer of fat and salt overpower everything else. Crust also soft and droopy. 2 3 
-----------------------------

I wanted to find a good place to do some work on a sunny Sunday afternoon and I hadn't intended on coming here because there was no free wifi. But, there was space and the menu was student-budget friendly.I only ordered a regular cup of coffee and a cheese scone. The scone was big but not particularly cheesy. The coffee wasn't particularly aromatic but you get refills for $1. They also have a special discount for students.But if you're not the kind of person who can work in noisy places, I suggest you go somewhere else. I'd recommend this place if you want a place for brunch. It was 4:00PM  in the afternoon and the place was packed with people still ordering eggs and toast. Cheap and lively, I see this place as being dependable but it's not the best cafe for studying.Apparently their cakes are to die for but, as a miserly student, I didn't have the stomach to dish out $6 for cake. 3 2 
Just tired their churros today and they were pretty great! The caramel filling was an unexpected by pleasant surprise. 3 4 
Pretty good Mexican sit down restaurant. More on the Americanized side but still flavorful and tasty. I like that authentic Mexican food better though. 3 4 
Not great. Been here twice and not impressed. The crust of the pizza is unusually chewy and I always find hard pieces hidden in the dough. The Margarita pizza is bland. There are 3 better pizza places in the area. 3 2 
Same menu as the other 4 bars. If you know that you know what to expect. A little on the pricy side but some of it is worth it. 3 4 
Dined here for Restaurant Week, Spring 2017.Gigli - fresh pasta, but nothing special. There isn't anything wrong with simple, but the flavors in this dish did not really stand out. This seemed like fresh pasta with canned sauce.Mushroom 'Pasta' - the flavors did not settle into the mushrooms. Overall, bland.Tiramisu - solid flavorsSangria was too plain, martini was very strong (which was of course, absolutely fine).Veal meatballs were juicy, but were not very flavorfulOut of the whole experience, I enjoyed the polenta and tiramisu the most.Two star food experience, Five star service experience. 3 2 
I think I have been spoiled in that I have eaten in some amazing Mexican food eateries, so I had little to no expectations for Quesada. Upon entering the restaurant, I noticed that it looks like Mucho Burrito or Baja Fresh (in the States). A quick look over the menu board, I settled on a large burrito with grilled chicken filling. Choices are numerous, but not overwhelming in terms of combinations as some places can be. Unfortunately, there was no beef/steak offering as they were out - how this happens, I have no idea but it clearly disappointed a couple of guys in line ahead of me.The counter service was quick and friendly. Burrito was assembled with toppings as I requested from a good selection. There are a variety of sauces and salsas to choose from as well. Once wrapped, there is the option to have your selection toasted. I opted for that and took my order to go - I was in and out of Quesada, burrito in hand in about 15 minutes. The seating area, it should be noted, is bright and has a decent number of chairs and tables.So what about the burrito? Was it any good? I arrived at my home, a short drive away, and chowed down. Rice and chicken paired with a medium salsa was nice. I skipped the beans and guacamole, but added lettuce, tomato, and some cheese which tasted fresh. The large size is about all I needed, so I am glad I did not go one size up.Give it a try. It may not be my favourite place, but I definitely will go again. 3 2 
I have to start by saying I have been going to Southwest Contemporary Women's care for over 5 years now. I have had fantastic experiences with the Nurse Practitioners & MDs. My concerns are more for the triage nurse line. Throughout the week I have had to call multiple times due to various reasons. I have had amazing nurses that are compassionate & helpful. There was one bad experience where the nurse told me she would call me back after she spoke with the Doctor. After waiting 2 and a half hours, I decided to follow up. By the time I got a follow up call, she said to me "You just need to be patient". This nurse was not compassionate or empathetic to any of my concerns. This was my 3rd time calling this week due to various problems, and I understand the frustration. I was just as frustrated having to go through it. I just feel like there is a better way to go about customer service, especially in the health care field. 3 2 
We don't go to Koi often. But we know the sushi is safe and usually good. My only complaint is that they automatically add gratuity to everyone's tab. I don't know how they can legally do that. The service is ok. Sometimes you get a decent personable sushi chef, sometimes you don't. Sometimes you get a friendly server, sometimes you don't. We love their sushi tho... Spicy tuna, spicy philly roll, spider roll and some of the State named rolls. 3 4 
food was okay, but waaaaaay over priced!!!!!!! i like their fried chicken and pancakes, just wish they were a little bit cheaper! 3 2 
This was a pretty nice property. They did a great job with their interior landscaping and interior decorating.  rooms felt clean, sheets were crisp, white and clean.  Bed was fluffy with a pillow top.Did a late night check in at about 1am... the gal that checked us in looked like she was half asleep... very little conversation came out of her... so little that she never asked us if we wanted one king or two doubles!  checked into our room, and ended up with two doubles... we were so tired that we didn't even bother going back to the desk to change rooms... Valet parked the car, they allow you to call the valet desk to have your car pulled up to the front in 10-15min.  Pretty nice, no waiting needed. 3 4 
We love our leather loveseat and sofa that we purchased from sofa mart.The problem was the costomer service and the fact that it took 6 week longer than expected (we were quoted 2-3 weeks for delivery... it arrived 81/2 weeks later).  In this time of wait and waiting for our furniture there was no communication from sofa mart, I had to constantly call for updates, to which our salesman Micheal was no help what so ever.Would only get furniture from there if it was in stock or you can take it with you. 3 2 
I've heard there are big plans for this place. But it is still in its early days. Nice community, well kept grounds, and quiet. Your drive to the Vineyards makes you wonder if you are in the right place because you mostly see small homes and trailers, some are not taken care of. Then as you arrive at the Vineyards, the surroundings change and you find perfect landscaping, new homes, and neighborhoods that seem family ready. I was only a visitor here, but I think this would be a great place to live in a few years. 3 4 
My cup of fish chowder was weird. There were little bits of stuff that seemed like chopped bits of meat, no idea what kind of fish. It was a flop. My Margherita flatbread was excellent. My wife's beef Stroganoff was ok. I was put off by the high wine prices and the lack of prices for beer and mixed drinks. 3 2 
Last few deliveries the quality has been dropping :( our pouting last night had watery gravy with no taste. It was no thicker than a soup. Very disappointed this is the 3rd time the quality has not been great.  Please Nikas get your act together. 3 1 
I think the product is good maybe not the best  but for the money it's very good. The website is very good for downloads for new and even really old products. If you ever have to deal with customer service live, they are the worst. Save yourself grief and use the website and do not call the company, they are really really bad when trying to deal live 3 1 
Realistically, 2.5 stars...If you just need your standard shirts and slacks (no premium fabrics) cleaned quickly and cheaply, this is your place.  My husband has had several of these types of items cleaned here with no problem.However, if you're looking to get something more delicate cleaned, I wouldn't recommend this place.  I wanted to get a couple of dresses cleaned, but one has a little bit of beadwork and one is strapless and has that rubbery/plastic lining on the inside.  In both cases, the attendant said that I would need to sign off on a no-liability clause in the event that the beads broke off or the rubber/plastic melted.  Ummm... huh?  I've never had to do that to get these particular dresses cleaned at other cleaners.  No thanks!  I'm not taking any chances.  I'll go elsewhere to get them done properly and with no damage. 3 2 
I stumbled upon this place with my brother and his fiancee after a lengthy time at a studio without dinner. My stomach was ready for some action. And like any other Canadian, I love me some poutine. I'm not from Quebec but I've had poutine in Montreal. And as such, I consider myself to be quite the expert on poutine. Alright, not really but I'm not just reviewing this based on a comparison between Smoke's Poutinerie. We walked in welcomed by blasting music. It was almost like I was a captive terrorist in for questioning. Anyway, I ordered. It took several times for the person to hear my order. I almost took out paper and a black marker (or went postal on their sound system). Nonetheless, the order was taken and I was that much closer to "The Works". I get weak in the knees for any menu item that has bacon.Sat down on one of their tree stumps (I love the look of the place). But I was slightly underwhelmed. The cheese was, as all the cheese curd aficionados say, "squeaky".  Fries were great. The bacon was... bacon (in other words: perfection. I mean, if a place messes up something like bacon I think they should seriously rethink living). The gravy is what made this poutine sub-par for me. Well, maybe "sub-par" is pushing it, but it certainly isn't fantastic. I've had better poutine gravy at Toronto Pearson International Airport. Please don't hit me. Anyway, bottom line: it was good. Not fantastic, but I'd go there again. 3 4 
We came here during spring break, so it was crowded and we waited about 1/2 an hour. We got seated and our orders were promptly taken. The staff is super nice! They were smiley and friendly. But our food was just okay.My dad ordered a dish that was supposed to come with peppers and onions and a bunch of stuff (maybe a burrito or something, I can't remember). What he got was fine, but later that night he realized it definitely didn't include all that the menu had described. I had a "special order", I asked for just tortillas on the side, and chicken and onions. When I got my food I had tomatoes mixed in with my chicken and onions... it wasn't a big deal, they were small pieces, but still... I thought it would be easy since I'd specified. Besides that though, my food was lukewarm and the foil-wrapped tortillas weren't even hot. My mom's food just didn't show up at first. Apparently they had some issue in the kitchen or something... the waitress acted quickly and the food came a few minutes later, so the issue was resolved. The best part of the meal, in my opinion, was the warm tortilla chips they serve. Chips and salsa, yum yum! Overall though, the food was okay, some of it was warm, some of it wasn't... nothing special about it though. Just a good dinner. Average. 3 2 
Pretty solid burgers for late night snacks,but also killer breakfast.Eggs benny is the way to go.Lil' pricey but once you start eating you have zero f**** to give. 3 4 
We just saw Marmalade Skies play here last night.  We showed up early to grab one of the last tables. Fans of the band showed up in full-force. It was SRO early in their set. They sounded great ! The service, however, was below par. It seemed as if the place wasn't  prepared for the crowd that the band would bring in, even though the band played there about a month ago! We ended up waiting for the server to check on us more than once while we sat with water & drinks completely drained. If we hadn't been there specifically for the band, it's very likely we would have gone some where else. No condiments brought out for the sliders. No small plates brought out with the nachos deluxe which were nothing special. The sides of ranch we ordered didn't arrive either. The fries that came with the Real Deal Philly Rib Eye were soggy. Their Wings are the reason for 3 stars. I had the Honey Hot  wings grilled and they were DELICIOUS! 3 2 
I really want to give a higher rating because the food is great, but I've had my Just Eat delivery order cancelled by them twice. It really sucks when you're starving and stuck at work and you find out the burrito you ordered isn't coming. Yesterday I was willing to pay over $18 (including delivery fee, HST, and tip) just for one burrito. I was that desperate for a meal at work that wasn't pizza. But alas, no burrito for me. Why be on Just Eat at all if you're just going to cancel the orders? 3 2 
I've been to the Location on the strip at the former Imperial Palace now called the Linq, and was excited that new location opened up around my area. The food was amazing as per usual, BUT The service was terrible! It looked like they only had one server covering six tables which is tough and I get it but you gotta keep your cool. The waitress comes up to us and asks us if we are ready to order and we we told her no since we were waiting for our third person to show up and she yells THANK GOD, and walks away to oversee her other tables. I'm like I get you're all by yourself and busy but lady keep your feelings to yourself and check it at the door. The entire experience was annoying she later on rushed us to get our orders and our third person showed up and was rushing her to get her order. To the point she drops off our food and not even 10 minutes later she drops off the check! We open to check out our total and put the check book down to continue eating, it felt like a minute later she comes to our table and opens our checkbook to see if we put our form of payment like I'm like excuse me ? And she just walks away. In the end I love the food which is why I'm giving this place 3 stars, but management really needs to evaluate how their servers act and retrain them on how to offer customer service. 3 2 
Average food, especially for the higher prices. View was really nice, though. Wouldn't recommend to someone looking to eat on My. Washington though. 3 2 
Eh, what can I say? I had the pesto chicken fettuccine and my company had gotten the lasagna. I did not get to try the lasagna because it had sausage in it and I don't eat pork. They said that they would give it 2 stars. However for my dish I would give the same, it was pretty bland. They had no salt and pepper at the table so I couldn't have fixed it. I took it to-go to fix it later. I also got the cannoli, I've had better. They added like cinnamon to their cream, not like what I'm used to in Little Italy in Boston, MA. 3 2 
Our server was on top of it, the food was good, and I liked the old timey ambiance of 40's music and black and white movies.  However, we waited an hour for our food with a 9 month pregnant woman and a toddler in our group and battled fruit flies from start to finish.  This would have been 5 stars without the wait and the flies. 3 4 
ordered dry yellow noodles w/ BBQ pork and it turned out to be pretty good, just that the sauce was a bit on the salty side otherwise it would be perfect (came with a side of soup which was nice). noodles were perfectly cooked with a good amount of crunchiness and they also gave a handful of it so it really was worth the money!also decided to try the sour sop (some tropical fruit) milkshake and it was sooo good! the flavour of the fruit was a sweet/sour taste soo it was pretty interesting. they just needed to put less ice in it next time because i couldn't drink it through a straw and instead had to use a pho spoon to scoop it out of the cup haha. 3 4 
Just okay. Fish and chips...fish was a big soggy.  Same as always happens for me: I ordered a beer (Guiness Blonde) from their very limited menu (to what I'm accustomed to at the Flying Saucer in Columbia, SC)...only to find that they were out of it.  Same thing happened in the TK Charlotte with regular Guiness.  Really?!?Nice, big TVs all over the place, but not a one in sight with the big CBS game-Georgia/Florida. Disappointing. Went back to my hotel room to watch football, instead. 3 2 
I wasn't planning on posting a review for my visit to Heart Sushi cause I just wanted to chill out and not take pictures of every plate or pay close attention to everything. However, I'm posting entirely for the poor service we received from one particular waitress who waited on us during our entire visit. Extremely pushy and trying to get us to leave even though we were at least 45 minutes before closing time to prepare for dinner. Her attitude toward us was noticeable and unnecessary. When she brought our items out, she would place them on the table in front of her and slide them towards us. When it came time for dessert, we almost got thrown off of ordering anything because as we gave her our ice cream order, she would repeat them back in a rude tone and one of my friends asked for three scoops of mango ice cream and she said in a loud voice, "THREE?!?"  Finally, when she brought out our desserts she said something along the lines of, "that's everything you ordered, you don't have anything else on the iPad to order so you're all done."....lol I mean it was just rude. Sad to say I left very annoyed but what can ya do. Otherwise the food was fine, sushi quality was better than some but not as good as others so it was mediocre. 3 1 
I'll give it a 3 of a 5 because they are always out of sizes and store is a mess , hard to find stuff, we love old navy but have to do most my shopping online to find stuff 3 4 
Knocking off two stars right off the bat:minus 1 star for the cheesy Venetian gondola rides/gondoliers/canals, blue sky fresco (sprinkler heads and all), human statue, and other assorted eye-rolling faux Venetian touches. Sure, I know that's why it's called The Venetian and it's all part of the sugary syrup that draws the huddled masses to Vegas...it's just not for me...I tend to lean towards authenticity. minus 1 star for mall stores like Banana Republic, Kenneth Cole, Brookstone, and Ann Taylor. I'm surprised I didn't see a Spencer's Gifts selling black light posters of St. Marks. I guess The Bellagio nabbed all the good high-end designers (Gucci, Armani, Chanel, Hermes, etc). The 2 stars go to their choice of celeb chef restaurants - Batali's B&B and recently opened Enoteca San Marco (with truly impressive wine lists)...Keller's Bouchon (same killer steak frites, breads & pastries)...David Burke...Puck's Postrio...and um, Chef Buddha's TAO (like the one in NYC, tasty and forgettable). And the last star goes to Breathe, an oxygen bar that did wonders for my hangover. 3 2 
With $1.00 Icees (cherry, coke or mixed) and .50 cent vanilla ice cream cones, this is a great place to treat children to something "special."  The indoor play area is clean and never crowded.  BK also offers veggie burgers but make sure to ask them to hold the mayo if you do not want your sandwich swimming in it. 3 4 
Made the mistake of eating breakfast out on a Saturday. Morning....quite a long wait in the heat. Quite a small table for 2, crammed in. OJ was fresh squeezed as promised, was 20 more minutes before our pancakes and eggs arrived, nothing out of the ordinary, coffees ok. Have had better elsewhere. 3 2 
A group of us went to this dinner show last weekend.  While it is not a Cirque Du Soleil show, it was a lot of fun.  The food was okay - it is not a gourmet meal - but it is fine considering the price also includes the show.  We enjoyed it. 3 4 
Although the pizza was good, the owner had terrible customer relation skills.  We grew up on Theresa's pizza and we were looking forward to enjoying it for a family get-to-gether.  We enjoyed 3 large pizzas.  As 1 family member finished her last piece, she pulled a long blond hair from between the sauce and cheese.  Since there was a large group, she did not want to make a big deal out of it. She simply stopped eating. I was sitting next to her and I told her we called the next day.  We spoke with a manager who said nothing but that she would have the owner call us.  When the owner called us, we explained and he gave no response.  I waited, still no response.  Finally I asked him if he heard me.  He said yes.  Finally, I asked him if he would remove the cost of the 1 pizza as it was obviously a bit gross. He said he didn't understand the whole situation. I explained again.  He was speechless.  We were expecting, "We are sorry for your experience, but we appreciate your business."  We thought we would hear, "Thank you for being loyal customers,"  He could have given us credit for 1 pizza or offered another pizza for another time or a 1/2 off coupon.....nothing.  We had even told him we enjoyed the pizza, however, I think most people would agree that pulling out a 12 inch strand of hair from between the sauce and cheese, is a bit disgusting.  The funny think is, we are reasonable people and understand things like a hair in food may happen, but no apology, no simple discount off a future order (I had told him my parents eat their almost weekly. Is unacceptable. 3 1 
Located right outside Villa-Maria metro station, Quartier-Perse is a persian restaurant with many available seating. I was there on a Saturday night with ten friends celebrating. I was told by the organizer that she could not get a reservation because no one had answered the phone. Thus, she had to get there early so that we got a big table. When I first looked at the menu, I noticed that we only had two major selections: kebabs and stews. I ordered the lamb shank stew myself. We were first served sliced up pita bread with butter. Next, our lentil soup came. It was chunky with lentils, beans, barley, and spices. Even with this many ingredients, the soup itself was bland, but a bit of salt and pepper fixed it. Next, my lamb shank came.  I was first surprised as they served me the shank whole still on the bone separate from my rice. The lamb itself was fall off the bone tasty. The rice was cooked perfectly. The sauce, however, was again, slightly bland. I think the stew would have been improved by adding some vegetables to enhance the flavour, but perhasp that would no longer be an authentic persian dish. According to my friends, the kebabs were alright. To finish off the meal, they served us tea.Overall, portion size were large, and many of my friends did not finish their meal. However, I thought it was slightly pricey. If the food was just slightly better, maybe it would have warranted the price. Service overall was friendly, and we were so comfortable around them. 3 2 
The owner is v.friendly. Taste of food average. We took chicken shawrma platter. Portion of chicken was too small in it & owner forgot to add pita. So the point is check your order if you want to take away. 3 2 
It was ok. The items were well organized. Thought it was expensive in relation to what they were offering.  Purchased 4 items for $67.Not sure how close the clothes are looked over before BUFFALO purchases them. While trying on clothes, I discovered set-in stains on two pieces of clothes & one  item had an unrepairable rip. Use caution before purchasing. 3 2 
It's a great concept, and a cute restaurant, but the food is really fast-food at sit-down prices.  I had a burger, and it was incredibly dry (and I never even tasted the cheese).  The fries, onion rings, and shakes were great, but given the cost, they better have been!We tried to sit outside, and the instant we brought our food out, we were absolutely swarmed by flies - so we gave up, and went inside. 3 2 
Was torn between 2 and 3.  Caught the last of the breakfast buffet which was ok (nothing special, pretty limited variety) and the start of lunch - which was awful.  Not going again and I love me a breakfast buffet. 3 2 
The ramen was not too bad and gyoza was pretty goodThe rest was a disappointmentWe ordered the Brussels sprout tempura and it smelled funkyCould be the oil or the batterThe jinya bun tasted ok, bun was not fluffy enough and saggy, and the braised pork didn't have enough fat in it would have been betterNobody came to ask how the meal was so I didn't provide any feedback right there and thenBut here it isMaybe they had just opened up only one week, possibly needs some time to iron out the kinks 3 2 
I got bumped from my flight and the airline company sent me to a hotel with vouchers for the cab.  My ride to the hotel was fine, great even.  My return to the airport was not a pleasant experience.  The cab driver I got kept looking at the voucher like he'd never seen it before.  He then complained that it didn't include any tip or gratuity.  Um, I got stranded in Las Vegas with no cash and you want a tip?  So before he could pull out of the hotel parking lot, I left and took my voucher to use with a different driver.  The guy was a jerk.  The hotel got me a second Desert Cab, and this new driver was cool.  He understood my predicament, and when he dropped me off the only tip I could give him was a coupon book full of casino freebies and discounts, which he appreciated.  So bottom line is that you never know what kind of driver you will get.  If you don't like the driver you end up with, get the taxi ID #, driver name and anything else that you want and complain.  And if you get a good driver, let them know.  The driver I got that treated me right was Marvin.  That other guy?  Forget it, his name isn't worth the space. 3 1 
I used to think they had the best tonkotsu ramen in Arizona but lately something changed. It's not as good as before. The soup tastes weaker and the meat is harder and tastes different. Also, miso soup should never come out by its self for Japanese food. 3 2 
If I could give it a half star more I would. The food was great! Just took a long time to come out. As we first walked in there was a pungent odor of either sulfur or sewage? Maybe they forgot to empty the grease trap I don't know. After a while it went away. We started with the artichoke, awesome! My wife had scallops which she said were very respectable. I had the Alfredo with shrimp, very tasty. This place isn't a two dollar sign place. Out bill was over 100 for two people. A lot of people might be enjoying the happy hour and lunch which are reasonable. Going to dinner here ordering entrees will bring your bill high but if you stick to cheese plates and bruschetta you will probably be happy 3 1 
Mallards games are pretty incredible for as small as they are. There are a lot of handouts as they try to advertise and there are plenty of food options. The between innings and seating sections are also pretty cool. This is a pretty good place to bring a date to if she is into baseball also. 3 4 
I have mixed feelings about this dental office. I am a full-time traveler and was in need of a basic cleaning and check-up while staying in Mesa.  Based on the reviews here, I made an appointment and was pleased to hear that they have a new patient special for $69. I thought that would be perfect.  They took extensive x-rays and pictures of my teeth and checked the pocket depth of my gums. The hygienist  seemed very competent.  Based on my gum health, she recommended a serious "deep cleaning" that would cost about $400.  Then she fell back to saying a full mouth debridement should be enough, so I went with that.  What I got was pretty much a standard plaque removal and cleaning using an ultrasound tool, no different in time and effort than previous standard cleanings I've had.  So I feel that I was somewhat "bait-and-switched" into paying more for a standard cleaning and exam (about $200) than was presented. I don't doubt that they do good work in this office but I don't feel that their new patient special is totally aboveboard.  Oh, and I left the appointment with a $3,000 treatment plan to replace three crowns that do appear to be starting to have issues, but I made it clear to the office from the beginning that I did not live in the area and would not be able to come back for any work. They are a bit aggressive in generating business, so go in with your eyes open. 3 2 
I like this place. Prior to my East Coast Foodies event there, I had never been to Pita Jungle. Everyone has said how amazing they are. So, when I found out that they have happy hour, I set up an event and off us foodies went.My fellow foodies enjoyed $2.00 beers, and $4.00 glasses of wine ( I believe) and the happy hour food menu was great! I really enjoyed my falafel, side of lentils/brown rice, and carmelized cauliflower! What a filling and healthy meal.I will go back very soon for happy hour.Love,The East Coast Foodie 3 4 
Pizza was okay,  I've had it cooked there, and I've taken it home to cook myself, I do appreciate the high quality ingredients.  However, the service is very slow, and the people who I've encountered working there are very young and unprofessional.  It's the little things like having very personal conversations within earshot of the customers, and wearing shorts so short you can see their bottoms hanging out, hair is not tied back, long fake nails...  Not really the people who I want to prepare my food.  I won't personally go back again, but I wouldn't stop a friend from trying it. 3 2 
Had dinner here during.my stay. The waiters and waitstaff were a little everywhere. But the seafood platter was amazing. So delicious and good.selection. I also had the curry cauliflower soup and it was so flavorful. The shitios peppers were also delicious. I was disappointed with the beef wellington, for something they are.known for it lacked.flavor and was just ok. During my stay I also are at Craft Steak and it was so much better than Gordon's. 3 4 
Came here with a Groupon and I dunno if the food quality is different.  Was given a special menu to pose from 8 different teas.  The teas were good.  But was never offered additional water to top up my teapot. Food was substandard even with Groupon price.  I found the food to be creative  the taste and quality is seriously lacking.  2 star for food 1 star for the service. 3 2 
Meh. I've never met a stone crab I didn't like...until tonight everything on the menu tasted half-frozen even though we are in stone crab season. Best dish of the night was the crispy brussel sprouts. Now when you're at Joe's this should be considered a problem. Staff was nice enough but i came here to get my seasonal stone crab on, not to discuss why Vegas doesn't sell powerball tickets. Anyhow. I've finally solved the mystery. The reason why this is not up to par with Joe's is this is NOT Joe's. They license the name and use the same vendors. Think Donald Trump and how his name was licensed up the yazoo a decade ago...when he was bankrupt. Not during the current Presidential campaign. Yup. 3 stars is generous for this evening's meal. 3 2 
So, my husband and I earned a free meal at this restaurant after playing the slot machine and decided to try it out. Initally when we first entered the place, there was no hostess and no one acknowledged that we were there, we waited about 5 minutes. Once we were seated, it took the waiter about 10 minutes to come to our table. We ordered an appetizer and our food at the same time, it took about 20 minutes for the appetizer to come out and our food took an additional 20 minutes to come out. When we first arrived it was close to 3pm and it was not busy. The waiter never refilled our drinks or checked if we needed anything. After asking for the dessert menu, it took 10 minutes for us to receive that and once we asked for the bill, it took an additional 10-15 minutes. People that came in after us received their food and service faster than we did. This may have to do with us having a free meal or some other reason. The food we actually did enjoy but don't think we will be returning to this restaurant. 3 1 
It's not real hawaii poke. Totally different! It's just salad like Hawaii poke stlyle. Just Good salad. 3 4 
I wish I could write a 5 star review as I see the potential in Christa's business. I came across her through facebook where she was running a special on eyelash extensions. I texted her and she booked me an appointment within 24 hours. Now most people can certainly appreciate a next day appointment, however you may become less excited if you are seen almost 45 minutes after your set time. I would not have minded being scheduled for another day as long as I would be seen at the time I was given. I was not offered an apology or anything of the like. I'm not big on first impressions but I do expect a certain level of professionalism or at least common courtesy as a new client. I was not informed in any manner that she was running late and I had another appointment right after her. When I was taken into the room she took about 10 minutes to set up (not bad at all) but then the lack of professionalism again became an issue. She was having a full on conversation about her boyfriend with her co-worker. This while her co-worker was working on a client of her own as well. Now this is is a small area where you are seen. The size of the room is a bit smaller than a doctor's exam room. There are two massage tables in there and one is for clients getting their eyebrows done and the other is for Christa's eyelash clients. I did not experience any pain whatsoever, was very relieved at how swiftly she worked and was pleased with my results. I was just uncomfortable that she would refer about other clients in a tasteless manner. For example, telling her co-worker how she was "annoyed" and how "some clients don't get it" when asking for certain results. Then the comments made about how she needed to be satisfied sexually or she would not be wasting her time. So that went on for about 40 minutes or so. I paid $65 for the service and gave her a $12 tip. Needless to say I had to cancel my appointment after her on short notice. Even with that incident, I decided to schedule with her again to have my eyelashes filled. I was yet again given an appointment within 24 hours of contacting her. However. . . I show up and to my surprise was not seen on time yet AGAIN! I waited in the lobby for 45 minutes hoping that she may text me to let me know she was late, on her way or still working on a client. Anything! I mean any reason at all, I would not have minded waiting the full hour if I was guaranteed to be seen. I texted her that I had left right outside of the parking lot hoping she may offer another time to return to make up the wait. Nope, not at all. I found her work ethic to be dubious. She is good at what she does, but needs to work on her customer service skills. Just awful! If she thinks she's to good to respond or contact her clients for resolution on such matters imagine if her business were to grow to an actual salon. Whew!! I mean don't double book if you can't keep up, maintain your private conversations for your lunch break and sweet baby jeebus keep your clients informed of any changes that will directly affect them. Our time is just as valuable too you know, thanks! 3 stars overall, 0 for customer service. 3 2 
As a pizza enthusiast, I was really looking forward to trying the trendy flavors this restaurant offers. Unfortunately, the pizza fell somewhat short in comparison to other pizza venues around town. Not only was the pizza a little pricy, but I felt as though it lacked the unique flavors described on the menu. On a different note, the service was absolutely wonderful. Our waiter was constantly checking up on us and even gave us free drinks when someone from outside accidentally threw a cigarette butt into my water glass. 3 2 
We have been going here since we moved to Gilbert in 2004 and while they aren't as good as they were then, and they have lots more competition than they used to, Teaks still does pretty darn good.  We have even used them for catering a couple times and it was awesome!They have some interesting items like the Alamo Chipotle Burger, Open the Hatch and Candlestick Carver as well as great wings and new food specials daily.  Prices are similar to all the others but more original food than the chains.Don't forget the free peanuts whose shells are simply dumped on the floor.Did I mention GREAT service and a lot of choices for your favorite beverage. Ans lots of TVs for your sports viewing pleasure.  You get a big mix in the crowd from old time Gilbert cowboys, families, couples and sports teams. 3 4 
I've been to this location so often over the years they should name a seat after me. The food used to be good, now is just "okay". Same with the waitress staff.. at least as of 6 months ago. I got tired of the "old-bag" routine from a couple of them and haven't been back. (they sure showed me) I think there should be an age, or at least attitude limit.. seriously. Like the Beachwood location, they need to cut the old grumpy wood.Also, it'd be nice to see "healthier" breakfast alternatives. And no I don't mean Tofu and bean curd. Like organic eggs, real butter, decent fruit, avocado, etc.Place used to be "fun". Friendly (and kinda HOT) waitresses, decent (and HOT) food, nice location. Anymore it's just "blah". They need to go back to basics.And open the freaking blinds already! Egads let some light in that place. It's like they're vampires in there. Heck, maybe they ARE! 3 2 
Staff was nice, it was packed, and there was good music, but our actual hookah was supposed to be margarita flavored, and it came with no taste, I was with two friends, so we ordered three hoses, mine didn't work, so I asked a staff member to fix it, and they tried but it still continued to not work. Finally right before we left, the people who were cramped up next to us fixed my hose, and I still had to pay full price, which was kind of expensive. This place isn't too bad, it has potential, I'll be back. 3 2 
First of all great guys. Nathan always does a great job and is very personable and friendly. I'm a little disappointed this go around with my RV sealing. Quality is great but somehow the pricing went up from $15 to $20 per foot. This is the third time I've used them and they do nice work. Taking my price from $450 to $600 however may cause me to shop around next time. 3 4 
Was craving Molcajete and decided to try this place. It was alright I guess. The beef was overcooked and tough. The salsa it was in was mediocre. Service was less than satisfactory also. 3 2 
this is the place i've been wanting to back in years! i remember coming here when i was a wee kid but never got the chance to go back. i have somewhat a vague memory of this place serving the BEST dry yellow/rice noodles with oyster sauce (i think in vietnamese it's called Mi/Hu Tieu Kho) excuse my bad spelling. So just the other day, i decided to head back and try it again and what i found out was that this is the ONLY place that serves up dry yellow AND rice noodles in the same bowl! Other vietnamese restaurants only give you the option of choosing one or the other. I ordered my noodles and when they arrived, i was very excited! Digging into the bowl was like digging into my childhood memory and it tasted great! Surprisingly, it was soo good that i was the first to finish eating. The soup on the other hand i wasn't able to finsh cause it was too saltly for my taste (as you can tell i'm not a big fan of salty foods 1. it can cause high blood pressure, 2. high sodium intake is not good for your health, 3. too much salt often covers up the taste of food)But going back to the point, i thought the food was delish! and i would have ordered another bowl but i was already full so i didnt. Probably nex time i'll order only the yellow noodles cause the rice noodles were a bit soft and soggy but the sauce was just right which i really enjoyed. atmosphere i would say is a bit dingy and may require some renovations but aside from that i thought it was great. 3 2 
This is our second visit to Mexico Lindo. We came when it first opened years back.We ordered the calamari, but they don't have it today? So we are going with the shrimp at the suggestion of our server. The shrimp is our appetizer, I am having Chimichanga and hubby having the tacos for our main course.The shrimps are delicious! They come with bread that is basically garlic bread, I think plain bread would be better. Big jumbo shrimps in a little bit spicy sauce, very good!Our main courses were good also. 3 4 
Justine has an amazing eye and is a very talented photographer...I will admit that! Unfortunately, I think my experience with her may not be the norm for all of her clients but I was very disappointed with the lack of service through the ordering process. I received my proofs, placed my order and made payment within 24 hours....very excited to receive my photos and then came the wait....longer than expected, received no responses to my emails and I finally had to place a hold on my payment to get her attention.Not what I call a good experience and unfortunately won't use her again because of it. However, the photos she did take that I did end up eventually getting are beautiful. I think she had bit off more than she could chew with the Groupon deal she participated in.It's too bad...I was really looking for a new photographer! 3 2 
The vibe in this place is unwelcoming. The service was bad because most of the workers acted like they didn't want to be there. They don't portion it right and they give you attitude when you ask for anything different. The food was alright. 3 2 
honestly chef? I was expecting so much better!!! ok it's not a bad place of course, sitting in the famous Paris hotel and with Ramsay's hand motions made into a light... interesting idea. i ordered (of course) the famous beef wellington and husband ordered striplion steak, it was a big piece, he said it tasted pretty good.so the beef wellington, after watching and hearing it over and over on his shows, i was imagining someting that will blow me off the chair, but after the first bite, i thought "oh so this is what is like", and... that's it. well, the fillet migon was very nice, melts in my mouth, can you imagine a chunk of beef that melts? but the crust becomes soggy so fast so i didn't really enjoy the combination of some wet soft pastry and a piece of perfect steak.. we also ordered two appertizers, fried pork belly (1 piece) and yellowfin sashimi (2 pieces) and two drinks. bill came to $230 overall.would i go again? maybe when they bring scallop risotto to the main menu. ps. i think our server needs more training, he doesn't know how to make suggestions, maybe cuz everyone asks for beef wellington? 3 2 
The 0lace is located I  the palazzo hotel. Dim lighting and very romance atomsphere. The service is good. The steaks are not that good. Very dry and rough. I was shocked. The prices are I sane and for no reason. 3 2 
Been here twice, and I must say, the service has improved. Food is good. Had pizza, wings and cheese sticks. The manager came up to me and asked for suggestions on how to make my experience better. I let him know my suggestions and he took them into consideration. Will return soon. 3 4 
I like this fry's but hate the starbucks in this store. normally do not write reviews but I am surprised by how HORRIBLE the customer service is here. I used to work at starbucks and know a thing or two about the drinks but am not too picky since everything is fairly good. I have ordered at this location probably 4 times since it is convenient in the frys I shop at. I've received a couple wrong drinks but I've never said anything because it was small things like passion tea instead of passion tea lemonade and I like almost all starbucks drinks so nothing to make a fuss about. They are pretty slow but again, not worth the confrontation. But today, the service was appauling. My husband and I wanted some breakfast to hold us over while grocery shopping. I ordered a pepperoni and tomato foldover. After waiting I received a breakfast sandwich. I politely asked if I could get the foldover instead. Being pregnant now, my cravings and food aversions are pretty specific so while I would normally just take the hit and eat what I got, I wanted what I ordered today. The girl took my sandwich back and said she would give me the foldover.  I started shopping and left my husband to grab it for me. I waited a little bit to open my bag as I was busy shopping and also know the pastries can be super hot out of the starbucks oven. When I did get to my bag, I realized they had now given me a spinach foldover. Being almost done with my shopping at this point, I went to just get my money back. The gentleman that I spoke to asked the previous girl about how I had been given the wrong thing, to which she responded that they just don't have the pepperoni and tomato foldover. The man responded by saying what I thought was common sense..THAT IF YOU DONT HAVE THE THING I ORDERED, TO ASK IF I WANT SOMETHING ELSE INSTEAD OF JUST GIVING ME SOME RANDOM THING. The gentleman then said that they have a chorizo sandwich. I explained that I wanted the pepperoni foldover before, not a chorizo sandwich. he responded by saying, well we've never had that...like I should've known this somehow. I explained I was just ordering off the sign in the display case! He then reluctantly gave me cash back. Never NEVER again. After working in many customer service jobs including starbucks,  I have to say this is one of the worst experiences I have had. 3 1 
I have been coming here for the past four years or so, and it has been hit-or-miss most of the time.As far as nail techs, Dani is the best, hands-down. She's booked up pretty often, but well worth it. She has the most amazing attention to detail and can do a French manicure by hand like no one else! I just love her manicures/pedicures and her friendly personality. However, I have also gone to another tech a few times for pedicures and manicures, and won't be able to recommend her. She has left my polish streaky and the sides of my nails bare on more than one occasion. Her specialty might be acrylics and gels, but that doesn't excuse the fact that she can't give a decent mani/pedi. Not worth the price if it ain't done right.I have visited one of the estheticians there quite a few times, and she can also be iffy. When I go in for a brow wax, she doesn't always ask me what I want - just goes right to it, and sometimes goes way too thin. I had to learn to speak up about what I wanted. Don't get me wrong, she's incredibly sweet and mostly professional, but some aspects of her work don't sit well with me.Another esthetician I had a year or two ago gave me a terrible facial - the worst ever. She was careless and the facial was bland and basic. And, get this - she was TEXTING!! While I was in the room, trying to relax during my facial! Thank goodness she is no longer at the spa... I wonder why.Overall, the staff is friendly and much less snobby than most spas, but the quality of the treatments is not on par with the price. The facility is cute and recently expanded, but the rooms are still a little small. I've watched with disappointment as their prices have risen over the years, and it's caused me to seek out other places, despite the fact that I live down the street a short distance.To summarize - go see Dani for your nails, and you won't regret it. I'd comment on their hair department, but every stylist I've seen is no longer with the salon. Hmm. The esthetics department is decent, but I won't go out of my way to get services there. I have yet to try any medspa or laser services, but I'm considering checking out their laser technician in the future. If Total Bliss would make some improvements to the quality of their technicians and services, I would probably change my mind about them. 3 4 
I have to say, despite all the glowing reviews I found this place to be totally mediocre. I love love love Thai food, so I was very excited to give it a shot. I had a fish Tom Yum Kha soup to start ($4.95), which was tiny and not very flavourful, except for being too sweet. For me the whole point of ordering that soup is the rich coconutty base, but alas, I couldn't taste the coconut at all.Next up was vegetable Pad Prik Khing ($12.95) which is is a kind of spicy (not really) thin red curry sauce. It was ok, but nothing special. The vegetables (only broccoli and cauliflower... really?) were a bit over cooked as well. The sticky rice was sticky rice, what can I say?That said, I'm hoping I just tried the wrong dishes this time and will try it again. The floor seating area looked too cozy to not check out another time! 3 2 
My husband and I were so looking forward to eating at this restaurant.  The service was excellent and the ambiance was very nice.   I ordered the risotto with scallops.  The  two scallops were delicious, however, the risotto was crunchy and undercooked.  In addition, the dinner portions were tiny!  They were more like appetizer sizes.  I was overall very disappointed with the meal and will not be returning. 3 2 
I've been going here for years simply because of Heidi, she is amazing and super friendly. The reason I'm taking away two stars is because of how rude the front desk staff is. I've considered leaving just so I don't have to deal with their attitudes. The only reason I'm staying is due to the knowledge and care of Heidi. She goes above and beyond and I highly recommend her... if you can manage to look past how you are treated by the other employees. 3 2 
The employees here are really nice, and the food always tastes great. They've always had the items I wanted (usually chocolate frosted doughnuts and vanilla iced coffee). I also come in with coupons (usually from their surveys) quite a lot, and they've never had a problem putting in the discounts or anything.I'm taking away 1 star for their track-record with messing up my orders. I've only had a problem once or twice with my order when I'm in-person at the counter, and it was fixed really quickly (they forgot to give me my doughnuts once, and forgot the coffee another time). But almost every time I got through the drive-through (about once a week), they seem to have a really hard time getting my order right. For example, the last time I went through, the guy was 100% stoned, and he not only a) forgot the doughnuts, but also b) forgot the flavor pump *and* cream in my coffee. I caught the doughnut issue, but didn't realize how badly he had messed up my coffee until I had already driven away.I'm taking away the other star because the wait is sometimes quite long; even when I'm the only one in the store, I've had to start eating my doughnuts while waiting to pay  because they're looking for coffee ingredients or helping people in the drive-through. There's sometimes only one person working even in the mornings, which can make things go quite slow!Overall, the food here is good, but you have to be patient with the wait and prepared to tell them to fix your order. 3 4 
Sorry folks      they officially closed their door the weekwnd.    So you have to go to the Danforth for Thier amazing  gyros.   Most of the friendly staff  will also move there 3 4 
Had the Hoover Dam tour.  The tour of inside the facility were done by the local guides who are not affiliated with Pink Jeep.  We basically got dropped off with the new guides, picked up when we were done, and walked around on the outside of the Dam.Pros: Friendly tour guide - accommodating, eager to answer questionsCons: Uncomfortable suspension on the car; at $86 per person, it lacked some value, especially since most of the tour was done by the local guides ($30 per person and $7 parking if you go there yourself), got separated from the group because the guide wasn't part of the inside tour to help keep everyone together. 3 2 
Over all I like it, but its not going to be my main grocery run. I like having all the organic options, especially for the produce, beans and grains. I hate the parking situation, and their prices are significantly higher than I expect, even for organic. 3 4 
Let me start by saying I love the food here! However, I came at 2:30 in the afternoon, the restaurant was practically empty, yet it took over 10 minutes to order and pay for my food. I go to find a table and literally, every table needed to be cleaned! I get my drink and utensils, and there are no forks stocked. Then after I was done with my meal, the garbage cans were overflowing and I couldn't throw my trash away! The cleanliness and customer service and terrible. 3 1 
Very cool place, they've decorated well. It's the type of ambiance you'd expect from a plateau restaurant. Good diversity of foods and cocktails, service has always been good for me (been there 4 times). Great for brunch ! 3 4 
????sushi all-you-can-eat, fountain soda included 3 4 
This is review #1 in my Summer of 2011 Search for the Best Burger. It's Saturday and at 12:01 PM, we are already lined up at the Priest. It's cozy, nuff said. The smell is great, just enough to start the salivation process. The fresh meat is nicely formed into balls up, as each serving awaits it's transformation. I chat with some other patrons, it must be my good looks, because others are asking me what this is and what that is. I reply quickly, I am a Burger Priest virgin. I order a double-double for my significant other and 'The Priest" for myself. Somehow this seems wrong, given my strict catholic upbringing and years as an alter boy. Then my world is shattered. The mushroom fryer is broken. OH THE HUMANITY. So I opt for the double-double and an order of fries. I go for tomatoe, onion and mayo. Let the burger sing it's own song people. It's juicy, the meat flavour is there. Nice crisp on the patty and a minimal bun. It's good, but where are the angels, the path to the white light? Still waiting. Could you and I make these burgers at home? Of course. Is this the holy trinity of meat, bun and add ons, as others have stated? Not in my opnion, or at least not yet. Are they good, absolutely. Eating out is not just about convenience, we are after all, social creatures. It's partially the experience and the thought that an individual at the stove will take our taste buds and our spirit to another level. I will be back at "The Priest" someday and am looking forward to giving them 5 stars. God willing. Namaste. 3 5 
I love eating here. Make sure you make reservations, because it can be really busy. But be aware that you often have to wait for long periods of time even if you do have reservations on a busy night. The food is worth the wait though! Great staff. 3 4 
I enjoyed it, I loved telling people I ate at LoLo's.  But it is Chicken, waffles, corn bread.  Not my favorites but a fun place to go! 3 4 
Average bowling place, nothing exciting. There is food but it's pretty pricey so I'd rather pass. The alley is big and there is a place for everyone to sit. Quick service and crowded enough that you know it's Not a terrible place. I'd definitely come back but when there is neon glow instead. It's $6 per person to play and show rental fee is $2.50 for adults and $2.00 for 16 and under. I'm not sure about the per person but my husband and 3 kids , 4 people all together paid $50+ dollars not including shoe rental. Not terrible but there is better places. Still a fun activity to do with the family and my kids and husband enjoyed it. I was at the Casino part which was a win win for all of us. 3 2 
Food is so good! Drinks are okay but don't hold up for the pricing. If you like a good burger come here. 3 4 
Not to say that the receptionist was unfriendly or anything, she just never picks up the phone apparently! For 2 days of continuous calling I couldn't get anybody to answer the phone but kept hearing the message that for booking appointment I need to call back. I ended having to take time off from work just to come in to book an appointment with my family Dr.  Then I was told to call back to book my second follow up, now I tried calling 5 times in a day already and still no one picks up the call. I probably should find another clinic instead of wasting my time making all the calls.Update: Today is Wednesday, by the 8th call that I'm making at 3:45 PM, the voice message has already been changed to "Today is Thursday ..." and the message that I left earlier has not been returned. 3 1 
Fun experience. Very different for a thrill seeker like myself. I would give it a 5 star, but i didnt like the attitude that they gave us when they were trying to push on the sales.  It really throws out the good experience that i had for this place. 3 4 
My husband and son and I ate here for the first time this past weekend.  The atmosphere is much better than we expected--the whole feel is more upscale than many Asian restaurants, with plenty of authentic decorations.  The crab rangoons were among the best we've ever had.  The chicken satay appetizers were "OK"--other Thai places I've been serve more than just two skewers, but they were still pretty good.  Not as much flavor as they could have had.My son (age 10) really liked the grilled beef entree.  It came with noodles.  The meat was very tasty, but the noodles were thick and served cold--kind of like eating worms.  Not good, but maybe this is commonly done--we just didn't like that.  Many good veggies with it, though.My husband had the chicken pad thai and liked it--a generous serving.  Now, to my dish... I wanted to try pho since I'd never had it.  With my current cold/cough I was eager for a hot soup to soothe me.  Being adventurous, I tried the Pho Dac Biet (a combination pho.)  Big mistake!  It came with tendon and tripe--or "cow stomach" as I learned.  The odor from the broth even made it through my congestion.... I couldn't "stomach" it!  I picked around and tried to eat some noodles and greens, but kept scooping out chunks of bumpy stomach lining and tendons.  Not exactly appetizing, at least for me.  So BE CAREFUL!  I guess I was ignorant in my adventure, but I really wish I had tried the plain chicken pho.  The servers were excellent and very friendly.  I would try it again but would order something safer next time. 3 4 
This was a challenging rating. We were a tough group to handle, and they handled it with mixed success. I was at dinner with my family; a group of nine with three kids ranging from 3-10, a vegan, a vegetarian, and a meat eater. So finding a restaurant is no easy task. We made a reservation for 6:30pm, in hopes it would be early enough that the kids would not be too tired. Unfortunately, that wasn't necessarily the case, so we were not the most ideal family to be around. The wait staff were gracious, they were patient with the kids and were sure to bring out their food before ours. They even made a dish special order for one of the kids since there wasn't anything on the menu he wanted. They also offered a kids sized plate of mac and cheese rather than the full order. Unfortunately, other aspects were more of a disappointment.  After they brought out the kids meals, we had a good 20 min wait before the adult meals appeared. And one order was even later. The food was ok, but nothing that would entice me to necessarily return. The fish taco and the bruschetta were the highlights. And they were really good, the lobster mac and cheese was a bit underwhelming and the tilapia was overly salty. I really wanted to like this place, but in the end, it was just ok. 3 2 
So, I have had Mineo's 3 times. The first two times it was bleh, but I really enjoyed it last night.  My previous complaints were that it was greasy and salty, but the pizza I had last night was perfect.  I feel conflicted about this place.  I will try it one more time and update my review accordingly. 3 4 
PROS: Large selection of groceries, easy access.CONS: They 'forget' to bag groceries that you have paid for.  For multiple customers.  What the heck.  This seems to be a Indian grocery store disease.  Chor madarchods. 3 2 
I am loving the veg items! I wouldn't suggest the taco salad because you'll get a ton of the "flavor veggies" like onion in it and not much else interesting. This time around, I ordered the veg chalupa and cheese enchilada. Very tasty, nice portion sizes, and a great price. (Under $10 for late lunch!) I also love that black beans can be substituted for refried. My partner was able to get the sopas vegetarian and were tasty as well. It's not often that I have found carrots in med food and I like it. Our service was very slow this time. Perhaps because we were outside, I'm not sure if that factored in. Maybe due to the holiday staffing, but it was not packed at all. We had to ask for water after empty water glass being ignore on several server rounds. 3 4 
I want to really like this place. The car wash is pretty good for the membership price I signed up for. The free vacuums are awesome too. But I have been here 6 times and 3 of the times the tunnel has been down and I'm getting really annoyed. The first time the attendant came up and explained to me want was going on, and gave me a coupon. This time no one even came up to any of the 4 cars trying to figure out what was going on to explain why the lanes were blocked off. Hopefully they can figure it out. Maybe it's just been bad timing!! 3 2 
Went in with the family around 11:30 am on a Saturday.  There was no one in the dining area but when we left about an hour later the place was about half full.  Our server (Matt) was efficient and polite.  Ordered a side of mashed potatoes for my infant son.  They showed up a little too fast, as though they we sitting in a warmer waiting to be scooped out.  The wife ordered the angus burger minus the bun (she has a gluten intorerlance) with fries.  She enjoyed both though she thought the burger was just a little over done even though she asked for 'close to well done'.  I had the spinach, berries, goat cheese and chicken salad minus dressing.  It was very good though the chicken seemed a little sparse.  When it comes to chain restaurants, Houlihan's is average.  I will go back again when I'm at the mall. 3 4 
Went there for burger fest. Had the $50 burger it was pretty good undercooked yet a bit dry. Would say this burger would be worth about $35 at most. The host was a little off asking us what we were there for? Like come on lol. Where here for drinks and some dinner. The place felt a bit snotty. Don't think I would return. 3 2 
The food was ok. But the service was disappointing, we came at 1pm on a Saturday, it wasn't too busy, 6 tables two servers.  The server didn't give us water until I asked for it. At the end, servers were talking in the front for a long time before she handed the check. 3 2 
We went to Echo Sushi for the all-you-can-eat sushi (this place is always full every time I pass by). The sushi was very good, and very fresh. I love the variety of different rolls you get to choose from and that they have the option of brown rice too! They have gotten very creative with their rolls! The food was served very promptly after each order and the servers were very polite and friendly. Overall, tasty food with reasonable prices! 3 4 
I question the sanitation of the utensils used..... I thought it was also rude that my appointment kept being interrupted because my stylists other appointments hair color was in the process of setting. Shouldn't double book like that. Just felt very impersonal and unimportant. This was my first time going to a hair salon in 6 years, so I was a little disappointed. My cut was very nice however for $50 I could get a basic wash and cut for a better quality experience down the road. 3 2 
2.5, rounding up to 3 because this used to be one of my fav AYCE and hope that this one not so great experience was a one time thing.So first off, Matsuda used to rank in my top 5 AYCE Japanese restaurants. It was close to where I lived, food was slightly above average, and service was decent. Mind you, I usually go with my family of 4, so maybe service was slightly better than if it was a larger group. But I haven't been going for about a year now. Until my office decided to have our annual Xmas gathering at Matsuda. I called about a month ahead to make reservations, since we were going to be 15+ people. Being around Xmas, I knew they would be even busier, and wanted to make sure we got a table at the specific date and time that we wanted. So I called around the beginning of dinner service to make a reservation for a Tues around Xmas. A guy answers the phone, takes down my information, and than tries to hurriedly hang up on me. But I had a few questions about pricing and wanted to double check he got my information right, so I made him stay on the line. He than sounded super annoyed, simply just answering "yeah" to my questions, and than at the end saying "don't worry I've got you reservation, don't worry ok" with a bit of an attitude and than hung up on me. So flash forward to the day of our reservation. We had a different number of people than we originally reserved for so we called to let them know the change, and they couldn't find our reservation. Well apparently, we were lucky since we were eating slightly earlier at 6:30pm, slightly before the dinner rush, so they said they would find a table for us and made us a new reservation. I wonder what would have happened if we never called to make a change to our non-existent reservation, we would have been stuck waiting hours for a 15+ table.Anyways on to the food, based mostly on this experience only:~Sashimi & sushi were a-okay, maki rolls were not as fresh.~One of my fav items here that you probably can't find at every AYCE is the Fish Head Soup. Its a pretty big bowl with one half of a salmon fish head, tofu cubes, and lots of nappa cabbage. ~Cooked foods were mostly average, nothing super good or super bad, that was particularly memorable.          ~Particular hits with my co-workers, but not necessary myself, were the Unagi Rice, Matsuda Golden Shrimp, and the Grilled Salmon Heads. Those kept getting reordered.~Desserts were okay. There were a lot of Mousse options. Good for if you like tiny cups of different flavoured mousses.Service was super slow. I can't believe in this day and age, we had to order by dictating our orders to our one designated waiter. Most other places have ipads, or at least an ordering sheet you can fill out yourself. This kind of ordering method becomes especially annoying when you have a large group. A lot of our food items were missing, or it did not come in the correct quantity. It was hard tracking down our waiter, and when we asked him to check on the missing items, they still didn't come. Drinks were not included. Weeknight dinner was $24.99, which is pretty standard now. I don't think I'll be back anytime soon. But maybe someday I'll give them another shot for old times sake, but definitely not with a large group. 3 2 
Just finished eating here and it was okay...not impressed at all. It was a cute place but the waiter was unapproachable and seemed annoyed by us every time we asked him something (aka to get the menu again etc.). After reading the other reviews I was expecting amazing food and service but it was very average and not good customer service. Oh and the garlic rolls weren't that great either like others said. Wompssss!!! 3 2 
The old menu is gone. RIP, old menu.I can't seem to find a copy of the new menu online, but it's smaller and more generic than before. I ordered a kale salad with pulled pork - got a tiny, expensive salad topped with prepackaged-tasting pork strips.510 is still fine for a pint. 3 2 
I don't mean to single out this location its all of The Keg that has gone down hill.  My friend took me here recently service was ok food was not.  I had peppercorn NY the steak was ok the sauce sucked! How do you screw up peppercorn sauce?  Also prices are up seems like that company doesn't care about quality anymore.  The Keg of 10 years ago I miss you! 3 2 
Nestled in between the galleries and boutiques at Gordon Square, Sweet Moses is a new treat bar. On a Saturday night after an opening at Wall Eye Gallery, the place was hopping. There was quite a wait in line and the place was packed with people until they closed.The sundaes are nothing short of artful. I've got pictures as well as a link to their menu on my blog: http://whatsincleveland.blogspot.com/2011/05/sweet-moses-soda-fountain-and-treat.html I'd call it pricey, but mostly worth it. Water came in glasses with crushed ice. Popcorn came for free to our table. It's romantic in an old-timey way.I couldn't help thinking that most of the proceeds from my six dollar sundae went towards the seamless branding and marketing this place has. This place would get more stars from me if:   - They had the structure to handle the high volume they're getting. The wait for a sundae is kind of ridiculous. But... they're new, so I have a feeling they couldn't have been expecting this kind of volume.- The prices were a little better... but, once again, the seamless brand experience doesn't come cheap.Things that made me happy: - They accept Discover - The pretzel and doily and popcorn - The crushed ice in the water 3 4 
Where to begin....so I was in the mood for a Lobster Roll. I am actually from New England so it's rather important that this meal not suck. Unfortunately, it sucked. I don't know what was more insulting; the hotdog bun or the $18 + I paid. How dare you serve it on a soggy hot dog bun. Rude. The lobster part...flavorless and disappointing. The fries, salt-less, not as disappointing, however I probably had like a total of 11 fries. COME ON! 11 freaking fries. The coleslaw was ok, it needed more or less of something but I can't quite put my finger on it. It was served with some bread and pesto(?) it was so warm and good.All in all the decor was beautiful but I didn't go there to eat fancy chairs and flat screen tv's....Service was good. 3 1 
Frequent the Tavern Grille for lunch from time to time. If I reviewed the place 6 months ago I would have given it a 4 for surprising me with a thoughtful menu and great service. Unfortunately, recent visits have served to taint my original impression, and I can only dole out a 3 a this point.Their beer selection is excellent, with a variety of local brews on tap along with a great selection of bottled beers. Local brews, especially IPAs, garner a star all on their own.Their menu has a huge variety of options, and many of them promise substance above and beyond your local bar food. Unfortunately, execution on the food tends to be so-so, much of what we've sampled being a little...bland. My reuben was average at best, and my wife's chili burger (order by mistake) was clearly topped with canned chili - a big no no in my book. I do have to say I enjoy their take on green chili cole slaw.The serving staff we've had have been cheerful, the waitresses definitely being a positive for the place. But the past two times our food has come out so late that it was the manager coming by with our food to apologize that we had to wait so long. Predictably, the food was cold both times.I was hoping we'd found a new go-to lunch place, but at this point, I think the search is still on. 3 4 
Dear Foodies,Normally when I write reviews they are about the alcohol and food that I enjoy at the establishment. However, this time around I only enjoyed the delectable cans of beer here at Short Leash because we ate elsewhere before stumbling over to this place during First Friday. I had the Coconut Porter in a can and it blew my hair back. I also tried a yummy Pilsner that they have in a can as well. Their beers on tap or not that adventurous or exciting to me so I opted for can and was very happy. I will return to eat the food there; it smelled and looked amazing as the servers walked the food to the tables behind me. 3 4 
Spiffy place, definitely a social setting. I enjoyed the concept of the bar not to mention the staff especially Taylar who was extremely helpful and informative. Taylar made the experience amazing keeping a smile on her face throughout the entire time. I do think the drinks could be a little stronger, I could barely taste the alcohol. Overall it was a cool experience. 3 4 
Place is always packed for weekend dinners, harder to get in if there's more than a party for two.Giant portions, love that there's enough to share or to munch on the followinh day.  Cheese crisp and p'zookie are our motivation to come here, wish tables were not too close together, but I get it's part of their charm, plus that would mean less tables and then there  would be a longer wait ;) 3 4 
I had my monthly service today with Sam S. He performed a quick professional job. 3 5 
Have always loved this place, but the last visit could have been a lot better. The meat was over cooked and the service below par. The tres leches was to die for though! 3 2 
Sadly Bishoku has now been re-named "Chop Brasserie Asiatique" by their new owners.  No it's not an Asian brewery, so I have no idea why they chose this name, but in the end, since the change over, the quality has gone down hill.The last time we went, the waitress was very rude to us and food wasn't great.  The rolls are still fine, but the nigiri and sashimi was definitely not as good.  The sushi pizza is still good and unique, but I don't think I'll be going back.  RIP Bishoku! 3 2 
I went in today for Shellac. Called ahead and spoke with the owner who told me it was really slow so I could come on in. I live really close so it was a short walk. The lady who did my nails (I think she is the owner) was very kind and had an excellent rapport with her other customers. I could tell she had many regulars because she addressed them by their first name. I got black nails with my ring finger a different colour (sparkly gold). Overall it was a pleasant experience and I would go back but next time I won't get black. She was very careful but the black still ended up smudging a bit at the cuticle and bugs me a little bit. She did a hell of a lot better job then I could ever do with a dark colour so it's not the biggest issue for me. The shellac manicure was $30. Something to note; starting October to March they will be closed on Sundays for winter. 3 4 
Very good food and we had a great waiter as well. However, it is a little overpriced in my opinion. My husband and I went for lunch and our bill was $100. We got a burger, sandwich, a large beer and a mixed drink. 3 4 
The concept is actually pretty neat. I just don't really like the cupcakes that much. If you are a cupcake fan at any level, this place can be heaven. Maybe with a little time the selection will improve, but at a single moment there are only so many varieties. There were some creative ones but they were still semi-standard. Ex: add alcohol. I think they also have specials day to day which is a huge plus, but unfortunately I can't eat cupcakes every day.I personally would have liked to see a chocolate cupcake that looked like chocolate was a central component to the integrity of the cake. But heck that might be what separates cake from brownies. The cupcakes are worth ordering and when I went there were indeed an impressive number of cupcakes. Because this is a new place, I am sure they will appreciate regulars. You might also want to check to see if they will do custom cupcakes/cupcake orders, because that certainly could be a possibility. 3 2 
I haven't tried the rest of the food here, but the donuts are great! They have several different kinds of cronuts! A must try! 3 4 
Good times at Made in Mexico. The size of the portions is well worth the price, and the fresh margaritas are worth a try, very tasty. All in all this is worth a try if you are in the mood for Mexican 3 4 
The food - I ordered an omelette.  You can build your own and I went with sausage, swiss cheese, onion, mushrooms and bell peppers.  It was very good; as light and fluffy as it could be with all those ingredients.  The omelette came with either hash browns or fried potatoes and either biscuits/gravy or two pancakes.  It's a lot of food!  I couldn't finish and brought the biscuits/gravy home.  They have a number of breakfast options but I should point out that if you're on a diet you're not likely to find something light on the menu.The price - the omelette, hash browns and biscuits/gravy set me back less than $9!  That works out to 1/3 of a cent per calorie.The service - They were busy but the service was still very good. People were walking around with coffee and we were checked on often enough.  The inside - the restaurant has a diner sort of feel.  It's clean, nicely laid out with a lot of booths and tables.  Things are getting a big old inside but this isn't a fancy-schmancy place so it's fine.Not on my side of town and my waistline couldn't handle coming here often but if I'm in the neighborhood I'd stop in again. 3 4 
Dear Yoshi's.  You and I go way way back.  Remember that one time I ordered Combo #2 (Teriyaki chicken)?  Oh yeah I mean that was about 500 times.  Remember that time the girl behind the counter was puzzling over my request for some Gomasho?  Oh I meant the 500 times (it's ok, eventually she figures out what I'm asking for).  Remember that time Kirk and I saw a cockroach hanging out near the bathrooms?  It really happened!  But only one time did I see it.  Don't get defensive now, Yoshi's, but please take care of that problem if you haven't already.  It's ok, we will still do business together---especially if you keep your prices moderate.  I'll still order Dragon chicken.  I'll still brave your parking lot, fending off the odd transient here and there.  It's nice to know you'll always be there for some decent japanese style food at a moderate price. 3 4 
Totally mediocre. I'd just as soon go to Applebee's or chilis. Came here on a Saturday night for some preseason football, but they only had two games playing.  They got my order of wings wrong, but quick to redeem themselves with $5 "Zipps bucks. " the wings were tasty with plenty of meat on them. The service was friendly. Probably wouldn't come back just because there's better places for wings and football. 3 2 
I had my hair cut by Anthony a few months ago. At that time, my hair was desperate for a cut and pretty dry, after I grew it out for my own wedding and a friend's.  Anthony was very nice, and I was impressed by the clean, professional salon. However, I wasn't too keen on him talking me out of getting layers when I said that I wanted them, as I have had layers many, many times before and am happiest when I have some bounce to my hair. I appreciate a professional opinion, but I know my hair best of all, and I regret letting him talk me out of it. I left with a healthy, yet all one-layer cut, which became boring to me within a week.  I just feel like for the price that I paid, I should have gotten more. I could have had a friend with a steady hand cut my hair all one length for free.  Overall, this experience just taught me to stand up for what I want and not let people talk me out of something I really want for my hair. 3 4 
Ehhhhh...I just don't know. I've dined in at this Claim Jumper about twice a month for the past 8 months that I've resided in Vegas, and probably ordered the take out another 5-10 times or so when I was working more frequently in Town Square. Everything here is so unbelievably inconsistent, that it's hard to give this place a solid rating. When the food is good and the service is good, this place is definitely 4-5 stars. But when its bad...boy is it bad. Claim Jumper has an excellent menu and dessert selection. This is their strength and weakness - they offer a little of everything for everyone while specializing in absolutely nothing. They also offer a full service bar that's pretty handy to grab a Stoli Cranberry when you're waiting for a table on a Saturday night. And the drinks are pretty darn good, especially when this blonde guy Chris is in the bar. He makes a mean martini - the kind that makes me shamelessly fall off my bar stool when I get up to follow the hostess to my awaiting table.The servers are hit or miss. I've had a few that were friendly and talkative and gave me free dessert for being a sweetheart. I've also had some that were outright hostile by slamming a plate or cheese toast on the table or rolling their eyes and groaning when I meekly asked for a refill of iced tea. Luckily, I've found a server that is polite, friendly, and thorough, so I just request him when I go in. "Are you sure you're willing to wait 40 minutes for a table with him, ma'am?" Why yes, yes I am; I've got my appletini right here to entertain me.The food for the most part is mediocre and generally lukewarm by the time it reaches the table. But the portions are ridiculously huge. I order off the Little Jumper's menu most of the time (when I have a server that's willing to accomodate that), and even then I end up taking about half of it home. I've had a variety of different dishes (lobster, steak, turkey dinner, burger, pizza, country fried steak, etc.), and I find I'm disappointed most of the time. Their mini pizzas and sliders are phenomenal though.Decor is nice enough. Booths are comfy. Bathrooms are clean. Outdoor spring/summer seating looks nice. The music that plays is mostly 80s and is completely awesome. It's half the fun of going there.Lunch take-out has proven to be a worthless joke for me. Despite ordering 15-20 minutes before I even jaunt on over there for pick up, half the time they forget to put my order in, and the other half of the time something happens in the kitchen and it has to be completely remade. I appreciate the quality checks the staff makes before handing my order over to me, but I'm starving. It's just one freaking soft pretzel! Pleeeeeeaaaasssseeee feed me...I only have 5 minutes left on my lunch!Worth noting are their fantastic managers. If something goes wrong, they're there at your table to make sure it gets done right. They're very friendly and on top of things.So there you have it. Some good points, and some bad. I've put up with it, mostly because it was easy and a comfortable routine for my husband and I. But recently we discovered "I Love Sushi" so I think that's going to seriously cut into our Claim Jumper visits. Which is absolutely fine by both of us. 3 2 
The food is excellent. However, the ambience is horrible and the service is terrible. We have picked up there three times within the past two weeks, and every time we did not feel welcome. The waiters and the servers do not speak to you and the the girl behind the register seemed like she was annoyed that we didn't know what we wanted and was rushing us. They look at you cross-eyed and are rude.  I did not feel welcome there. 3 2 
The decor and food presentation are very nice, and the food is alright - but for the portions they serve, the prices are downright criminal. I walked in off the street and asked for the most popular item - it was an $11.29 Butter Chicken Kathi Roll. While the roll was decent (chicken was pretty dry but flavours were good), the size of the thing was comparable to a McDonalds Breakfast Burrito. I'd call it a snack rather than a meal. It's too bad the place doesn't sell these rolls for $5 - there would be lineups out the door!! 3 2 
Do not go here if you are not a fan of smelling like a cigar nor if you like your espresso martinis!Pleasant open spot to people-watch.Ideal for older couples and seems to be frequented by groups of middle-aged to older men 3 2 
Sweet little place! Great burgers!! Live music. Sorry to hear they are moving to a new location. Loved the little house!Second trip--crab "burger" was like a blob of crab salad on a bun. Not real tasty for me. Husband tried the crab and shrimp stuffed portobello- 2 1/2 stars out of 5, he said. It was thickly covered with melted cheese, a (less than) subtle touch it could be much better without. He said the asparagus was good. The service was good, and they did comp my meal, which was nice of them. In the future we will stick to the burgers!! Live music was very pleasant. Beers good. 3 4 
Was craving a Belgian waffle after having an amazing waffle down in NYC. After a quick Google search this place came up and my girlfriend and I decided to check it out. She ordered the strawberry delight waffle and I ordered a breakfast crepe. The waffle was tiny and my crepe wasn't up to par with what I was expecting. The waffle was good but it wasn't great...the dough didn't taste fresh. My girlfriend ordered a hot chocolate which was actually very tasty. The service was also very slow, we were surprised to see only 1 employee working on a Sunday. Will probably search for another waffle place the next time we are craving Belgian waffles. 3 2 
Im an average height guy 6', and I get into a comfortable position in seat g13 and there's a stupid piece of glass blocking half of the screen. The glass has no purpose except to block the screen. Remove it or I would never come back here again 3 2 
Ordered delivery, and the food was great. There is a $20 minimum, so expect to place a big order. Customer Service: The woman on the phone was extremely rude. Beyond a confrontational tone, she basically hung up on me. After I spent 20 dollars, of course. 3 2 
I am one not to write reviews but since I have plenty of time on my hands waiting here I decided why not. Well if you plan on coming here on New Year's Eve for dinner expect to wait 2 hours !!! We were initially told 1 hour and 20 mins so we decided to accept it, but it has now been 2 hours and we still haven't been seated. I just don't want others to get the wrong impression I don't appreciate when restaurants tell you a certain time but then it extends way over. Once you have invested an hour and 20 mins you just keep waiting I sure hope the steaks are good. So once again expect the minimum of 2 hours 3 1 
I stayed at the Delta for 4 nights. The first night was terrible, the next 3 were fine. When I first arrived I noticed a piece of toilet paper left in the toilet, and when I flushed it overflowed. The water seeped into the carpet outside the bathroom. At this point I was almost late for my meeting, so notified the front desk and left. When I returned, the bathroom had been cleaned and an industrial fan put in the room to dry the carpet. There was no mention of moving me to a different room until I returned to the desk, voiced my displeasure, and asked to be moved. I was relocated to an 'upgraded' room at no cost. I'm not sure what these 'upgrades' were, but I suppose it was a bit bigger. At least it was clean. Like others have said, the TV was surprisingly small.What I like about this hotel was the location and price. Very close to where I needed to be and ideal for downtown shopping at the Eaton Centre etc. As well, I paid $68 Cdn on Hotwire and was happy with that. I will probably return if I have a meeting in the same location as it was a decent place overall and very convenient. 3 1 
It took me a long time to find a great Mexican Restaurant in Scottsdale, so I was very excited to find Frank and Lupe's!   The chips and salsa (one of my favorite parts of the meal) are delicious and I have been satisfied with them every visit.  I also have never been disappointed in the food.  I have to agree with some previous reviews that the service is terrible.  At times it seems like you need to beg to even eat there and they are never friendly to the customers!  Improved service would make this a 5 star review! 3 4 
Ok food. I guess, given the concept,  I expected a bit of interaction with the server. That was minimal. I even told the hostess 'i wait tables back home, so he can really be a dick to us' and we got a basic schpiel from the server and a dropped check.  Not really any interaction, which I feel like is the point of the brand. 3 2 
We had the grilled salmon special and greek salad with chicken it was good .  The service was excellent.  I m hoping they will serve breakfast.  Not many family own restaurants in Huntersville that serve breakfast.  Will be back for the potroast dinner special next time. 3 4 
I have always wanted to try this place based on awesome reviews on their breakfast from friends and family, especially the French toast.  Finally stopped in this morning around noon for lunch and was kind of underwhelmed by the whole place.Typical 15 to 20 minute wait for a table but noticed everything looked very classy, with white tablecloths and Specialty menus because of it being a Saturday. Talked to the waitress and she commented how they are trying a new thing with the specialty menus and going for a more decadent feel. Not really what I was looking for since I had two small kids with me, but we decided to give it a try anyway.They did not have many options on the specialty menu for the children so we paid $16 for a waffle and chicken for them. We could get ala carte items on the side , so we ordered a side of scrambled eggs.For the adults, we ordered the strip steak,  asparagus and gruyere scrambled eggs with hollandaise sauce.Everything was delivered to our table and looked very well plated. The waitress was slow to fill our glasses and we never got our side of scrambled eggs. By the time they came we were basically done with our breakfast. The chicken and waffles was very tasty and the kids enjoyed it.The steak and eggs was disappointing. It was two very small slivers of medium cooked steak, with a few half pieces of asparagus over the scrambled eggs. What was supposed to be hollandaise sauce looked more like a combination of egg yolks and butter. The taste wasn't awful, but for $22 a plate I guess I had higher expectations.Overall it was not a terrible experience, however be prepared to know that you are ordering from specialty menus on the weekends and it is on the fine dining end of the spectrum. I was looking forward to having some great local French toast, so I guess I will keep looking. 3 2 
Very loud, service is very slow and food is just ok.  Went with a group of girls and we couldn't even order dessert because it was impossible to get our server to take our order.  Will not be returning here. 3 2 
It's funny, another yelper mentioned a great ambiance - but I guess it's not to my taste. I don't need silence when eating my ramen, but the music was way too loud. It's not really enjoyable when you server has to yell at you, and you have to yell back for them to hear you. To make matters worse, there was awkwardness at the communal table between the random couples (yes I've sat at communal tables before without issue). Thank goodness the food was better than I expected! If it was just based on food, I'd have given it 4/4.5 stars. 3 2 
I took the Ballet Barre class, and it was pretty good. I went on a purchased Groupon, which was 2 classes for the price of 1. What I liked: The atmosphere: I did really like the minimalist / modern decor. It's cool and fits right in with its uptown location.The class itself: It was relatively low impact, and only about a third of the class was actually using the barre (the beginning was arms, the middle on the barre, and the end abs / stretching). The instructor was great, and the class size was good. I do wish we had spent more time on the barre.The locker room was very clean and nicely arranged (although there are only 2 showers, which could mean waiting a while after a lunchtime class).What I didn't like so much:Price: This place is pretty expensive. It was okay to take 2 classes with the Groupon, but to join full time is a lot of money to only have access to about 3-4 different kinds of classes. I am a full time Y member, and for a lot less money they offer many different choices.Mats: When we arrived (I went with a friend, who'd also purchased the Groupon), the guy at the front desk asked if we had mats. We said no, we didn't know we needed them. "It's in the course descpription" was the answer; though no one reminded us of this when we registered for the class. We had to pay $2 each to rent a mat for a 1 hour class. $2!!! Definitely a rip off. For my 2nd class have no doubt that I will remember to bring my own. I mean, $2!!!The windows: The exercise room is right at street level on the corner of Stonewall / Church St., and it is totally windowed. So people are constantly walking by and staring. Maybe I am extra self conscious, but that was distracting to me, and at times in the class it made me pretty uncomfortable (like when men are walking by and starting at a class full of women doing hip thrusts). Also, my guess is that in the summer being in that room is like being in a fishbowl of magnifying glasses; meaning, won't it be really hot in there?Overall - it was a pretty okay experience to try a different kind of class with the Groupon, but I wouldn't pay the regular price for a class, not would I consider becoming a member full time. 3 4 
I know you'd probably expect a better star rating but I'd have to say I  also expected more than I got. First of all, the food is good. It's really quite good. But not always excellent. The portions are copious but the presentation is non existant. It feels like you're on a farm almost. I can see how that's fun but in that case, it might be a little pricy for the farm experience. Second, service is good but it left me with the impression that the emphasis was on the upsell and not on the dining experience. If you go, I recommend the  second service, that way, you'll stay longer and enjoy the evening. Wine selection is good but not all the waiters are apt at suggesting the right bottle. All in all, it's definitely worth the visit and it probably it would have earned at least another star if not for the price or the impersonal experience. 3 2 
Great place....clean and modern.  Location is not the best.  Too close to the university.  Too much disruption. 3 4 
We visited October 2013 before and after a show at the hotel that Dick's is at. Our lunch was overpriced, but we enjoyed the crude entertainment and drinks. We did opt for the souvineer cup knowing we would want to come back for drinks after the show. Our first experience was pleasant enough and left us happy. When we came back that evening though, the bartender was spending so much time with a patron across the bar and taking selfies for her, that he flat out ignored others at the bar. When we finally got his attention, he tried to overcharge us for our drinks. We did have to ask him about it, and this is where it draws the line between funny crude joking to flat out being a true dick. The bartender didn't know the difference at that point and was literally being a jerk. We did call him on his attitude knowing we could be misinterpreting it, but he had a totally jerk ass response and validated that he was being rude. We didn't deserve this. We paid, but left without tipping. He went back to flirting. I would have expected better from the bartender (even mediocre service) being that this place is a tourist location. 3 2 
I've got to see it before it closed. It's a big part of MGM and what's makes them MGM. It crowded all the time. One of few things where parents can bring their kids to. It was free so nothing to complain about. It sucks that it had to close. 3 4 
Rock solid dinner for families in the Regent neighborhood. I like their margaritas a lot! 3 4 
The complimentary breakfast was basic but good and the room was clean.Watch your credit card charges.  We stayed for 2 days using points and so the total charge was $70.  But when the bill posted on the credit card, there were 5 additional charges totaling over $2400!!  I'm not sure how they messed up so badly. 3 2 
Food: we ordered Beef Sashimi, special Tuna sashimi, scallop sashimi, black cod, spare rib, bibimbap, i also got the original ramue drink. Total is about $65 including tax and tip.we liked the tuna and cod the most, i personally liked all EXCEPT the scallop sashimi. it got a 'unfresh seafood' taste.... Black cod was amazing!! loved the miso flavour twist. downside: we did see a hair in the tuna sashimi the 1st time and i asked the server to bring me another one...kinda gross :S but we were so hungry (after the 2 hours wait!!!!) so it didn't actually impact our appertize.I'm only giving a 3 star is because: 1. wait time is radiculous. 2. server was too busy to pay us any attention. 3. portion is honestly a bit small compare to the price...taste of food deserves a 4 though. 3 4 
This little noodle bar is perfect for Vegas.  It was all about the show.  Watching the chef stretch noodles by hand made me want to eat here.  The interior of the restaurant was really cool too.  The quality of the noodles was great.  However, when I order a pork belly noodle bowl for $20, I expect more than a single piece of pork belly the size of a domino in a scrambled egg whites in a soy sauce based sauce.  So disappointed. 3 2 
I used to enjoy Blazin Bills.  But the last couple of times we have gone we got slow service, high prices an the food is lacking. 3 2 
I'm never impressed by quantity over quality but I really wanted to like this place. The wait was 90 minutes for breakfast so we went and gambled and returned in 75 minutes $150 richer. Score!  So, we're all riding a jackpot high ready for some good food. I was drawn to the Benedict menu, while my dining partners had sage chicken and corn beef and cocktails. Maybe it was the alcohol -- they loved their food but I was greatly disappointed (drinking coffee).  I had the HH original that was supposed to have tomato cream sauce. I was unpleasantly surprised to receive a plate covered in marinara sauce; eggs, mash, biscuit covered in marinara. The biscuit on it's own-delicious. The mash-yum. The combination?  An utter failure. Where was the cream sauce?  My recommendation, drink heavily or win the price of the meal and you won't care so much. 3 2 
Used to be one of my favorite places till the pulled pork sandwich got smaller and the price got higher. As if this place wasn't already expensive enough. 3 2 
My friend and I were bored one late late night, and quite famished, so we decided to google a 24hour restaurant; alas we stumbled upon this quaint little cafe. It wasn't ANYTHING like the pictures and website described it to look like. I was quite disappointed with the false advertising I received. It's not as nice as they make it out to be...AT ALL. It's anything but nice (in terms of what you're promised)...but it's got character, and its 24-HOURS. You can't beat 24/7...ESPECIALLY when they make desserts as deliciously as they do here. I inhaled some 4 slices of cake in one sitting! It was so moist and soft, it sort of just melted in my mouth. I barely had to chew.Oh yes, another thing I didn't find to my liking was the TERRIBLE SEATING! In every direction, there are people just an arm's length away. I'm VERY seat picky, they really took the terms 'close&cozy' to the next level. It was uneasy, and uncomfortable, I could hear my neighbour table's entire conversation. TMI lol. 3 2 
I bought the Groupon for 3 gel manis/pedis. The first experience was was terrible as I had Danielle, the same person Michelle C. had and I felt the same way about the quality. I was told that Danielle is the manager, so maybe doing the mani/pedi is not her area of expertise. This was the worst/mani pedi I have ever had. She didn't paint the edges of the nails, which left a really bizarre look with the whites of my nails showing all around the edges. My gel manicure lasted about two days and gel is suppose to last two weeks! I am giving this review 3 stars because of my second experience, which really redeemed this place for me. I had Gaylee (sp?) and she was fantastic! She did one of the best gel mani/pedis I have ever had. My gel manicure lasted 3 weeks! She was professional, friendly and very competent. My advice to the owner is - don't torch your reputation as a new salon by selling inexpensive services on Groupon and then have incompetent people like Danielle perform services in which they are clearly not  trained. I would have happily given a 5 star review if I would have had someone as adept as Gaylee on my first visit. 3 1 
Some stores have great prices, others are absurdly, insanely, high. The food court is terrible. There is a highly entertaining place for the kids to play, including an interactive screen on the floor. Not much fun when there's too many kids though. And the enclosed play area is only for very small children. My kids were too big at age 3, which I think is highly absurd, especially since it's usually quite empty. 3 2 
Great customer service from this location. Food was descent and dining area was clean. 3 4 
A friend and I discovered this spot after trying unsuccessfully to secure reservations at several Distillery District restaurants. We were looking for a nice meal before attending a play at Soulpepper. The entrance to the restaurant is actually inside the entrance to a commercial building. Our wait staff was friendly and efficient. We shared a large roasted beet salad which easily could feed three and a zucchini pizza. Both were tasty although the beets were a tad on the mushy side and the pizza crust was somewhat soggy, not crisp. We also split a 1/2 bottle of wine. The washrooms are outside the restaurant itself and are available to anyone in the building in general. All in all a reasonably priced, good meal within an easy walking distance (10 minutes) of the theatre. 3 4 
I purchased a car from here and continue to have minimal service done here.  I do my own oil changes and other small service since I don't trust dealers to do it right.  I have had warranty work and things like tire mounting and balancing done here.  The tire mounting and balancing has always been fine, but the warranty service has left a little to be desired.  After replacing a shock in my car, the car now sits lower at that point where the shock was replaced by about a quarter of an inch.  However, this is within the generous factory specifications for the car so they won't do anything.  For things you can't do on your own like a tire mount or balance, they're fine with a coupon.  However, anything else I wouldn't really trust them to do it right. 3 2 
The food is good, perhaps great, but the service is so piss-poor, that I feel offended every single time that I dine there.  Yet, I still keep coming back for the good food.  If I try to place an order over the phone, no one EVER picks up the line.  When we go there to dine, there is always an unbelievable wait, and the apathy on the part of the staff is offensive.  Often, certain items that are on the menu simply aren't available.  I have a love-hate relationship with Lolo's.  All soul food restaurants in Phoenix suffer from this same lack of professionalism.  It's a disgrace to our race and impedes us from entering into the mainstream. 3 2 
This restaurant is right by my house, so I decided to try it out since I love sushi! The restaurant itself is very nice and modern and the service was good. I got a variety of different rolls, gyoza, and some udon soup. They don't have all you can eat here, so it can get a bit pricey! The rolls however were very big, so they fill you up! I like my gyoza pretty crispy and the server told me they couldn't do that, so that was a little disappointing! The food though was all good with fresh tasting ingredients. I would come back since it's so close to home! 3 4 
Not worth the money. 30 dollars a person. The wait staff was very attentive but the food got cold before you got back to your table. If you don't mind sushi it's not bad. Wide variety of sushi but nothing else. Overall I would skip this buffet if we'll ever go back. 3 2 
3 1/2Good food and cocktail. But sometimes their food take too long to come out, waited almost 20 mins for the wings today :( but i love the happy hour, great price and good food. 3 4 
I ordered some more take out last week (UGH midterms). I was not pleased with the guy on the phone.I called for the late night special and asked for a Chicken fried rice, medium hot and sour soup and a fried calamari. He wanted to charge me 34$ for it! I asked him to repeat the individual prices back to me and asked why I didn't get the late night special. He told me to hold on and changed my new total to 24$ after tax.WTF. They never used to bullshit prices. (Then again, they also used to give out the late-night menu.) The only reason why I'm a repeat customer (for the past 3 years) is because of how fast and how late they deliver.  Mediocre food at best but great for a desperate and stressed college student. Take precaution and do the math!!(Edit: I forgot. Portions have also decreased dramatically. If you look at my delivery food photos you can see holes where food should have been. They used to pack everything in. Not anymore apparently....) 3 2 
You can get a free meal on your birthday if you sign up for it beforehand. It's been hit or miss the few times I've gone. But whenever they've had the Kaya Fest the food is always sooo much better and tastier than what they usually serve in the resturant so just go to that! 3 4 
They have awesome beers and that is the best thing about this place. It is also a more relaxed option for eating in the area. The price-quality balance with the food is not the best. But it is mainly a busy pub. With the beers you can't go wrong. Have been here a couple of times and usually find my way back every now and then. 3 4 
Their menu is pretty diverse and their appetizers are my favourite that I've tried so far. Must-trys are the Green Mango Salad (sweet slices of green mango topped with fish sauce) and the Calamari (fried to crispy perfection without being overly oily). For the entrees, I tried 2 different curry dishes (lamb and duck) and 2 noodle dishes (pad thai and glass noodles). Wasn't a big fan of the curry, I found it to be overly sweet with too much coconut sauce so it overpowered the meaty flavour. But i think in general I'm more of a Malaysian Curry lover than Thai anyways. But what won me over were their Pad Thai and the Pad Woon Sen dishes. They were sooo yummy and flavourful - i loved it.The waitstaff was super friendly but service was a bit on the slow side but I didn't mind too much since it was pretty packed. Overall , it was good meal. 3 4 
One of the best vanilla lattes I have ever tasted! It has a pure vanilla flavour without the excessive sweetness that flavoured lattes tend to possess. The brewed coffee was also delicious; dark and strong without being bitter.  They have a full menu of fair trade coffee and tea options to choose from and the staff will adjust the drink to suit your preference. The baked goods didn't really appeal to me for breakfast but the brownies would make a great late night treat along with your delicious latte!The inside is clean and comfortable. Not exactly cozy, but I agree with the reviews calling it sleek. Its a really nice place to go for a relaxing chat.I will definitely go back! I'm looking forward to trying more things from their menu including the Macadamia nut latte.**update: I changed the rating to 3.5 after trying some other lattes. They're really sweet even at half the original sweetness, Its still a nice place to meet up with someone for a relaxing brew. 3 4 
do not eat if your diet lately has been healthy. your stomach gonna hurt real bad. other then that classic drunk food. mini burgers fries and a cherry coke. 3 1 
Been there several times and they serve the best steak I've had in Madison.  A good place to have a conversation or a special night.  You do have to like their ambiance. For my wife and I though it was too pretentious.  Too artificial.  Too stiff.  Too self aware.  They need to pull it back and relax just a bit.  This is Madison.  But again, the food, though pricey is outstanding. 3 4 
We were in Pittsburgh on a family reunion two weeks ago.  My wife and I wanted to try some of the local restaurants and stumble upon Jimmy Wans.  The restaurant looked interesting with a great decor.  The staff was very responsive and the service was good.Unfortunately, the food missed the mark.  For the starter, I had the wanton soup and my wife had the spring roll.  Tasteless, similar to Glenn C. opinion.  We had already ordered the entrees - kung pao chicken and  szechuan beef  -- They were large portions but again tasteless.  The Staff tried to help, but they were not the problem.  We talked to other at the reunion later, and were total the Fox Chapel restaurant was new in the chain and that it had some growing pains.  Maybe it will get better after they "season"  the chef.    After eating int the Strip District, this just didn't cut it. 3 2 
my wife and i went on a saturday afternoon . the place was busy,( always a good sign). The pho I got was good and flavorful But i think that the sandwitches are are the best! yum! Im there for the sandwitches 3 4 
Pizza was ok, mozzarella sticks not too great, tiramisu was partially frozen. I asked for ranch twice (with the pizza and again with the mozzarella sticks) and didn't get any. Probably won't order here again. 3 2 
THe service was not the best.  The lady argued that we received the number for our order, when we were the only ones in the restaurant at the time.  The Salmon was bland.  The beef was flavourful.  We had asked for tap water.  We had to ask again.  The lady put the pitcher down and gave 3 cups without saying anything.  We will not come again. 3 2 
First time eating there the food was good but the atmosphere and service was lacking.  Was not busy, dining area had trays with dirty dishes laying around. We had to ask for silverware.  Some tables were set up others were half set up. This place is opened 24 hours maybe it should have business hours like other restaurants of this type.  We felt like we were at Denny's at 4 in the morning.  Don't go there on purpose. Ok place if your hungry and you happen to be by it. 3 2 
Nice patio and deck.  Ok wine.  I was hoping for a wine tasting experience but it wasn't offered.   Expensive food.  I had planned to get a glass of wine and asked for a taste.  It was a little more than a sip - I ended up ordering the glass and was still charged for the tasting.   Only $.50 but still annoying. 3 2 
After reading the previous reviews, I feel very fortunate because I rented a very nice apartment in Shadyside for one year and had no problems with the landlord. 3 4 
We went here for lunch.  Other than the flan (which why I didn't give it one star) everything else was just bland.  Not worth the money. 3 2 
I would love a window seat during a thunder storm!! I wasn't sure if validated parking was available for lunch... The website only mentioned dinner and weekends.The prices were decent! A bottle of wine will run you up quite a bit. I made reservations online last week but wouldn't get a window table since it's made a month in advance. We started with the crab and tuna salad and the raw oysters. Both were great! Our entrees were probably less than ideal, my lobster clubhouse fell apart. The land and sea was a very small portion and was unfavoured. I would probably want to see the dinner menu myself. I would be unwilling to go during summer or winterlicious as you don't get to see the classic menu.For dessert, I shared the chocolate torte and it was delicious!! I would definitely get that again :)Hope this helps!-jT 3 4 
Not sure what management is doing but it seems like this location is always understaffed and they are super slow with orders. 3 2 
Great smoothie but super slow service. Seems they don't have good organization of who doing what? The cashier went back to the counter to make smoothie but no one attends the new customers, who ended up leaving. I wait probably 10 mins for a smoothie. 3 2 
Great old fashioned food except for the OWNER'S audacity to request a tip for his service.. Completely taken aback Makes you NOT want to return and kinda turns you off 3 2 
My mom and I wanted to do a girls pamper and chose this spa as it had a special groupon. They were unprepared for two people even though we'd made an appointment, and the cd skipped during our 'relaxing' time . The facial was ok, the wraps good, and the massage average. I'd choose another spa if you're really looking for elite treatment, although for basic upkeep, this one is worth a shot. 3 2 
Why would an obviously great diagnostic internist with a fantastic radio show and a terrific bedside manner and a caring attitude not be able to find the time to answer a written correspondence from a patient with a problem? 3 2 
A bunch of us were in town all at the same time and we decided to grab a quick bite and Shibuya was able to fit us in on short notice AND they had a pretty decent tasting menu to boot!  We were very pleased with everything, the kitchen substituted soy wrappers for seaweed without a peep OR a charge(!) and the wait staff was very helpful and friendly.  Definitely loved the kampachi sashimi but the beef on the winter tasting menu was not very tender and also cold when it came out but we still enjoyed everything else. 3 4 
i have been here a few times. it is not the prettiest laundromat, but there were a lot of open machines, the inside is clean, and the people that work there are very nice and helpful.  And super capacity washers, great for cleaning beddings. Oh and automatic doors! they are also a dry cleaners. i have noticed they have a drive up window for your dry cleaning. 3 4 
Great place for a traditional fresh french bistro meal. Wine list was good - great service too. The duck was a little overdone so I'd say head over for an earlier meal. They cater to an older crowd who dines earlier it seemed. 3 4 
They have the lowest rates around Peoria and Sun City for manis and pedis but I can't stand to patronize any business that has Fox News on TV's for customers 3 1 
I don't really know why but i expected to not quite enjoy Honey Bear's BBQ. Most of that is because when i think of BBQ anything i don't think of buying it more someone outside cooking it for me. Yet when i went in I can say I enjoyed. I ate the shredded chicken sandwich and was super happy with it. Though not a go to place if i get the craving I will pop back in again. 3 4 
I have visited the lunch buffet here at The Host a few times, it's great... for the price. Can you really complain about a $12 All-You-Can-Eat?You are not going to get the top of the line fine dining you may expect going our for a fancy dinner, but for a quick lunch buffet you really can't complain. I especially liked the chance to try ALL the items, then go back for more of what I enjoyed the most. I would definitely recommend The Host for the Indian Food Newbie (like me) who wants to try new things, but doesn't want to leave a plate full of something leftover that you didn't like.I also noticed some lack of interest from the wait staff, but in the end the overall experience was good enough to come back to. 3 4 
Pretty alright. We went in with a buy one get one coupon, and we might return if we had another. Ordered fish & chips, and a turkey burger. The fish & chips turned out nice, the turkey burger was not nice.Turkey burger's meat was spicy for some reason, and came with house-made thousand island which was also spicy for some reason. I don't mean an eye-wateringly powerful spice, or an interesting spice that added to the flavor profile, just an unadvertised "I wouldn't have ordered this had I known in advance" kind of spice. Beyond that, the flavors and textures didn't mesh or impress. And I'm sorry to not be sorry here, but I've grown tired of eleven dollar burgers that are so huge that you can't eat them without a knife and fork. I ended up taking half of this thing home, and then couldn't bring myself to eat it because it was so unimpressive.Otherwise, service was nice enough, and ambiance was okay (construction going on in another part of the building, so there was loud beeping and drilling that echoed around the open floor plan). The five-starry reviews around Yelp are speaking of their regular burgers, so maybe if we ever return we will split one of those between two people. Maybe with another coupon... 3 2 
I was very excited to be staying at Luxor when my friends and I booked here for 4 nights but left wishing I had stayed somewhere else.First when we got to Luxor the check-in line was ridiculous. I swear of everywhere i've stayed in Vegas this has got to have the longest/slowest lines. After about 45 minutes waiting in line we finally got our room on the very top and we were dissappointed. The room was plain and very uninviting & I didn't dig the slanted wall at all.I really didn't like the layout or the feel of the casino floor so I didn't end up playing that much there.Spent some time at the pool and did like that because it was a decent pool and was not crazy busy.Nobody at the casino was mean or rude to us just didn't like the vibe.On a high note my friends and I ran into Criss Angel 3 times while there. Once we were in the elevator (inclinator) and I didnt even notice until a friend poked me and said something. The next time was right outside of the elevator and I was going to go ask for an autograph but his bodyguard looked like if I came close he was going to tackle me and he was on his cell phone yelling at someone so I declined to get near him. The last time was once again at the elevator.I dont hate this place but until their rooms are more inviting and the vibe is better I wont be booking a room there...I might come for a short visit though. 3 2 
If you like music, bands, dancing this is for you.  If you like food and drinks, it is okay if you can get past poor service and staff that do not seem to like to work there.  We enjoyed for the music and dancing, so it was okay for us, but service really needs to be improved. 3 2 
I went to le bremner for my birthday back in december 2015 and I was disapointed with my experience. We told the waiter to surprise us all the way through and I will never do this again we weren't happy with their choices and felt that the dishes they served us really weren't their best dishes. The oysters were fantastic and the trout gravlax as well. We also had a buratta entree which was good but nothing to rave about. The main dish they served us was a whole fish with the spine and all and was not impressed. The other main was mushroom risotto which is usually my favorite but it was way too salty very hard to eat. Lasty was the pancakes for dessert which were very good. Overall my experience was not good enough to say id go back especially considering the price. 3 2 
Decided to try after many friends recommended. Portabello fries amazing! And unfortunately that's was the best part of the meal. Very disappointed with the rest. Porterhouse steak was ordered medium, came out almost well done & over salted. No one checked on how our steak was prepared. Brussels sprouts were very bitter and not properly prepared. Didn't even want to chance desert. 3 2 
This place is right down the street from my house. It's close and in a great location (small shopping mall with a Zipps).I really, really want to like this place, but for some reason the Barista's cannot get my order right! I do not like 3 pumps of any flavor in my latte, it's frankly too much flavor. Especially vanilla, it is already strong on it's own. Not sure why all these places claim to have the best coffee and espresso yet mask if with all the sugary flavors! All I ask for is a one pump vanilla latte, that's it! By the time I get to my car to take my first sip, it's ALWAYS WRONG. Guess I should drink it at the table to make sure it's right. I even see the barista write it down on the cup. Hmm not sure the disconnect here.If you are looking for free wifi and a decent selection, check this place out. Just make sure you bring enough $$ so they don't charge the ridiculous .50 charge for using a card! 3 2 
Love the great home decor and housewares section! Almost too many racks of clothes to sort through, high quality brands but usually a little out dated. Prices can be a little high but do go down the longer the item has been there. Staff is friendly and helpful. They have a rewards program to earn store credit and send emails with special discount days! 3 4 
I'm a regular here however I received a pedicure and a gel manicure but the older gal stepped on my toe and ruined the polish while giving me a manicure. She then cut me 3 times drawing blood and totally skipped the hand massage at the end bc 4 women walked in. She also insisted i pay before helping to re-pain the toe she ruined. Service is huge and she rushed the best part and caused me pain. 3 2 
French onion soup was watery with little taste.  We sent it back and were refunded the cost.  The wait staff also forgot that we were there for a birthday and didn't bring out a candle for dessert.  On the plus side my trout was wonderful and my wife enjoyed her scallops.  We've been a number of times but this last meal has tarnished that "must visit" image.  Pricing is reasonable for Vegas and reservations can usual be booked same day. 3 2 
I was excited to try this place based on the reviews.  We were greeted promptly and seated a few minutes later.  My first observation was how outrageously loud the music was.  The server basically had to lean in and yell to explain the menu.  Forget about any conversation with my girlfriend, we couldn't hear each other in the booth we were in.  The main course came out before the appetizer which was annoying.  Five small wings for $6 wasn't worth it.  I ordered the spicy chile wings and received the bbq wings, I didn't say anything since I torn on which type to get in the first place.  The only reason I would come back is to try the pretzel bites, which they ran out of.  Also the parking lot was large so you don't have to worry about finding a space.  2.5 stars for being disappointed, but I will round up to 3 for ambience of the brewery. I might come back for a beer, not food. 3 2 
We tried this place last night.  I'll get right to the point...  The tots had good flavor but were cold in the center.  The wings were not good at all.  I appreciate the effort on the smoke, but you HAVE TO drop the wings in the fryer to crisp up the skin.  The sauce was not spicy either.  I would have preferred a traditional buffalo sauce like Franks.  The fish and chips were ok.  No lemon with them.  The fries were soggy/soft.  The beer was OK.  About as good as Four Peaks.  The service was good.  I am always amazed at these Scottsdale bars/breweries that have nothing to do but stare at a TV.  Pool tables, shuffle board, darts would be nice... We actually cashed out and went to Fate for a pizza cuz we didn't finish the food at SBC.  We may try it again.  Maybe not.... 3 2 
Great food but I've gone 3 times in the past few weeks and they never have anything in stock. I tried to go yesterday but there was no rice left (white or brown), no chicken, and only 1 person working both food line and register. I'm going to give them another chance because I love the food but it's a bit ridiculous to never have any to serve. 3 2 
Place is funny, bartender was telling this guys wife some very crazy things he was going to do to her....not for the light hearted. 3 2 
Service sucked!!! They take your order right away and then disappear. They reappear a year later with the bill in hand. Never checked in on us to see if we needed anything. When flagged down and asked them for something they make it seem like you just asked them for their first born child. Food 5 stars service 2 stars. 3 2 
Nice place.  Reasonable price.  Some of the staff might not have the most perfect English.  But mostly understandable.  As most guys probably don't need anything super elaborate this should be fine.Cheers, 3 4 
Upon my husband's and my arrival we were met with a hostess with an attitude.  We could sit outside immediately or wait for 25 min. to be seated inside. Which would have been fine but we asked about the empty table right behind her and she said, "oh, I didn't know it was available and showed us to the patio while we waited 10 min for the empty table inside. Why? it was already ready? After being seated we waited at least 10 min before we were acknowledged at our table.  Finally, we were asked what drinks we would like and that took another 10 min. And, then, my husband asked for bread and olive oil which also took another 10 min and had a "dollop" of olive oil. Our waitress never asked us if we had any questions re: the menu, once we ordered she never came back to ask if we needed anything else or if the food was to our liking.  Food is fresh and tastes good.  The portions are smaller than most restaurants but we did not find that a problem.  We shared the fennel salad, both had a main course, a glass of wine each and our bill was $70! Now that is expensive, especially when the restaurant's service is way below expectations for this chef's restaurant. The food is not worth the price, the service is awful and there too many other options in the valley to choose from. We won't be back and will not recommend it to anyone. 3 1 
Cheap and right down the street, but they don't take appointments. Ann is great for eyelashes though, the best in central Phoenix. 3 4 
Decided to take the family for a late Saturday breakfast .  The waffles were quite tasty, and the fruit toppings were fresh.  Great selections and variety.  The place had a "local" moms/pops feel to it which was nice.  The breakfast waffle came with eggs and choice of meat...and unlimited coffee.  My daughter ordered the Yooni special which was so yummy- strawberries, bananas topped with chocolate sauce and a large scoop of vanilla ice cream, almost too pretty to eat!  My son devoured a plain waffle topped with powdered sugar and whipped cream (we added bananas for a small add'l charge).  Pros:  Variety, taste, fresh fruit, price and friendliness of staff. Cons:  Waffles were kind of cold, no refills on soda (cans)Overall, it was a good experience. 3 4 
I have a love/annoyed relationship with this place.  The love part is it is at the end of my street, about 10 seconds away.  The annoyed part is every time I go in there I end up spending $20 on like 2 or 3 items.  However, as a person with food requirements their selection of organic, vegan, wheat free, dairy free, etc is excellent.  It is always the same friendly guy working there and he is always suggesting new things to try, the last being tofu bacon which now makes a tomato sandwich a real treat!  I wish I could shop here full time but the reality is I just can't afford it.  I do visit occasionally as they stock a few of my dairy free staples and the location is just too convenient for me to ignore. 3 4 
After reviewing Port City Club a few days ago based on an excellent lunch, I had dinner there with my wife on a busy Friday night.  Obviously the place is doing very well, because the restaurant was packed.  But, to accommodate its popularity they have lined tables up ridiculously close to one another.  We had tables on either side of us that were 14-15" away.  We were unable to carry on any kind of private conversation.  The waiters either reach over the person sitting with their back to the room, or squeeze between the tables with their butt hanging over the table.  I have never seen anyplace, even in New York City, put tables this close.  Maybe the crowd indicates that customers are willing to put up with this, but I am not.  I might try a weeknight to see if that is more comfortable, because the food is very good, but this was not a good experience. 3 2 
Four girls squeezed into a booth. Cue a "movie" waiter. My friend named our waiter as someone you would see in a comedy movie or sitcom--talkative, funny-ish, and always popping up at random times for small chat. Needless to say, our server was very attentive (e.g., good at recommending/not recommending dishes, clearing the table). He skated the *annoying* line very closely, never crossed it though so hurrah.Food got thumbs up from us: Med. pizza (really delicious and big for $9), Bison burger (fries were a hit), jambalaya, and dopple chop (it was good, but pricey at $20 for what is received). Drink-wise: Belgian pale ale (ugh, no. a bit of an off-taste), torched cherry caiprissima (too much lime juice for me, but my friend loved it), and don juan (nice). Overall, a good experience.  But not a place I would have cravings for or feel the need to re-visit. It felt like a safe night-out dinner. Plus you can wear what you'd like, I saw fashions of all kinds without much judgment. 3 4 
Great little place on Kingston. We have only been here for brunch but the dinner menu looks good. For brunch I usually go for the Breakfast and those HP potatoes are amazing! Perfectly crispy on the outside and soft on the inside. Portions are a little small but perfect for if you're not feeling too hungry. 3 4 
It is very cheap to eat there and the service is good, but the food is lacking. If you need a cheap place to go, this is the place. If you want quality Mexican food, go somewhere else. 3 2 
After reading reviews on Google and here on Yelp I wasn't looking forward to our visit to Central Psychiatry.  But I figured if I did not like it here, I would just get another referral from my sons doctor.  I took my son here about a month ago.  I signed in and checked the box that my son was a 1st time patient.  The girl at the front desk welcomed us. Our appointment was with Kristy Muir.  There was a lot of people in the waiting room and I was hearing from some of them that they were waiting for an hour or over an hour so I expected to wait at least an hour.  And we did.  After an hour they called my son back.  Kristy seemed professional and understanding and I feel that my son had good communication with her.  So our visit with her, I feel, went really well.  She gave us free samples of some meds that would last 30 days.So my sons follow up appointment with Kristy was last Wednesday, April 15th.  We were there on time and again the waiting room was really crowded this time around so I expected to wait at least an hour to an hour and a half.  I signed in, we sat down.  20 minutes later, Kristy called my son...AWESOME!  Only a 20 minute wait.  I had heard others saying they had been there for 2 hours already but they must have been waiting to see one of the other Doctors.  We were out of there in 40 mins.  So that day went really well.  Now today, I am trying to call their offices about the prescription my son received last Wednesday and I get a message saying "the number you are trying to reach is out of service".  So this sucks, because I really need to get a hold of them today.  So I will keep on trying.  Other than trying to contact them by phone, our overall experience was good. 3 4 
FOOD  above average  - Really enjoyed the seaweed omelette, broccoli shrimp, and octopus wasabi starter. SERVICE below average - they had enough staff just need better training on speed and attentiveness.AMBIANCE average - great noise level perfect for a date or equally a large group VALUE above average - like similar restos in this category good value.  $40 or less for food and drink per person.OVERALL - an average restaurant in the city.  If you are looking for something new, give it a try.  But we are on the fence on whether to give it a second go. 3 2 
My daughter and I were in Whitby Wednesday afternoon and decided to do sushi for lunch. So we decided on Sushi Today after checking the reviews and was recommended by my son who ate there quite often.We were seated right away and it was not busy maybe a dozen tables were occupied. We were quickly served and got our drinks right away. We placed our order and the food arrived pretty quickly compared to most sushi AYCE (all you can eat) I've been too.The sushi was alright some fell apart when picking them up. The orders kept coming and they were constantly rearranging our table as they placed our orders down. The servers were constantly removing our dishes as they were completed and to a point where our conversation was always being interrupted that we felt we were being rushed.I'm giving three stars for the food but zero for the service which was rushed and rude. The price was good but the service was bad and they rushed you to pay your bill.I'll probably never return because I've been to better sushi places around Durham region. 3 4 
It is too bad that my review will echo what the majority of others have experienced here. Quick to seat for sure but then it is like you are invisible. Food is so-so for a place that appears nice - decor is great but that is it. By far the best deal is lunch bufffet. I have absolutely given up on evening meals here. Potential is great but falls way short. 3 2 
I was dragged here by my friend, considering the fact that I don't even eat meat, I almost dreaded going but she did say that they had the best shakes so I'm always down for that. So we get there, we have the nicest waiter, Sam, place us inside. The interior is neat. We order shakes and he tells us, there is no ice cream....um ok. So I order lemonade, then he tells us there is no lemonade. UMMM... Ya. I ended up getting a cream soda and a pretzel and the Belgian fries with Sriacha. Delicious!! I will probably come back because I am still curious about these shakes :) 3 4 
1. Pad thai- Not ketchup-based or too sweet. Mine was salty but it would've been good if it was less salty. Not spicy. Comes with shrimp and chicken. 2. Vermicelli with spring roll, shrimp on sugar cane- Spring rolls were small and over-fried. Shrimp on sugar cane was bigger than other places. 3 2 
I was here the other day for lunch and, as expected, there was a bit of a line.  That's usually a good sign, and in this case it's definitely true. But waiting for a table isn't all bad; there's lots to see in this place: kitchy cute decor and lots of memoribilia that reminded me of my childhood. When I was there, the place was cramped and full of hungry people, but everyone was in good spirits. When I look at the menu, i always find it difficult to make a choice. They've got a big, diverse menu with both savory and sweet items. All of it looks delicious.  First off, I'm a vegetarian, but, like to get the breakfast pocket, sans pemeal bacon of course.  It's chock full of fluffy eggs, caramelized onions, mayo and cheddar cheese on a warm and soft onion bun. Aunties and Uncles encourages you to choose between a few sides, but I've never chose anything but the potato salad. Seriously, this stuff is good. A great combo of chunky red potatoes, dill, Dijon and spices, it's savoury and creamy. Admittedly, my food did and usually does take a bit of time to arrive, so if you go, don't go when you're in a hurry.Fruit juices and iced teas are good choices, but I wouldn't finish off with an espresso as they may suggest. Their espresso is nothing special and just plain weak, and it certainly doesn't stand up to Manic coffee located just a few doors down. If you're craving an after-meal-caffiene-fix, I'd suggest you head over to Manic.Aunties and Uncles loses points in service. The service staff seem a bit cold, sorta aloof, and alot grouchy, but despite if you're willing to overlook that, then this is worth a visit if you're in the College & Bathurst area. 3 4 
I went in for a cut and color last month. The color turned out okay but the cut is messed up. When I called to make the appointment the owner (recognized the name from the reviews here) answered and I asked for someone experienced because I have very fine hair. I obviously didn't get someone with much experience. Will not be going back. 3 1 
Meh? I don't know, maybe I have had enough of this type of over the top food.  Service was friendly and attentive. The place was mostly empty around 6pm on a Friday. Nice outdoor deck.  Fried green tomatoes were pretty good.  Their namesake dish? It's some ok fried chicken on top of some ok waffles served with watered down maple syrup. Nothing life changing. The menu is more TGI Friday's than soul food.  Beware the "Drank".  Tastes like something you would give to a toddler in a sippy cup but it's got a kick.  I  ended up walking around Gilbert for 90 minutes to sober up after drinking one little 8oz glass of the stuff. 3 2 
I had mixed feelings about this place. My wife walked and it was packed, but we were seated right away. We noticed right away that it was really warm. Apparently the A/C was out which I know does happen so not totally knocking them on that. But we trying to escape the heat, so made it much more uncomfortable. I had a beer which was fine. My wife on the other hand tried a couple of their mixed drinks and they were awful. You couldn't taste any of the alcohol which made them super weak. For a $10 drink I would expect them to be much better. She tried two drinks and they were both disappointing. However, the food was really good. We tried the buffalo egg rolls and they were delicious. The dressing it came with was really tasty. We both tried different burgers and they were also good. The meat was perfectly cooked, but just too much bun. I ate half the burger and then just the other half without the bun. I am not a big guy, but I can usually grub. There was nothing wrong with the bun at all, but just be prepared for it. I probably would have been ok if we didn't have the appetizers, but I would take the egg rolls over the bun any day.For an $80 meal with drinks I thought it was just ok. Cooler tempature would have made the experience much more enjoyable. The right thing to do would have been to offer their customers some type of discount since we technically pay for the A/C and we didn't get any of it. However, we will never order any of their mixed drinks again. They seriously need to step that up.Overall this place looks like a cool place to watch a game. 3 2 
Hotpot is the perfect food to for this season. This is our regular hotpot spot my boyfriend and I usually go to because they offer wide range of sauces and food selection also their soup broths taste very homemade. For 15.99 (roughly)  AYCE after 10pm special during the weekdays  Kim Tao is def a must try. 3 4 
Frozen hot chocolate! Amazing. Service? Sucked. 3 2 
I've been eating here now for over 4 years from highschool until now my sophomore year in college, and I have to say they are on their way out because at one point their food was to be reckoned with and now it's just bleh. Last time I was there I was really disappointed by the service. One lady working and I seemed to bother her to give her business. 3 2 
Excellent food, with so-so service. I've been here several times and have never been disappointed in my food. The food is excellent and the portions are always very generous. My two favorites have been the lasagna and the chicken parmigiana. My husband and I always order a side salad and split it because they're so huge!The bar leaves a lot to be desired. I have not been too impressed with the bartenders-- always lacking in personality as well as craftsmanship.Waitstaff are much like the bartenders... Just so-so. Seem to lack any real personality. 3 4 
Barhop is an excellent west end option for those seeking great beer and food. The garlic doughnuts are heaven and Mussel Monday's an affordable, awesome treat! They bring in a lot of exclusive US craft beers and some great local ones as well. Be prepared for a long wait on a table if you are arriving anytime after 6PM until 10 or so. 3 4 
-----------------------------

Pros-Always seated quicklyFood is great - 5 stars for food Price point is very good - you definitely get your money's worthCons -Depending on who you get the servers are often very slow, disorganized, nonchalant ~ such a shame! 4 3 
Their baked and regular pancakes are great, we went there two weeks in a row which we never do. The service is also upscale. 4 3 
The setting is spectacular. Brunch menu was interesting but a little limited.  The Eggs Benedict was average (very little sauce,eggs a bit too runny) but the (albino) carrot soup was excellent.  The chocolate dessert was a bit much for me, but my companion ate every mouthful.  The creme brulee with chambord and pomegranate was excellent.  Nice selection of teas.  The service was pretty slow, but the assistant manager came buy to let us know that dessert was complimentary because of our wait.  Now THAT is good business! 4 3 
Ok, I have to admit that I didn't do -any- shopping here, so this review is strictly based on the artwork/decore/architecture throughout the mall. It's freakin awesome.My brother and I were walking through and he pointed to these colored columns standing in a pool of water and said he thought they were ice. I told him no way, how the heck would that work? Well, sure enough, we walked up to them and there was a metal pole running up through them keeping them frozen. Futher in, we walked by about 20 or so clear columns that had whirpools bobbing up and down, also very cool.Even the information center/guest services desk is very artistic, with a restaurant above that looks like a bird built it (sort of like a woven basket)...honestly, this review doesn't do it justice at all. Even if you don't plan on shopping, this place is worth stopping by just to walk through :) 4 1 
Love this place!  Great food and healthy too.  A great variety of choices on the menu. 4 5 
LOVE this restaurant. My family has been going to the downtown location for a long long long time. We couldn't be happier when we knew they have a second location at Bayview Village, since it's our favourite mall and it's closer to our home. The food and the service are excellent. We go there almost every Sunday; sometimes for Dim Sum, sometimes for dinner. It's suprised to see they were temporarily closed due to some health issue few weeks ago. I checked their inspection history on DineSafe. They got a green on April 7, and about a month later, they got a red. How bad things would go in just a month? Since we shop around the mall quite often, we know the managers in all the restaurants quite well. Pearl's managers as well of course. They told me because the Public Health Department received a complaint from just one customer, saying she didn't feel well after eating at Pearl. There are a lot of reasons to cause one person felt sick. I hope the Health Department checked all the restaurants that she went to on those days. It seems to me maybe the inspector thought it's a slap in his face that he passed the restaurant not long ago, and then someone felt sick after eaten there. One of the owners of Aroma espresso bar said they got a yellow one month after their opening. That's quite funny to me. How unsanitized they can get for a month?I believe in Bayview Village and Pearl. As the upscale shopping mall in North York, Bayview Village won't allow any restaurant to put customers' health in risk. They must have their professional cleaning and pest control team to ensure the great health conditions. As for Pearl, they had been in the industry for so many years. I think they know about what sanitized environment means. They wouldn't risk customers' health like that. Just saying..... 4 5 
It's pretty good for the burgers. The fries though weren't good. Seemed like they were frozen. The have a nice bar area. And even an outdoor area. Once the weather is better that will be great! 4 3 
I have always had great experiences at Downtownfood and would highly recommend. I have been here for lunch, dinner and special events, and dtf has done all of these well. During the work week, they do a $25 3 course prix fixe menu, which is an excellent value. The service is always great, and a nice atmosphere as well.  Can't wait for Chef D-Mac to open his new restaurant in Mission! 4 5 
Perfect for a cheat day. Love going there and love taking my kids there! Always a friendly staff. Been there a lot of times and always had a positive experience 4 5 
First off I am an nurse and ur optic nerve is the connection between the back of the eye and the brain. So the last review is a total joke. We bought a deal on groupon and were very very satisfied with Dr. Cramer. I would recommend him to my MOM. It really bothers me to see posts like that. Dr. Cramer was very friendly and down go earth.  I will definitely be going back 4 5 
Well.  Here's the thing:When it's good, it's good!  When it's bad, it's pretty bad.  I've had some pretty tasty dinners here, and the portions are such that I can get about three meals out of a dinner combo.  Awesome, considering it's costs like $8 or something.  But then I tried the Hunan Beef and it was awful.  No flavor and a strange texture.I give it 4 stars because I don't want to change their rating.  If you get the right things (which so far have been General Tsao's Chicken and Sesame Chicken), then it's good.  But some things are very mediocre to... not good.I will definitely go back.  Great price, generally good Chinese food, and pretty giant portions for the price! 4 3 
Stayed here for 4 days and 3 nights with my boyfriend, another couple and my friend's brother! So 5 people in a 2 bedroom suite. Loved it! Plenty of space for everyone. My boyfriend and I stayed in the master bedroom, it was very spacious and had a very big  bathroom with a nice tub for baths. The kitchenette was so great, we cooked several meals and made lots of drinks! The one thing they didn't have was dishwasher soap. The front desk was very friendly and helpful. Whenever we needed our trash picked up or more towels they brought them within minutes. We drove to Vegas from California and got to the hotel early, I requested and early check in and they were able to get us in 2 hours before check in. Also they provide shuttle service to and from the strip which was GREAT! Only reason I can't give it 5 stars is because one of the days while I was taking a shower the water got cold and stayed cold - never a good thing! 4 5 
Came on a recommendation from a friend. We had the chilli chicken dry, the chilli shrimp dry, the Manchurian mix fried rice and the chicken pakoras. My favourite dish was the Manchurian Mixed Fried Rice - it was just the right level of spice - it's definitely got some kick to it so if you aren't a big spicy food eater you might want to ask them to tone it down. Portion size was huge! We had enough for lunch and dinner the next day. Underwhelming was the chicken pakoras - they were not that great compared to others we have had from at other Hakka places. They were also quite pricy for what you were getting. They also came last which was a bit odd since usually they come as appetizers. We were halfway through our meal when they arrived and only had one each since our plates were full. I know people rave about the prices at this place but it was only reasonable - not a super great deal. Our go to Hakka place is about 20 dollars cheaper and it's good food too! I would still come again though 4 3 
I've heard so many good things about this place I decided to check it out! I had a fun night out planned and scheduled an appt 1.5hrs before I was meeting up with my friends. What an amazing idea!!!! Never will I ever do my own hair again! Walked in with my makeup and outfit on and walked out with great hair! This place is seriously icing on the cake to complete your look! My stylist nailed the style I was looking for, everyone was super friendly as well.Side note.... I was really looking forward to an adult beverage while getting styled but was never offered anything?? Maybe I misunderstood other reviews on that?? Would have been a nice touch on my overall experience!I will definitely be back!!! 4 5 
Best vegan or vegetarian food in this area hands down! The brunch is amazing, the quinoa fries are insane!!!! Most options are healthy, lots if gluten or dairy free meals, including dessert. The juice is also amazing. Everything is fairly expensive, but you get what you pay for. It's crowded in here and not kid friendly, so make a reservation. A quick cheaper option is the sandwiches they have in a cooler for lunches. 4 5 
Took clients and their wives for dinner.  The experience was over the top.  The service the minute we sat down to the very end was exceptional.  The food was outstanding and the portions were very good.  Everyone at the table had a great time.  We definitely plan on going back......if you want to make a positive impression on someone special in your life......bring them here. 4 5 
Solid poutine, and the classic et cetera tasters is good for those looking to try different beers without having to commit to a full pint! 4 3 
Not sure why all the bad reviews are on here. Me and my wife went and had a great time. Got to the hotel at 1:00 and our room was ready. The lady who helped us was extremely helpful. The location and amenities were great. We relaxed by the pool and had a pleasant experience there too. The reason for four instead of five stars was the rude lady at the spa area. She could have been nicer about the gym situation. Basically she questioned whether we were guest but showed our guest keys. She looked us up in the system and we were guest but she questioned our resort fee? Finally she called someone and said it was a glitch in their system and let us in....without an apology. Overall it was a fun experience and are planning our next trip back to Vegas already. 4 3 
My favorite yogurt place. I like coming there on a warm day after a meal or just to grab something sweet and their variety is pretty great. If you are on a low fat diet, watching your sugar or none of that matters you will enjoy LULU's. 4 5 
We wanted to try a good crepe place in Arizona that was comparable to Crepevine in California, but I can't compare the two because the crepes here are totally different.Le chalet has a more french cafe atmosphere.  Service was a little slower pace compared to a chain restaurant, which was good.  We didn't feel rushed to quickly eat our food and get out.  We received a complimentary appetizer, which was very good.  We ordered a Croque Monsieur which could have been an entree for one of us that tasted a lot better than a regular ham and cheese sandwich.  The crepes had the right amount of cheese and meat none of which overwhelmed the whole crepe.  We ordered the Crepe Tatin which was a little heavy on the caramel, but still tasted good.  The apples were fresh, whipped cream was light, and the toasted almonds added a nice crunch. 4 3 
*amazing customer service, staff were very friendly and welcoming *huge portions, great flavors, affordable prices *order the beef rice bowl! *would definitely recommend :) 4 5 
Definetely my favorite place to eat when I'm low on cash. This place is a wrestler dream. They make any pizza you desire and all you have to do is ask. For a 7 dollar buffet it's definetely your best bet for cheap! 4 5 
I have been a member at LVAC for almost 5 years and have visited almost every location. But the North Decatur gym is by far the best. Friendly staff, state of the art equipment, and everything is always very clean. Unfortunately it is one of the higher volume locations, so parking is difficult at certain times. But all around, it is a spectacular gym! 4 5 
I meant to leave a review the last time I ate here this place is truly AWESOME!!! I had a great experience and the food I ate was tasty and there was a great variety. Best Buffett I have eaten at in a long time. Highly recommend!!! 4 5 
The room feels slightly empty, but it's still a decent place to go for dinner. Not really a "date night" feel. The food is 3.5 star. Most of their dishes come with home made pasta. Their meats and cheeses are said to be aged and cured in house- which were delicious. Their desserts need some work. We ordered the tiramisu, which lacked the rum, so it was dry, a banana split that was made with gelato and the canolis. The cream in the canolis had too much citrus, it was overwhelming. The bar has several different types of wine, but they don't know how to make an old fashion. When I described it, they literally threw an orange slice and a cherry into a big glass of bourbon. The reason for the 4 star was because of Pasquale.  He makes this restaurant. His service is so personalized and so genuine. Although it wasn't busy, he made us feel like the only table in the restaurant. We will come back because of him. 4 3 
Excellent experience.  Stayed here for four nights.  Rooms are very clean with everything you need.  The staff here is above average, friendly and helpful.  Front desk staff are great - you definitely get service with a smile here.  Pool is great,  relaxing and comfy lounge chairs.  If you want a more lively scene just hop over to the Mandalay Bay pool.  This is a great option for anyone who wants to balance the  typical Vegas experience with some R&R.  The spa was also excellent.  Had a massage   with Katrina who is top notch. 4 5 
Maha's mind blowing chicken sandwich is the signature. 2 hours wait is their signature too. If you have lots of free time it's worth trying the food but if your time is valuable 2 hours is gonna cost you at least 100 bucks interms of time. Need to upgrade the place to a bigger one. I won't go since I don't like the waiting time. 4 3 
I went to here the other day. It had a lot of places to sit (most of which were occupied), free wifi, but no power outlets that I could find.The latte I had was beautiful, but not super exciting flavourwise. I've been spoiled entirely by the Sam James Espresso Bar. The one from here, was probably the second best one I've had in the city so far though.It seems like the perfect place for both hanging out (there are cozy spaces behind the coffee bar) and group work (they have giant tables by the windows) and it's a great location (close to Kensiginton Market.) They do charge extra for soy milk, and it was the second most expensive latte I've had, but I loved the space and would definitely go there again. Of the food items they had available, I saw a couple vegan cookies from Sweets From the Earth which was nice. 4 3 
Love it just moved to the area and I'm so happy i found this place! Thai is my go to guy for my pedi n gel manicures! But everyone here does a great job! 4 5 
I had been looking forward to eating here for a while so the first chance I got while visiting up in Vegas I took it.  Overall I felt this place was okay. I would have rated it a 3.5 star but that is not an option. Its a very nice restaurant and my waiter was pretty good. I had the chicken wings which were nothing special in the end but you can only do so much with a chicken wing. For my entree I had the fish n chips. This comes with two pieces of well battered Cod and steak cut fries. The fish was very good and met my expectations. The fries overall were just fries. They did have a unique horse radish ketchup which was pretty good. I would return for the fish but not much else. I felt there was something missing but overall it is a little pricey but worth a go. 4 3 
I've been searching for an alterations place with hours that work with my busy schedule and was thrilled to find Linh's Fashion Alterations was no only just a mile or so away from me, but open until 7pm!  After reading mostly glowing reviews, I headed over with a dress that I needed to be taken in.  I must have drove past it twice, as It's a little tucked away in a small plaza, but once I  went inside, was immediately greeted by Linh, and had my fitting , I was already looking forward to seeing the finished product.  Both Linh and the lady who pinned my dress during the fitting knew exactly what I wanted even when I was unsure how it would be done given the dress has ruching along the sides.  I arrived back a week later and was encouraged to try the dress on to see the results.  It was perfect!  All the same ruching now in a  nice, form fitting silhouette.  I will absolutely be back! 4 5 
When I came here back in July for my birthday it's was fairly late maybe 8:30 at the latest we were sat n it literally took us 30 minutes before our waiter came to take our orders! We later found out that he was the bartender and the waiter.  Which is ridiculous the bar had about 5 people sitting there he had to serve n one lady was talking his ears off which took us forever to get our food. That wasn't his fault, it's red lobsters for being cheap and understaffed. That's the reason I took a star off other then that it was an okay visit the waiter was pleasant it just took forever. I also went here last night for the endless shrimp we got there at 9pm. We had an amazing waitress her name was Fabiola. She never let our glasses get empty , she was very nice, and she kept our shrimp coming at a steady pace. Even after 10 when the restaurant was closed she still let us order another dish. When I come back to red lobster I'm defiantly going to ask for her to be my waitress. 4 2 
In the process of relocating to Madison from Indiana, my wife & I stopped in for lunch after a soul-draining day of house-hunting.  The brews on tap were perfect to take the edge off, and then I ate something I never expected to love so thoroughly -- a fried egg sandwich.This was the best fried-egg sandwich in the world.  And I've eaten and made quite a few.  The secret has got to be that chipotle mayo.  It's the new ketchup -- it just rocks everything it touches.And of course, the Weary Traveler is adorable with its beautiful dark woods, the mirrors up in the crown molding, and the delectable selection of local beers.  Saving the weary, one pint at a time... 4 5 
Food was okay. I had the virgin pasta and it was good. My friend's Pasta What was a bit too salty. Atmosphere was cozy. Service was quick. Good spot for a late night meal. 4 3 
The food was good but I think they are a little short staffed. Our order, food, and bill took longer than I would've liked. I don't blame our waitress though as she was slammed. I had the yogurt parfait and it was delicious. The Greek yogurt was very smooth and creamy. 4 3 
I have been using their services for over 7 years. Changed owners a few years ago but the new staff and owner (Helen) is much nicer. It's clean, friendly, good service. However I have a problem with their opening, If you book an appt for opening time let's say 10am for a saturday make sure you have time to wait because no one will be there until 10-15min later. as well I wish they would have more, better collections of nail polish. 4 3 
what I love about Costco is their great price, even on gas. This particular Costco is more toward business rather than the normal Costco, they do not have a photo center but do have printing/copying center. One other thing I keep forgetting whenever I come to Costco is that they don't not accept any other credit card beside amex. great place for wholesale and gas. 4 5 
I think Mundo is a great stop for Mexican food if you are in the area.  I've been there a number of times, the food, drinks and service are fine.  No complaints.  Would I make a special trip downtown to eat there?  Probably not.  If you are seeing a show at the Smith Center it is very convenient. 4 3 
We had the Chicken Bacon Avocado wrap that was stuffed full of chunks of chicken, crunchy bacon bits, some avocado and lots of lettuce and skin-on cucumbers chunks.  Next time I'll tell them to leave those off.  Kind of dry so needed more mayo that they supplied in packets.  The pesto chicken Cavatappi was delicious but small portion.  It  should include a side or at least a piece of bread. 4 3 
Salty! I am not a person who puts a lot of salt on my food, but I do enjoy just the right amount, and a few of the tapas that I tried were a little too salty for me.  Despite the saltiness the tapas were good and the staff was friendly and attentive.  The restaurant itself was fun to hang out in, and the wine list did not disappoint. 4 3 
Favourite place!!! no bullshit, all the cakes and sandwiches are amazing, and their whole whey bread is the best i ever had, now have to eat them every single morning.The girls work in day shit are kinds of bitch... love the ppl who works in the night, always give me half price off if I go there before they close. 4 5 
This shop is prime for college students looking for cheep costumes or themed party attire! The owner and employees are very sweet and helpful. I found designers bags and clothes for super cheap and in good condition. I would recommend anyone that is in need of a quick costume idea to check out this store. It is a bit small but since it just opened there are a lot of good things to pick from, you just have to look! 4 5 
Came here specifically so the bf can eat the dry aged NY sirloin. We first heard about dry aged beef on food network, and were intrigued by the aging process. Last summer, while strolling by NY NY on the last day of our vegas trip, we walked by Gallagher's. Unfortunately at that time, we didn't have time to try their steak and the bf left vegas disappointed. For the holidays, we trekked back to vegas...and a part of me thinks we went back to vegas to satisfy my bf's intrigue of the dry aged NY sirloin. So to appease the bf, we went here. He of course had the NY sirloin, and I had the filet mignon.  And to give Gallagher's credit...the NY sirloin was yummy, but it didn't taste that much different than a wet aged piece-o-meat. The filet was small but cooked to perfection. Overall, very enjoyable. However 4 2 
Normal diner setting.  Prepare for a long wait if you come around normal busy hours.  Long island iced tea was great!  Nice cheap meal compared to everything else you'll find in Mandalay Bay. 4 3 
Let me first say that my last review happened about a year ago and I wrote a review but accidentally never posted it. As soon as I realized this I posted. Dave Gordon called me and emailed within the next few days to apologize about my experience.  I had explained to him about the post and that this actually occurred almost a year ago. He said regardless it was still an experience I had and he wanted to make it right and he did! I really appreciate that. I really respect a manager who truly cares about his customers. I would definitely return do to the fact that they care about their customer satisfaction. He asked me to give him a call the next time I go back so he can make sure our next experience is an amazing one. I will definitely take him up on that! 4 5 
I got the lunchtime soup/salad combo. It was pretty good, especially the soup, and there was lots of filling stuff in there, but it wasn't quite enough food for me. If I go back I'll get something a bit bigger. 4 3 
Pros: Buger, side of fries, take out staff, free wi-fiCons: None this timeIs it a good restaurant for kids? YesIs the parking lot enough to accommodate the customers? MaybeOn Wednesday around 7:30pm, I went to the restaurant to get my food to go and have my dinner on another place. The cashier was very quick and nice to take my order and at this time there were no line to place my order there.After paid, there is a place that you can sit to wait for your food to be ready. I waited more or less 15/20 minutes for everything to be done. While I was waiting, I was using the free Wi-Fi to check my e-mails and read the news.Overall, the fries were dry but tasteful. They were not greased or unseasoned and the burger at a first sight seemed dry what is a bad sign most of the times. But I was wrong, even not juicy inside the burger was delicious. They found the right balance between juicy and dry. I liked this restaurant a lot and I'm looking forward to go back there again. 4 2 
Cafe Posada is one of Gilbert's best kept little secrets.  Its a great little restaurant you've probably driven by many times on the corner of Gilbert and Ray rd.   You've got to try the Carne Asada or the Pollo a la Parilla.  The never compromise on the fresh ingredients and you won't be disappointed.  Pleasantly Surprised! 4 5 
I've been going to Presto for about two months now. The guys do a great job with gel nails. Great pedicures! 4 5 
Great food at reasonable prices, good service and great classy atmosphere. Simply delicious choices with special seasonal options. There soup was delicious and the flat bread was great. There scallops were cooked perfect  and risotto was cooked perfect. Will look forward to next visit. Every thing I have tasted at this restaurant was absolutely phenomenal. 4 5 
Great food and very attentive service.  The mushroom ravioli was to die for and the Talapia was very tasty.  Highly recommend this restaurant. 4 5 
stopped in during the early evening hours the madness was starting to quiet down, I wasn't buying anything just comparing prices and for the most part it compares to Walmart or lower.  Reminds me of the old Mega Foods stores only on a higher scale.I will definately be back.I did see quite a few of the trailer park crowd there last night and that makes me nervous with all the bulk bins and the offspring running around 4 3 
Love this place! Sometimes it is so hard to find a fun, comfortable, friendly and clean restaurant that can accommodate my kids (who eat meat) and my husband and I (who are vegan). This place is perfection! And since we are skipping the meat the husband and I we can get a roll for $3.95? Get the heck out of here!  Edamame and a cucumber salad for less then $2 each. We went wild on rolls and sides and still spent way less then we would have at someplace less healthy or interesting. If you are shy of ordering then check out the menu online and walk in with it written down what you wants.. also the website has a great feature that allows you to build your roll and check the nutritional value of it. I can't even tell you how much I appreciate that! The people were friendly, helpful and nice. The place was spotless. I think we are going to make it Sushi Sunday and go every week. Can't wait now for the weekend. 4 5 
I have been going to this place for years since high school and always go to Stanley. I've had a bunch of different hair cuts through the years from short bob to straight perm to mid length to dyed caramel... I've always trusted Stanley to do a good job and if I go home and don't love the cut, I can always come in the next day for him to fix it free of charge. They have a great selection of recent Japanese magazines to flip through to get inspired as well! 4 5 
After my bad review, I got a personal email from the owner acknowledging my comments and sincerely apologizing.  Wow, that was the first time this has happened to me.  I didn't respond, but instead just made my way back in, anonymously.  So, I still love the crab cakes and Mary and Nikki are even better than before and this time the whole place seemed to have a better vibe.  Was it my review?  NO!!! LOL.  Maybe I just spoke too soon on a new place in town.Being an older crowd in Fountain Hills (I am 15 years younger than almost all of my neighbors) it is an odd thing to have a DJ spinning on a weekend - but as fuddy duddy as I am for my age, doesn't mean it isn't just what the doctor ordered for some.John - thanks for reaching out to me.  I wish you the best with Fountini's and just know that you haven't lost my business. 4 3 
Hotel motel holiday inn if ya girl starts acting up bring her friend! Lol.  Its a freemont hotel on the strip...... I enjoyed the bed, other then the luke warm shower thats all i used there. Big flat screen that we never turned on..... Check in was fast on a thursday friday line was going out the door though. Friendly older staff. Wife won around $100 on the slots. Would stay again. Cant beat the price. 4 3 
I have both eaten in and taken out with a positive experience. From walking by, it doesn't look like the greatest place, but they have an interesting menu with different asian/asian fusion dishes so there's a little bit for everyone from the exotic to the simple.The Malaysian Sate, which I had with beef, was delicious and came in a more than adequately sized portion. The Pad Thai is also a delicious meal. All of the appetizers and other dishes I tried were more than satisfactory. For a student on a budget, this place is both delicious and relatively inexpensive. I would recommend it to anyone who likes interesting tastes of Asia. 4 5 
The Oyster Po Boy is the Bomb!! My husband and I were down in NC and had lunch here. The restaurant lives up to its great reputation. 4 5 
Pros: Cost, breakfast, front desk staff, internet, dog friendly, fast internetCons: Housekeep, garage passage to the hotel, not so many good options to eat near aroundIs the private parking lot enough to accommodate all the guests? NoOn April 2012, I reserved a room for 2 nights because I had some appointments to attend on Toronto. The room that I got was small but not bad. Even not having some good options to eat near around, the localization of it stills good. Because I the only time that I needed to use my car again, was only to leave the hotel. It was very accessible to get the public transportation from there to anywhere that I wanted to go.The front desk service was friendly and nice and the breakfast offered much more options to eat that I am used to have from other hotels that I stayed on Toronto. Unfortunately, when we said to the housekeeper that we don't want our room cleaned she started to question us when we were planning to leave and that we need to notify the front desk for that. (Note: we were on the middle of our 2 nights stay) This point upset me a little.Overall, with the exclusion of the housekeeper moment, I liked so much the hotel and I am planning to stay there again next time I visit Toronto. And if you are planning to go there too, my recommendation to you is: leave all the luggage on the hotel lobby. Because if you try to use the corridor that connects the garage to the hotel it is not an easy thing to do because the doors are heavy and maybe you need to go back to the garage sometimes to get everything. 4 3 
Love this place! It's just so good and fresh. Not too salty or heavy on the sauces. Have gotten take out each time, never have eaten in there. But, the bartender is awesome. My faves are the Butternut Squash Ravioli and the Spinach and Ricotta Cheese Ravioli. My bestie loves their linguini and clams. They load those clams on there! 4 5 
Great drinks, prime location, and fantastic patio area. The bartenders are always incredibly friendly, and the drinks are usually pretty strong. I've tried the "Group Therapy," and it lives up to it's name--you need AT LEAST one other person for the drink. Not a place for dancing, but a great bar to hand out with a group of people. 4 5 
I just scrolled through previous reviews and read not so good reviews. I had the total opposite experience here.I got married on August 22, 2015 and decided to have our rehearsal dinner the day prior on August 21, 2015. We had been searching and "tasting" different restaurants on the strip being that many of wedding party were coming from out of state and we wanted to keep the dinner near their hotels. Our wedding reception was pretty formal, so after many taste testing ventures, we decided we wanted to hold our rehearsal dinner at a venue where everyone could mingle with eachother in a fun comfortable atmosphere.I remembered that we had taken my son to Senor Frogs for his 21st birthday. I contacted them by email inquiring about special events and I was immediately contacted by Denny. I requested to come into the restaurant after 5:00 PM to view the area of where we could hold our rehearsal dinner and he stated he would make himself available at any time. My husband and I visited that same night and knew the restaurant would be a perfect place for the atmosphere we were wanting! We held our rehearsal dinner for 30 people on August 21, 2015 and everything was set up as planned with food, tables, chairs, and was even accommodated when I had to add 6 extra people with the very little notice.  We chose to have dinner buffet style non-stop for 2 hours. Denny continuously checked on us to make sure everything was ok and our waitress Veronica (I think that as her name) was very patient with our large group! Thanks a bunch to these 2! :) The only complaint I have is the heat! lol We sat outside facing the strip, which was a beautiful view but hot, and although they provided misters and fans, we were sweating! August is a very hot month in Vegas, so I had I been a little bit smarter, I would've requested to be seated inside! I'm a local, so I should've known better! lol Overall, we all had a great time! :) 4 2 
Really like this place and became one of my favorite's after my first time, I really like that they don't charge for gauc and sour cream. Like the family business service. 4 5 
I've been going to James for years and he does a really good haircut for a really good price. He delivers the sometimes odd descriptions of the type of haircuts I ask for - and I've worn it at all lengths and styles. I am a men's image consultant and I have sent my clients to James with good conscience, knowing that they'll get a great haircut for a great price.James rocks! 4 5 
I love Salad King!  It was my go-to when I was at Ryerson and I will still go out of my way to go there now.  I don't care if it's not exactly 'real Thai', it is delicious!  I always get the spicy tofu or the golden tofu and I have never been dissapointed.  Staff are really friendly too. 4 5 
Decent prices for street food. The seating area is somewhat limited during peak dining times. It really irks me when groups of people come in and snag a table before ordering despite the long line. The seating issue would probably be better if they had a rule to order before sitting. Pork bowl was really good. Coffin toast is cute, but I was expecting a more robust flavor. Squid balls are a nice side. 4 3 
I parked somewhere I shouldn't have parked, and got towed. Ugh, my bad. But the experience actually was way better than I expected. Howard and his apprentice offered to pick me up and take me to their shop, since they were in the neighborhood, which saved me quite a hassle. He was professional and friendly (we had some time to kill as we went thru rush hour traffic) and I couldn't ask for anything more. 4 5 
Fabulous!!  Expensive, yes, but sooo worth it!  My friends and I make sure to schedule at least half a day here whenever we go to Vegas.  The Swedish massage is just heavenly.  I love the personal attention we receive when we go.  They have roman baths, hot, warm and cold ones.  There is also a huge hot tub, a sauna, steamroom, and my favorite - the arctic room.  i call it the snow globe room because its shaped like an igloo and has moisturizer bubbles "snowing" from the ceiling. 4 5 
Only been here once, but the food was excellent. I tried their pizza and salad, and my taste buds were on fire! Original taste, fresh and homemade Italian food. The staff were awesome too. Love the quaint location and atmosphere. Definitely coming back again! 4 5 
Excellent food and very nice extended menu for veggies. I tried majority of pasties here and liked lot of them. Chicken tikka pasty is my favorite. Pesto and rosemary chickens are also my favorite. Cream of Tomato with croutons is by far one of the best soup I had. Chocolate Bread and Butter Pudding formerly known as Temple pudding  is heavenly and must  try. 4 5 
Good kulcha...chat is good but not as good as the regular thali dishes. Friendly staff. 4 3 
We went here for the oysters and were impressed. We ordered Shucker's Best Mixed Plate (12 oysters) and ended up getting 6 more because they were so good. We had a 1 year old and 9 year old and they both got mac and cheese (with bacon), which was delicious (lots of flavour). Our server was great too! Her beer recommendations were solid and she suggested a Shirley Temple for our son, which he loved! We will definitely be back, especially when we want oysters. 4 5 
What does an IB do when are owed more on a partial casino/hotel than they can sell it for.... they run it themselves. Good luck DB AG! 4 1 
We enjoyed our Red Rock Canyon tour with Casino Travel & Tours.  Our tour guide was Jerry- he made sure we were all comfortable, and he told us lots of fun facts during the six-hour tour.  I personally think that going on a guided tour was better than renting a car and driving out.  Since it was our first time in Vegas, our guide also gave us a lot of good advice about how to get around in Vegas and some good spots to check out.  I would recommend this company! 4 5 
I had family over and my husband suggested Seafood City. To my surprise, there was now a food court area. The BBQ pork and chicken was absolutely delicious. I would recommend to try this. It reminded me when I was back home on Guam. That is how good it was. I also tried  a side dish with coconut milk and bamboo shoots.(I honestly forgot the name) but it was a dish that I haven't had in years. That was delicious too. 4 5 
I lost my corned beef and pastrami virginity at Corky & Lenny's, and can't believe I waited so long!  Had been going here off and on for a few years when visiting family, but only had breakfast or the non-deli items.  If I had simply stuck to these sorts of things, I'd probably be giving a two star rating, but oh, the cured meats!  Corky & Lenny's easily rival legendary delis like Zingerman's in Ann Arbor, but costs you less and give you just as gigantic a pile between two slices as the others.  Not sure what other reviewers are saying about cranky/unpleasant service, because I've had nothing but attentive and pleasant experiences here.  The only crank I've run into is the older lady in the Harry Caray glasses that's always working the register, but c'mon, that's part of the charm! 4 3 
Me and my  husband  seeing  Dr Nguyen  over  15 years. The best  dentist & staff . Specially  my husband  is like  a baby  when it comes  to dentist. 4 5 
Omg! I love this place, amazing food, service, and friendly staff. My boyfriend and I come here quite a bit you have to get the avocado egg rolls they are the bomb ! Served with chili line sauce and chicken pot stickers but I would ask for the sauce on the side.for some reason the potstickers are swimming in the sauce  if ordered in original form.  If you decided to get a strawberry lemonade make sure to ask for water because it's overly  sweet. Entrees I got the luau salad it's amazing very healthy and he got the teriyaki chicken so good comes with your choice of brow., Or white rice . Lastly our server was very nice and attentive but seemed to be overwhelmed so we felt bad asking for anything. 4 5 
Scared to post a review because people might find it and crowds will come lol.Pros: stadium seating, comfortable, large chairs, super ample leg room, clean theater. Manager is nice, he works concessions. Super decent pricing.Cons: 3x since it opened, we've visited and either there was no picture or audio was messed up. They fixed it within 10 mins but we've not experienced that anywhere else but in a foreign country. Bathroom needs updating: tiles are looking pretty worn. 4 3 
My dad had emergency dental work that had to be done today. I made the appointment for him and the staff that worked there was very friendly.He is in his 50's and he told me that the dentist there was very good and one of the best he went to (he has really bad teeth so he has been with many dentists).It was a little pricey because it does have the 80 dollars examination fee. But considering the emergency and that it was on a Sunday, I think we came out satisfied. 4 5 
i'm a complete curling novice, but i had a blast when i was here.you rent curling lanes by the hour, and equipment as well. you get a broom, and a smooth, custom made piece of plastic that attaches to the bottom of your shoe to slide across the ice. that's all there is to it! get out there and curl! it helps if you have a friend or two that knows what their doing, or at the very least look up the rules before you get there.this place is also within walking distance of downtown (just north, over the center street bridge) which makes it logistically practical.i'll also suggest you get one of the lanes on the sides.... for no reason other than it's easier access to the bar and to your drinks. drinks and glass bottles are for obvious reasons not allowed on the ice, and the side lanes are right next to the doors/ledges for your drinks. 4 5 
Ventured into the Mental Health District eatery on a Thursday and took our spot at the bar as per usual. Love the new Spanish tapas food craze that's been inquisitioning its way through the Toronto food scene.After being mildly impressed at Bar Isabelle and offensively disappointed with Patria, we walked into Carmen with muted expectations.First we tried the Iberico Ham - tough - no marbling - texture of Asian style beef jerkey Second - Jicama with Avocado - texturally didn't work - felt of a glob of guac on a radish - maybe leaving the texture of the non-smashed avocado could work betterMain Course - Traditional Seafood PaellaHands down the best Paella we have had outside spain - served in its roasting dish with an abundance of fresh seafood - permeated with fresh peas and chorizo and Saffron and wait for it.... we have Socrato - the crunchy sweet caramelized peppers and onions-  take note all other Spanish Hautes .....ahem Patria.... - an amazing choice that fed 2 - 3 for $35Staff was friendly and attentive and fun - was recommended a well balanced Argentinian Malbec that paired perfectly with my Pae.Will go back for Paella alone 4 2 
Are you aware that there aren't enough words in the English language to describe how incredibly big, thick, juicy, and GOOD Fat Bastard Burritos are? They have some of the thickest, tightest, and most solid burritos I have ever seen. One bite us definitely worth rapturing a neck vein. 4 5 
Found this salon on Yelp and the reviews didn't disappoint! Got my manicure done by  Kevin and he did an awesome job. The polish came out flawless  and did a good job cutting the cuticles. Yuki did my pedicure and she was delicate and detailed oriented. Most places I've gone do not put special attention to callous removal but she definitely did her best. One of the things I liked the most was that they have a frequent user card, where on every 5 times you get 20% off. I haven't seen this at any other salon.Only reason I didn't give 5 stars was because they have few technicians and I can anticipate having to wait a little longer without an appointment and the color choices are not great (some of the polishes look old and unused).Will definitely go back! 4 5 
Great place for Korean fix. Gamjatang is to die for. 4 5 
Come on- a 24 hour up-to-date gym that costs you 30$/month- it doesn't get much better or cheaper than that. I go in the mornings and/or evenings when gyms are usually at their fullest but I have never had to wait for a machine there, ever!... And they're open on holidays like Xmas an New Years!! They also have a very clean, modern and no pressure atmosphere- as a chick, it's soo not a slimy pick-up gym at all- you feel totally safe and un-cruised ++ it's a plus in my opinion! 4 5 
Hands down, this is the best, most authentic sushi place in town. The sashimi is actually very fresh compared to other places I've been to downtown. The atmosphere is nice. It's lovely and quiet. It's one of those places you wouldn't really know of unless you just walk by it. We ordered a sashimi set and some tempura. Though the prices are on the slightly steeper side in comparison to other sushi place, the freshness is definitely worth it.Service was great. Did not have to wait too long for anything. It is definitely the kind of place you go to to enjoy and indulge on tasty food and not just to stuff your face with sushi 4 5 
Just want to say that this place needs to be managed a little bit better!!! You can tell that the girls upfront have a lot of their plate and no help from the site manager. Stephanie and Miranda are both very polite. Also the techs Monica and Melissa made me feel very comfortable and they are very knowledgeable. 4 5 
Cutsy stuff. I think the demographic for the stuff here would most likely be middle aged woman to elderly. Lots of knick knacks. I got this little coin purse which was a little pricey. Probably won't go back just because of my preferences. However this was a nice shop, just not my taste. 4 2 
Probably the least expensive dining option at the Wynn. Best NY style pizza i have had outside of the real NY. And I'm a New Yorker.First time we went was our first night in Vegas. Trying to grab a quick bite after seeing a show. We ate outside on the patio and ate our slices next to the pretty waterfalls late at night. Very nice.Second time we came in for lunch with a larger group. Very busy, long line. They also have a vegan menu here (you have to ask for it, but every restaurant at the Wynn hotel has a vegan menu). My sister, the vegan, had a vegan sandwich (veggies on vegan bread) which she said was awesome.Here comes the bad news for vegans. This is a order-at-the-counter then go sit down and wait for your food to be brought to you place. The lady behind the counter who took our order was an english as a second language person. We told her repeatedly that my sister was vegan and everything she was ordering needed to be vegan. We pointed at the vegan menu several times. She still kept asking every time we ordered something, do you want that with cheese? Do you want the vegan one? YES, WE WANT THE VEGAN ONE we said, LOUDLY while pointing at the vegan menu. O.k., so at the end, we thought we had properly communicated that we needed all vegan food for my sister. On the vegan menu were vegan garlic fries, which we ordered. We made it CRYSTAL CLEAR we needed the VEGAN garlic fries, not the regular ones. Seriously, we said it SEVERAL times. Well, my sister gets her sandwich and fries and starts to eat. I say, what's that stuff on top of your fries? She said she thought it was big chunks of garlic. Then she takes a closer look and realizes it's cheese. We go to the counter and complain. The manager comes out. They replace the fries with vegan ones, but the manager seems to be blaming my sister for not ordering the right fries. Are you kidding me? We could not possibly have been any clearer. Seriously, this is a very big deal to vegans. No apology, no offer of compensation, nothing. Very disappointed in how that was handled.Here's some advice for Mr. Wynn. If you want vegans to eat at your restaurants, you need to ensure that the staff at all your restaurants understand the vegan issue, and that they speak english fluently. This was unacceptable. 4 5 
I love this store, Tom is really friendly and we love him! Many cute stuff and I recommend if you like stationary or finding some pretty gifts. The prices are quite fair. I've got a pencil bag and pretty mechanical pencil. :) 4 5 
Doesn't everyone love yardhouse? Their happy hour is awesome.We gave them 4 stars, because overall they are wonderful. However, beware because they do have their bad nights. Tonight, we both ordered cups of clam chowder and one came out filled to the top and the other was way below the rim.Then our chicken sandwich came out uncooked!!! We sent it back and the manager was nice enough to come out and offer us more food & dessert on him.I have had the tomato bisque before and it was really good. Tonight, it wasn't good. I was very disappointed, because I LOVE tomato/tomato bisque soup.We definitely wanted to note that they have very good service. When you ask for a box, they do it for you instead of giving you a box to do it yourself. They even write the date and what food is inside of the box in the corner! Little things like that really do make a difference. 4 3 
Go to Leah at this place. She is great, not a chatterbox and knows how to cut Asian hair which is hard to find in LV. Reasonable price and no pressure sales to buy products. They are close on Sundays so plan ahead. 4 5 
Cheap pbr and trading of recipes from prison. If you don't want to to go to a blue collar (or no collar) dive bar, don't go to a blue collar dive bar. Plenty of business in the front and party in the back; as well as misogynisticly-named sleeveless shirts.You can't handle the truth. 4 1 
We love coming here to pick up our corn tortillas and chips (for cooking at home) which are made fresh on site.  The chips even keep and taste great up to a few weeks later.  We haven't tried eating in/take-out from here, but based on the comments, I don't think we're missing much.  One of the hidden gems in Kensington. 4 5 
I came to Ah So for a friend's birthday. The cooks were awesome and really put on a good show. The food was decent, but a bit over priced. However, the service and show made up for the higher cost. 4 3 
Great food and juices.  Kale chips are awesome as well as their homemade "granola" which is addicting.  Freshly made vegan meals are very good and the juices I have tasted are all excellent. 4 5 
Not the best place to sit in and eat as its very cramped. We had a group of 7 and we pretty much covered more than half the floor space. The nigiri/sashimi isn't anything special either but the rolls, my dear lord  the rolls are glorious. One supersized piece of sushi roll at Sushi Bong is probably equivalent to 3 pieces at your typical AYCE. We ordered the largest party tray and it had every single roll stuffed with cucumbers and avocados, on top of the sashimi and tempura of course. I was baffled when my friend who ordered often from here told me that the rolls used to be even bigger.  How is that even possible????If you are around the area and craving for some quick sushi, this is definitely a place to check out 4 3 
This store has so many flip flops to choose from it was hard to pick out just one pair. I was a little upset with one of the workers in there trying to get me to buy the smaller size rather than the size that fit my foot. 4 3 
Pros:-I love the food-locationCons:-Could lay off the hipster attitude of the hostesses-decor is uncomfortable 4 3 
excellent, authentic French bistro--decor is 70's basement meets bistro, but truly one of our neighbourhood favourites. Wonderful fish, affordable wine, creative desserts. We keep returning and have never had a bad meal in 7 years. 4 5 
Usually order from this location. Always dependable product and good quality. Manager is personable and accommodating. This is one of our go to's. Thanks guys for being awesome! 4 5 
I have been looking for a good Chinese restraint for lunch near work. This one fits the bill perfectly. 4 3 
This was my first time visiting Mucho Burrito, and based on that experience alone, I would be back.I've had my fair share of visits to Mexican-type, burrito chains (Burrito Boyz comes to mind), without much luck. Ya see, I'm not a fan of cilantro (aka coriander). I absolutely hate it. I will deal with it when necessary (usually in salsa is fine because it's always pre-made and it's very faint), but I cannot stand it when it's used as a garnish. This is why I tend to stray from Burrito Boyz because I'm pretty sure they cook their protein with cilantro. Gag.Mucho Burrito, however, does not. YAY! Boy, was I ever pleased. I ordered a chicken quesadilla, which came loaded with cheese, chicken, peppers and onions. I was mulling around the idea of getting a combo (chips and salsa), but glad I didn't because that thing was massive and came with a side of sour cream and salsa.It was delicious. And they even have a liquor license! I had a Corona with mine. Yum! 4 3 
Nice place, great service from the chef (he stand in every table explaining the details of the plates). Prices are ok. The oysters were very good. 4 3 
A basic place but the food is good and service is also, limited wine and beer 4 3 
I'm giving it 3 stars because I only like 3 items here (not the other items on the menu), but these 3 items are actually really good and on its own deserve 4 stars.  I only like pho at 3 locations here in Vegas and this is one of them.  It's good and the place is cleaner than Pho So 1.  I also like their che ba mau because it comes with shaved ice, and they serve it in a plastic to go cup (in case I don't finish it).  Their spring rolls are pretty good too, but I can make those at home.Update:  I changed it to 4 stars because I've missed it so much while I was gone that I ate here twice a week while I was back home for break.  :oP 4 3 
These movers were great. They came at short notice after some sketchy movers fell through, and they did the job in very quick time. The fee was as quoted with no hidden additions. I would definitely use them again/recommend to others. 4 5 
This place is decent, and I'd definitely recommend it over one of the Rio Mirages. The food is a bit on the pricy side for what they offer, and I prefer Popo's in Glendale. If I just need some quick Mexican food though, this place has always been satisfying. 4 3 
good pho for the west-end.very clean, very unusual for asian places, especally vietnamese restaurants. however, usually nice asian restaurants aren't authentic but this place is run by true viets. don't get their thai mango salad though, it REALLY sucks. it is DRENCHED in fish sauce or whatever. 4 3 
The food was ok. You get a lot of food for the price. There is bot a lot of seating. 4 3 
After my 8 lb poodle was attached by a coyote, I went there. The staff and doctor were very nice and took good care of my dog Bradley.  This will be my go to ER for all my pets. 4 5 
I keep coming back for the massage. Lisa is a professional! I highly recommend the soy candle massage. The experience with the staff is always exceptional. 4 5 
We stopped in here for dinner and cocktails on a Saturday night after friends we were traveling with got several referrals to check this place out. It's down the strip near the Riviera Casino. We walked into the lounge area as there was a wait for the diner side and decided we just had to hang out on the lounge side! The seating area is low back velour couches with little marble pedestal tables. There are neon lights and plastic flowers and mirrors! Oh the mirrors! Cue the 70's music!!!  The servers wear 70's style long black nightgowns and are very friendly. Ok food and drinks- we tried a few of the specialty drinks (green tea martini, oatmeal cookie martini with ice cream of course, espresso martini, White Russian). They make a solid drink here. We ordered a few appetizers- be warned they are enormous. Our little pedestal table was overwhelmed. The food on the lounge side was basic bar appetizer fate- but it's the atmosphere that wins here. There is a fire water table thing in the center of the lounge as well- very cool. Overall a very funky fun place to hang out. I will be adding it to my list of stops next trip.  Don't forget to break out your leisure suit! 4 3 
One visit suggests this is a strong addition to Montreal's boulangerie scene. The selection isn't vast, but it includes two pretty serious rye breads -- one 100% rye, the other 67%. I tried the latter and have at least one reason to return. Ace baker Julien Roy, formerly of Le pain dans les voiles, is part of the team. There are a few tables, and they also serve coffee. Bonne chance ! 4 3 
While visiting Montreal from NYC (yup, a tourist), I wanted to find a place to eat that was not filled with my fellow ugly Americans, and that I could walk to from my lovely Latin Quarter B and B.  This was it.   The goat cheese salad was so good that I dreamed about it and had to go back again for another taste.  It was sort of like the early stages of addiction.    That said, the gazpacho was eh- the bread was not entirely blended in, and getting a soggy crust half  way through my bowl was not that pleasant, though the taste was good.The atmosphere- sidewalk cafe on a nice night-- was lovely.  So, too, was the service.   Sad to say for the local patrons, I highly recommend Les Deux Gamins to my fellow travelers. 4 3 
I love this place. Nice selection of craft beers,  late night food,  solid To Go set up. The service has never been fantastic but I love the atmosphere and the GOURMET Asian food. I love people watching at this place and love stopping in for a beer. This will always be my first TO GO option on  the way home 4 5 
I've been going to lou's for over two years now. He's honest and he does very good work. He's my go to guy. 4 5 
This shop is great if you have a honda or acura. I found them before I moved here from my specialist in Arizona, who I used for about 10 years.james is straight up and gets stuff done fast and cheap. Anytime I leave the car for more than hours they hook up free stuff like buffing the LED lights(much brighter after), rain x windshield, etc. 4 5 
Brought my Mesa Lonestar in for repair a while ago, not only did they take the time to diagnose and fix my amp problem, they also took the time to sit with me for a while and help me dial in my tone better. Quick turn around and friendly service. 4 5 
BFG was amazing! Fellow yelper Ramil B. introduced me to this place and it was awesome. BFG stands for Baked, Fried, Grilled which are the 3 options for how to have your chicken strips. They have a variety of sauces to accompany including "Wasabi Cream." Sides for the chicken are fries, grilled vegetables, garlic bread and mac&cheese. There's something for those who come just to stuff their face and something for the more health conscious.The owner, Jin, is super friendly and he definitely makes it his mission to have a relationship with each of his customers.The artwork on the walls are cute and inviting.This is a great mom&pop shop. A definite cane's replacement. In fact, they are even cheaper than cane's! I LOVE THAT!Speaking of canes, I could choose BFG's garlic bread over Cane's texas toast ANY DAY, HANDS DOWN. The garlic bread is smaller, but it tastes way better.Only downfall, it's nowhere near my house. HAHA. 4 5 
I was especially impressed with this restaurant! The food was great and fairly priced and the service was very attentive and friendly as well. I ordered chicken satimbocca with vegetables and it was delicious. The lemon chicken Greek soup was also a favorite. 4 5 
The whole smell and flavour are exactly how it tasted when I was in China, although the noodles tasted a little bit harder than I thought, I still think it's a good dish 4 3 
OK DONT GET ME STARTED ON POPEYES. THIS PLACE IS AMAZING AND THE BEST.I came here 5:50 on a Friday night and I went to drive through. It was a 45 minute wait which totally made me evaluate my decision on coming here next time. Though I think I will wait till the hype goes down to come back. Though the wait was worth it. The chicken is delicious and crispy and everything you want. I had the $7.99 2 combo meal which include 2 chickens, a biscuit which is my favourite thing there because it's buttery and matches perfectly with the chicken, a choice of side, and a drinkHonestly this was so very good and I would come back on the biscuits alone. I FUCK WITH THIS SO MUCH.  If you had just eaten KFC since now, this will change your life because it's WAY BETTER. the only thing that sucks is the waitHonestly its a good place to go but it is a tiny location and I could say how I alone could speed up the drive though but I'm not the manager. The food is great, service is polite, Popeyes is a good US branch, and blood is red. It's just the facts 4 5 
This food here is fantastic! My wife and I eat vegetarian most of the time, and this is one of our mainstay restaurants for take-out nights. But don't let the 'vegetarian' label scare you off, this is just damn good Indian food by any standard.Our usual order is the aloo paratha (potato bread), masala dosa (dosa stuffed with spicy potato), and the chana masala (chana dal in a liquidy masala sauce with rice). One order of each of those is enough food to stuff two people, for a total of $18.53+tax+tip. Note that's 1 order of each of those, total, not 1 for each person.I'm docking one star because the service when you eat in is lacklustre to say the least. Most of the time they don't seem to care whether you get water, take your order in any reasonable time, etc.But the food is good enough to keep me coming back again and again for take-out. 4 5 
Love the vibe, ambiance, and flavors.  California comfort food done right.Great drink menu. It is so nice to feel at home and little details like the luchador masks and the repollo in the tacos make it all come together.  Minus one star for the smokers. 4 5 
Ok BBQ. I prefer the sauce added during the chopping, so adding it was just ok. The price seemed high for a pound at $12.99. Hushpuppies were a good blend of corn meal and onion. Staff need smiles. 4 3 
Frisch's is pretty reliable, family-friendly fare. Decent prices. I usually get a bacon burger. Their onion rings are above average. The salad bar actually seems like a pretty nice option, although I've never selected it. I have done the breakfast bar, which has a surprisingly nice selection. My inlaws seem to love the liver and onions, but I'm not quite prepared to go there myself. 4 3 
Best thing going for North Town. You must try the hot wings & hot chicken tenders! The fries are perfect but burgers are whatever. I've never tried the Mexican or sea food because I'm addicted to the wings and fingers. You get a lot of bang for your buck! Last night i went and ordered 2 regular cheeseburgers, 10 piece hot wings, & 4 chicken fingers which came out to $20 and some change. Parking sucks though when it's busy. 4 3 
This is such a beautiful spa! I had visited here for the first time recently and I will be coming back! 4 5 
It's no secret I go out of my way for Artigiano.  Love the coffee!  Hard to find a table at peak hours and gets very noisy, but you'll know why if you are a coffee lover.  They are the only place in Canada that I've been to that is able to include coffee art on a soy latte.  Almost hate to drink it... NOT! 4 5 
This has a beautiful classy style as soon as you walk in. Great professional staff. The menu has something for everyone. Clam chowder & the lobster bisque soups are the best in the Valley. Sea Bass is tasty as is their burger and the fried chicken. If you love Fresh sea food cooked perfectly and creative dishes? This is the place. A little peace of heaven here in Arizona. 4 5 
The buffet always has a long line to get in. Then It is pricey, but The seafood is good tho. I might come back. But i liked The ceasar palace's Better :) 4 3 
There has never been a more glorious hole than this!After lusting over the website for weeks, my husband decided to take me out on a Sunday lunch date which included Glory Hole Doughnuts as "dessert". We got there at about 2:45pm and were told that unfortunately there weren't any donuts available until quarter after 3pm. We were given a number.We came back promptly at 3:15pm. At 3:30pm the donuts started rolling out in batches. It was like a fashion show of sugary creations and we started naming the donuts out loud as they came out. By that time, the line-up was out the door so it was good that we had come earlier and got a number because they employed the numbering system for only half an hour and only up to the number 5. We were number 5. Numbers 2-4 were nowhere to be found. We may or may not have bound them to chairs in an abandoned warehouse prior to 3:15pm. We ordered a half dozen mixed. Also ordered two coffees, which we realized afterwards they gave to us for free. The service was great. We joked. They laughed. They smiled. We skipped out the door in merry delight. Now, on to the taste test...Here's what was worth mentioning...Butter & Toast - When I go to heaven, I wish to float in butter and eat these til eternity.Elvis with Marshmallow - One word: bacon.S'mores - I want s'more! (Sorry, bad pun)The donut itself, though, is the real winner. Its soft and light without being too airy because it needs a little weight to carry its hoard of toppings, which also do not disappoint. They are deliciously huge - bigger than a bagel. They range in price from $2.00 to $4.00 each, and you can get a half-dozen for $20. 4 5 
Surprisingly good. Definitely better then the pho that was served by the previous owner. I ordered the assorted meats pho. The broth was very flavorful. The meatballs were cut in slices, which made eating it more convenient. I loved that they already had small dishes at the table to use to separate the hoisin sauce and Sirachi sauce for dipping my noodles :). I did not like that there was no option for a small pho vs large pho. One size fits all?  The special drink of the day was the tri color jelly. Too much ice for my liking. Maybe I was also too full to enjoy it. I would definitely come back for another bowl of pho! 4 3 
A bit of drive, wish there were more locations but I love the food. Pretty pricey but...whatever. Treat yo self!! 4 3 
Quiet a decent place for brunching and if you're a big fan of coffee and beer then they have something for you in the menu, a coffee flavored beer. Just swing by. 4 3 
We moved down here from Flagstaff, so the first time I had Pita Jungle was up north. It was great food, but piss poor service up there. Occasionally we'd get sat and then the server or whoever would never show up... ever.When we got down here we found out there was a Pita Jungle down the street and we were a little apprehensive to go there due to a few bad experiences at another location. When we finally went, we had great service, and have returned quite a few times since.We try not to come here too often for fear of it getting old. The food is not always great, but still eatable. When it's not great, it's just a little bland (only thing keeping it from being a 5 star). The Chicken Curry Salad is hands down my favorite dish. I'm usually shocked by the portion sizes. I don't think I've ever had a small portion here. The Chicken Curry Salad and the Medchilada are HUGE. And that's not a complaint. They also have, hands down, the BEST hummus.Every server we've had here has been on point and speedy. I read a couple of other reviews about this location and I have retort: I don't care what my server is doing elsewhere in the restaurant as long as I get good service. If he/she is serving a table clear on the other side of the restaurant and my service doesn't suffer then I'm a happy camper.Part of the other reasons we keep returning to this location are the prices. Good size portion dishes are right at $10. Other places with similar dishes would be in the realm of $19-$23. 4 2 
Got take out tonight. Trust me when I say Level 1 spicy is pretty damn spicy. Had the Street Noodle 2. Good choice. VERY limited menu. Don't go expecting to peruse lots of options. CASH ONLY. Good service. 4 3 
Hyde Park does a nice job capturing the ambiance of prohibition era speak easy - a true relic of days past. The iceberg wedge was ambrosial but not byzantine. It was your typical wedge but infused with  a raspberry vinaigrette reduction. The taste flow of the burger starts with a fresh crispy sesame seed bun and finishes with the velvety savor of grass fed cow. The service showed flashes of eloquence but graded out average. The waiter forgot the asparagus but we didn't ding him for it. 4 3 
Burgers were pretty good. I had the Nad-alie and my husband had the Tallulah Hula. We shared the Cajun fries which were just okay. I had the Peach is in Fashion Manhattan which was okay as well. Our server was very attentive and nice. Sitting outside (upstairs) was really nice! 4 3 
Came here with a group for lunch and was very pleased to get to know this spot.  Service was excellent - quick, unobtrusive balanced with helpful.  I'm a sucker for duck of any sort and the confit was the perfect portion and very very tasty.  I'll be back! 4 5 
If you want a tasty meaty lunch,  the sandwiches are good.  It is so busy in the evening,  it's hard to get in. Barque Smokehouse is a good place to take friends to with its big Roncesvalles - facing windows. 4 3 
Love this location, have been going for at least 5yrs. Staff is great. Facials fantastic 4 5 
I reunited with two high school friends in Phoenix, Arizona last Spring! Thank goodness not in the extreme summer heat! The other girlfriend flew in from Maryland and we both met up with our friend who gave birth to a baby girl who now lives in Phoenix. Phoenix girl suggested dim sum and to go to this decent chinese restaurant across town. I was hesitant since coming from bay area, we have really good dim sum in the area but nevertheless Maryland girl was craving some chinese food hence dim sum was it. We arrived at 11am and secured a table for 3. As we started indulging in our food, we noticed the stream of people coming in....suprisingly the food was fresh, tasty and decently priced. It was a memorable reunion nonetheless. :) 4 5 
1st time dining here on Friday. With friends. Nice cozy place. Ordered many appetizers and  entrees and tried them all. Fish was fresh and appts were unique and tasty. Fish stew was excellent dish. Bartender Brandi was a delight and Server Dottie made for  a perfect evening with friends. We'll be back. 4 5 
My fav place for 2 reasons 1 Butter Brew!2 Luke!  one of the nicest baristas I have encountered 4 2 
Pretty reasonablly priced crepe and fondue place.  Had the Flamenkuche at the waitress' recommendation which was a soure creame, cheese, bacon, onion tart which was nice. The chocolate fondue was pretty run of the mill but it had some creme puffs as a dipping options which I liked.   Date liked the cholocate ganache dessert crepe.   $10-$15 per plate. 4 3 
An interesting mix if Indian and Nepalese food.  It's a small place in a strip mall but worth trying.  The service is friendly and we met one of the owners (or managers?) who was from the Bay Area and chatted about Indian restaurants back home.  Tikka Masala and Butter chicken are tasty but not at the level of my favorite in SF (Mehfil).  Best I've had in Vegas so far. 4 3 
Ok, so service isn't always the best. The workers can often be clueless and even rude. Luckily, I know Target very well, so I don't need these workers! I can find it myself! The cashiers are hit and miss. Sometimes they don't even mutter "hello", but whatever, I'm at Target. Yeah, it's my happy place. They always have fun stuff and great prices. Things are always well stocked (at least the workers have that part figured out). I can easily drop $100 here even though I just went in for toothpaste. How? It's one of the mysteries of the world, I suppose. So when I'm trying to save money, I don't go here! If I really need something, I do not, repeat, do not get a cart, but a basket! That way I can't fit much in my basket. I think Target is a girl thing. Guys don't really get it. But if you are a girl, you get it. It's Target. 4 3 
The rice to fish/meat/topping ratio is amazing!  You definitely get your money's worth.  Lunch specials are always cheap and filling.  This place is a hidden gem. 4 5 
The pizza and spaghetti are very yummy. The calzones and meatball sub is amazing. The staff here is incredibly friendly, and their prices are very reasonable for the quality of food. Definitely worth your time. 4 5 
This is really more of a 3.5 kind of place food wise but the service was excellent. I got the pad thai and my friend got the drunken noodle. They were about $12 each which is a bit expensive but the portions they gave were more than enough to last two or three meals. It wasn't the best pad thai I've had but it definitely wasn't the worse.  If you're a student you get 20% off so don't forget to tell your waiter! 4 3 
Fantastic food & drink. Great selection of lunch and dinner foods. The patio seating and bar are fantastic. 4 5 
Does anyone else find the price outrageous and the service mediocre at this restaurant? The food is great but the servers act like you are begging them for food! LOL.. the portions are so small and unlike most restaurants, the choices are so limited and unaccomodating 4 3 
I go here because they offer a gluten free crust and vegan cheese. I usually get the arugula and pear Pizza, as well as the quinoa salad.  Both are delicious. I am subtracting one star because their servers don't always know what Vegan means. Also, the water they serve is absolutely disgusting. I've never tasted anything quite as bad. They say it goes thru a filter but I don't know. It seems so dirty. 4 3 
For the price, very reasonable... I laughed, I was entertained and I had fun!!! xxx 4 5 
Great food! Excellent service and food was made fresh! Must try calzones and pasta. Went close to closing time waitress was still friendly and professional. 4 5 
I've been to Combs a number of times and I've always been satisfied with their service.  I also recently recommended them to a friend after the Mini dealer told her she needed $5000 worth of repairs, and Combs took care of her for $1500. But you never really get to know a place until a problem arises.  That's the trial by fire.It seems like I've been to a number of shops over the years where they'll fix a problem and then a week or two later another problem pops up in the same general area and they *never* admit to even the possibility that they were responsible.Combs was different.  They had replaced my fuel pump and a couple weeks later the Check Engine light came on with a code 'evap system leak'.  I guessed it was likely it had something to do with the previous repair since they had had to drop the tank and reinstall it to replace the pump.  To my surprise the service manager volunteered the same guess.  He thought a seal maybe hadn't gotten seated properly and asked me to leave the car with them so they could drop the tank again and check it out.  They ended up finding a hose that had come loose and fixed it.  No argument, no hassle, no charge!Combs is a long way from my house but they're my first choice when it comes to auto repair.  They're an honest shop. 4 1 
d) we had better wine at home for 1/3 the price :-) 4 2 
I generally eat here 2-3 times a week. By far the best place in Brookpark to get breakfast. Hearty, fresh portions at good prices with good service. I usually go with the western omelet, but they have very good french toast as well. Their hash browns are awesome. They are pan fried red potatoes. You could say I'm a fan. 4 5 
I had a nice experience with this salon! Being from out of town i wasn't sure where to go and who to trust. I was in bad need of a hair cut and color. The receptionist was friendly and introduced me to Josie who did a great stylist cut and covered my grays!!! Best of all the hair color products was gentle on my skin. 4 5 
After I finally got the keys to my room at the Flamingo in Las Vegas, I opened the curtains & my mouth hit the floor when a pink sign across the street at Caesars Palace caught my eye. I can't believe Serendipty & the infamous Frozen Hot Chocolate is in Vegas!  I don't have to fly to NYC to get one. 4 5 
Great crepes and overall quality. The prices are too high, but hey that Vegas. Good for a group of four but not more than that. 4 3 
AMBIENCE: A little hectic, especially when you first get off the escalator. You walk straight into a crowd and it's not clear where to go to get your name on the list (hint: it's on the right). SERVICE: Friendly and patient while I pored over the tantalizing menu, asking repeatedly for a couple more minutes. Even though the waitress was clearly busy, she kept checking on us. FOOD: I got talked out of ordering the (gigantic) blueberry pancakes and went with the chicken and waffles instead. It comes with 4 big waffle squares and 2 large fried chicken breasts. Definitely too much for one person. If the chicken fried steak is on the menu when you're there, you have to get it. It was enormous. VALUE: Excellent. Especially for being on the strip. You may want to split an entree. DRAWBACK: The wait can be super long. We actually got on the list, went up to our hotel room for 45 min, came back, and then waited another 15 minutes before we were called. Then we waited another 10 minutes before actually being seated. The food/value make this place worth the wait though. 4 3 
I'm a student doing a summer internship downtown so I booked this place for the 12 weeks. They offered me a great deal for the long term stay, it was discounted due to the length of my stay. I read the reviews, but still decided to book. The outside is nice looking, but then again, it looks like a hotel. The reception area wasn't spectacular, but I didn't expect much after the price I was quoted. The hallway carpet has stains, but so does the Biltmore. I was given a 2nd floor room, but requested first floor since I would be leaving early in the morning to work and staying awhile. They had no issue with having me look at a couple available first floor rooms and choose one. The rooms were impressive actually. The stove, sink, full fridge, and bathrooms were very nicely set up and in good shape. The bed isn't the most comfortable, but definitely not a deal breaker. There is a HD flat screen TV with free cable, and also free internet available. I've been here a week so far and I am very happy I stayed with this choice. The pool, although I have not been in it, looks nice and I see somebody cleaning it every morning. 4 3 
The whole process can be confusing for a first timer. Be sure to grab a ticket on your right as soon as you walk through the door. I missed this crucial step on my first visit, and spent 10 minutes standing in front of the sandwich meats like an idiot.Once you do get a ticket, it can be hard to communicate with the employees over the loudness of the ever-present crowd, so be prepared to shout.Those problems aside, the meat is of decent quality at an excellent price. Any place where I can get a whole chicken, a pound of ground beef and a pound of bacon for $10 and not get food poisoning gets my stamp of approval. 4 2 
As soon as you walk in you know that you are in a different kind of coffee shop from all of the cookie cutter reclaimed wood edison bulb places. The smell of freshly roasted Ethiopian coffee beans fills the space. Walls are lined with specialty Ethiopian foods like spicy Berbere paste and Teff Injera is made fresh on select days. Delicious! You can have a typical machiatto/latte or go full on for the Coffee Ceremony. Croissants from Fantail bakery on Roncesvalles are also brought in daily. This is a great new spot for the Beaconsfield, Parkdale neighbourhood. 4 5 
Excellent food, lost a star because wait staff left us hanging without follow up after meal served. Nobody came around again.Had to hover over register to get, and pay tab.Ice tea is instant, not fresh. 4 2 
It took a couple tries for me to warm up to Carmon's. Spouse got it quicker, and finally convinced me to go back. I did and have returned again and again. It has become one of the go-to places for Spouse and I.What was different? For starters, I came for dinner. That's important, I think. Carmon's has a distinct French bistro vibe that really shines at dinner but doesn't at lunch. Lunches can feel...odd. A little precious. A little cold. But at dinner, with a stemless glass of delicious red wine, lower lights, darkness outside, the preciousness becomes cozy while the cool allows for privacy that spurs conversation (it helps immeasurably that this is a restaurant where you can actually hear and don't need to shout to be heard across the table.) Second, I branched out from crepes. The fish specials here are uniformly good - never dry, never over-fussed, never over-salted or otherwise over-seasoned. They're fresh, simple, perfectly cooked - extremely hard to do for most restaurants. The fish is usually served over pommes frites that, again, are well-executed: simple, straight, delicious.  We've since had other specials here, too -all of which are straight outta bistro. And good. I haven't left crepes behind, mind. The Nutella crepe is a wonder of richness that must be ordered at least once (and then good luck not ordering it again.) It can't be entirely explained by either the crepe or the nutella. It is more than the sum of its parts - which, I guess, applies to Carmon's itself. I still don't go here for lunch, tho. 4 3 
How fortunate to have such a great indian cusine in monroville and owner is quite gracious.Food is outstanding 4 5 
The pros: they have a lot of technicians on-site so I rarely have to wait for an appointment. The shellac colour selection is good. And the clientele are all young, urban professionals so you feel OK about going here. They do an ok to good job on your manicure - it's not perfect, but it's way better than I can do at home and it's quick (approx. 25 minutes) so you're in/out. Bonus points for the shoulder massage with shellac. Hey, sometimes you might even want to splurge an extra $10 for an additional 10 minute massage. The cons: you get what you pay for. It's by no means luxurious. They churn you in and out. Sometimes there's a lot of yelling, and if you're coming off a stressful day, it can grate on your nerves. Overall, they do a good enough job that I find myself coming back frequently because it's near my office. For the price you pay, it'll do. 4 3 
Decent pizza for the price.  Probably great for kids party to feed a lot of people without spending a lot of money. 4 3 
We had the short ribs with polenta and green beans and they were outstanding.  Service was okay - nothing to brag about. 4 3 
I dropped by Madison's for a late dinner before going out this past week.  The restaurant was split into two sections - one with a traditional bar feel (much louder and starting to get busier as the evening progressed) and the other with more of a traditional restaurant feel to it.  I choose to sit on the quieter, restaurant half.The service was good - attentive and friendly.  They had a good beer selection including my favorite - Bells, so no complaints on that front.  For dinner I ordered the turkey pesto sandwich and my friend got the mac and cheese.  We both ordered sweet potato tots.  The food was better than expected given some of the prior reviews I had read and the tots were excellent.  I love pesto and melted goat cheese added the perfect touch.  The mac and cheese - made with local Hook's cheese -  was also very good. 4 3 
Came on a Saturday for lunch before going to the Lion King.  Got in right after a large group on the patio outside and before another large group was arriving.  Probably 1 of only 2 parties eaching inside (2-4 people).  Place was pretty empty.Service was good.  Bread/crackers good.  Water stayed full.  We ordered a burger, an asian chicken dish (good, but nothing too special), bbq chicken pita (decent, with homemade potato chips, again, nothing special), and crab cakes (appetizer, came with 5 about the size of golf balls, again, decent).  I had the burger and it was quite tasty.  Came with cheese (said gouda but I got cheddar, without knowing it), (awesome) bacon, tomato (salsa-like, nice touch), and a garlic aeole (couldn't taste).  Very tasty burger- would definitely get this again.  Got a really nice side of fruit with berries and mango.Menu is mostly sandwiches/burgers, with a couple of asian dishes and some salads.  Kind of random I thought.  Great spot for a quite, though slightly spendy, lunch outing.  Total was around $70 (tip included) for the above mentioned items. 4 3 
I walked a mile to Mr. Sammich, and it was so worth it. The banh-mi sammiches are kinda compact, so you can easily eat several different ones.  I had #45, the tofu version.  Something about the sauce plus the cilantro plus the perfect french bread unified to rule my universe like a gakked-up unicorn with a laser horn.  I had a coconut drink to wash it down, you know, the coconut with the lobotomy hole in the top, and a spoon to scrape out the white brains.  So back to the bread.  Let me tell you how perfect it was.  I went to the Mr Sammich bathroom facility (clean, totally ok).  I walked in 3 circles, doubled over with headache pain, and resurrected half the #45.  What a waste of a tasty sammich.  Before you get all grossed out and close this browser tab, let me say this: "the bread was just as awesome on the way out".  I'm not a regular puker, so don't think I have experience tasting food twice.  I don't.  But that doesn't change the fact that I noticed how tasty it was, twice.  Mr Sammich, you rule. 4 5 
One of our favourite places to order from when we are feeling lazy. We usually get the jerk chicken and the roti because they are so good!! Not only is the food delicious, the delivery is always quick and courteous. 4 5 
This is the best restaurant  and bar on the strip that makes you feel like you are not in Las Vegas. Having 3 different floors great food and reasonable prices for drinks. Especially for being in Las Vegas. The staff is always really friendly and fast service. 4 5 
Food City is a "Meeh-he-co" experience in itself. The deli is good for cerviche, burritos and the like. The bakery has those great empanadas, try the pineapple. The fruit and vegetable section is par none, with great variety and prices. Lets just say, their are always mexicans and asian folks buying fruits and vegetables there. They know this stuff. To top it all off, on somedays, they BBQ whole chicken outside on real wood coals, not that charcoal bullshit and not gringo gas, but real bonafide wood. This yardbird is good, and if your real nice, buy some green chiles and ask the person to roast them for you outside and slip them a few dollars ;) Like I said, Meeh-he-co experience. 4 3 
We arranged a shoot with Townsley to get some family portraits done of our 3-member family. We selected the Union Station locale as we felt it matched well with our love of travel. It also happens to be the closest offered location to where we live in SE LA County :)  Stuart was pretty much on time and we got right down to photo shooting. We did not use the interior of Union Station, rather we went into the courtyard between the station and the next-door MWD building. This is a nice enough area but it doesn't really have any travel connection. I suppose lighting would be a real problem inside the station.The shoot was pretty quick and painless, even with a 15 month old along. You do need to go to the Townsley office in Beverly Hills to review proofs and order your pictures, so be prepared for that. We haven't gone yet, so we don't know what the finished product will look like. Will update the review when we get our portraits. 4 3 
pros:love the bang bang shirmp!I love the mango salsa sauce on grilled fish. service was good.cons:the quantity is small. 4 3 
Great food and fun vibe. But the service wasn't the best. The waitress could have been a little more attentive... I would have understand had she had a ton of tables but she had one other and much of the time she was sitting in a booth doing nothing. 4 3 
I wanted to treat myself to a fun gel manicure and decided to give this place a try. I looked through the photos posted on yelp by other customers and even on Nail Candy's Facebook and Instagram, and noticed that most of the beautiful designs were done by a technician named Hope. I called on a Friday asking for a same day appointment with Hope, but the receptionist curtly informed me that Hope was booked all day, and that the next available appointment would be on Saturday. I came in on Saturday early for my appointment, but still had to wait 20 minutes past my appointment time, even though the salon was empty. Furthermore, my appointment was not with Hope (she went out to get food), but with a technician named Felicia. During my nail appointment, the techs were all chatting about their love interests and were using vulgar language. I would not recommend bringing a child here. Beyond this, my actual nail art was STUNNING. I've received so many compliments on my nails. Felicia helped me choose the exact shape and design I wanted, right down to the colors. She seemed very excited to do the design I chose and was extremely friendly throughout the process. Although it took about an hour to complete, my nails looked gorgeous, AND they've lasted an absurd amount of time (FIVE WEEKS -- They even lasted through all the heavy lifting involved in moving into a new apartment. They're very grown out, but at this point I just want to see how long they'll last before starting to chip.) I did end up paying a pretty penny for them: $48 without tip. Overall, the customer service and price leaves something to be desired, but the finished product is everything you could ask for. 4 1 
I'm sorry the food was so good I forgot to share before I eat! Hahaha,... #Anondo has one of the best #indianfood in town ever! #food #yyz #foodporn #tasty #nomnom #hungry #goodeats #letseat #silentsuspekts #ssmedia #yyz #toronto #lifestyle #design #fashion #media #socials #events 4 5 
That is correct. That was the first time I personally had to wait, but once in... all was forgiven. My go to Sushi is always the Caterpillar roll. 4 3 
This place consistently has good deals on seasonal fruits and veggies. Pay for your fruits quickly at the fruit cashier in the north upper corner of the store, and everything else (including fruit) in their proper downstairs cash area if you are shopping for a bigger variety of food. They got everything - lots of seafood in the back centre aisle, meats in the back corner, vegetables on the left side (recently reorganized - much fresher space) and everything in between in the middle aisles. With the price of dried goods and other shelf stable stuff par for the area, I never go to Chinatown without going to this store. I don't want to miss a deal! 4 3 
Went to Joyride again tonight. Had the chicken burrito. ***AMAZING** That is one fine burrito. My wife and I each ordered a margarita. OOPS!!! Delicious, YES, but small and $9.00 each. NOT WORTH IT AT ALL!!!!! I will not order that again. WOW!~!! This is a 4.75 - 5.00 drink and it is really good but MASSIVE OVERPRICE. The service was excellent again. Definitely go to this place but, watch those drink prices. WHEW!!!! 4 3 
I ordered online for pick up and it was ready before i arrived 13 minutes later.  That's great considering I've waited almost 30 minutes in drive thru at a fast food resturant before having to be to work. I ordered a complete meal for my fiance and i, & it was very good. The only reason i am not giving a 5 star is because the woman i dealt with when i ordered an extra pastry upon my arrival, was very ride,  & seemed irritated with the fact that i wanted more food. . In turn spending more money. But whatever. My steak & cheese panini was amazing, along with my chicken & rice soup. Of course i got a blueberry muffin as well. 4 3 
Brandon is one cool cat, and will take the time to learn about what you intend to play and then assist you in finding the right axe for your style. On request, he'll even put down some solos to your chord progressions to hear the groove of two pieces at once. Great guy, working hard at a real good guitar shop. They're much more about moving big gear versus little gear but that's no big whoop to me; the six-string and bass selection is not to be outdone by any shop in town. If you want a big name gitbox: Do some light research online, check each one of them out by noodling at Guitar Center, and then take some cash and go get a sweet deal on that same instrument from Brandon at Bizarre. 4 5 
First time and it's very delicious the service is nice and the overall theme reminds me of the old days 4 5 
Totally looked up car washes on a whim and this was the closest. Super cheap, super fast which is just what I was looking for. Felt like I got a great deal for the wash at 13.99 plus tip. While I went thru the car wash in the vehicle they then cleaned the inside while I went into pay. Great service and great job 4 5 
I get take-out 3x a week as I work close by - it's so fresh and healthy (they even offer low fat sour cream).    I've tried every burrito place in the downtown core and this is my favorite as it's always fresh and fast.    Line ups are long but move fast ....longer wait for the burritos but super fast if you get an inside-out burrito (no fajita) or a salad (same but with more lettuce and dressing on side) 4 5 
Every time we went in there weren't many people; which was fine for us. You seat yourself and your server will usually come quickly. Nice and clean from what we could see. Friendly staff. Some of the bread was a little hard, but it wasn't the end of the world. We still ate it. We liked the environment so we will likely be back. 4 3 
Had the shrimp cocktail inside the coconut with a Mexican coke. Comes with a side of saltine crackers & some super hot chili sauce- waitress warned me that though delicious one should be cautious with it. It comes with a good amount of shrimp which tasted as fresh as it can get in Arizona. My total bill was about $22. On another note, the restaurant has an old jukebox with a good selection of Mexican music. Don't be shy about asking for the volume to be turned up as the jukebox is somewhat hidden in another room & it's hard to hear. In addition they have a small garden in the back that I love to sit in as it reminds me of my grandma in Mexico. 4 3 
Outstanding selection of beers including some local IPA and Double IPA that I strongly recommend if you like high hops and IPAs.  Dawren and the other barkeeps can draw them off for you.  Have eaten meals there many times and the food is always good as well.Have visited there many times over 12 years of annual trips and it's always a good visit. 4 5 
Man, this place is the bomb. The fact that it exists in Solon and not one of the other 'burbs makes it even better, as that town's ample workforce can definitely use a good healthy lunchtime alternative to the droves of chain restaurants that line Routes 43 and 91. The restaurant occupies a small spot in the Giant Eagle plaza and is surrounded by several storefronts that at the time of this writing are unoccupied. People of Solon: SUPPORT THIS PLACE! It's family-owned and the sweet ladies that work the place will remind you of your one Eastern European aunt that derives bizarre amounts of pleasure from watching you stuff your soup hole with spoonful after spoonful of steaming hot goodness.The homemade soups rotate in and out seasonally and are divided into hearty and lighter sections on the menu. They also have tons of veggie and gluten-free options. These soups are WAY better than the ones found at the Zoup! down the street. The wraps and sandwiches are pretty good as well, though not as outstanding as the soups. C'mon, what are you waiting for?! Get off your duff already! 4 5 
Best pizza chain around this area. Thin and thick crust are both good. Great sauce and pepperoni. 4 5 
Best vegetarian pizza in town - great ingredients, great tasting, love it. 4 5 
I sure miss this Boba experience! Every trip to Vegas finds me here. Their large is perfect! The Boba is perfect. Their honey milk tea is just the right sweetness! 4 5 
The reviews made me nervous, but we ate here anyway because we were hungry and didn't want fast food.  It's nothing fancy, but overall the food was decent.  Our waitress was attentive.  Plus it didn't take long to get our food.  Overall I was glad we decided to take a chance. 4 3 
Good BBQ. OK but not great. Staff is friendly and fun. Atmosphere is always good. The food is real BBQ not the normal boiled and oven cooked fare. I always can go to a Famous Dave's and know I will get good BBQ at fair prices and sides are always good. I have had 5 star BBQ around the county but when a chain tries to make great BBQ they always seem to fall just short. You will get your moneys worth and have a great meal. 4 3 
My primary care physician recommended him to me. I am glad that she did. The experience was great. Staff at LEI is very friendly and cooperative. Dr Matthew is experienced expert and highly professional. He understood my husband's problem and took care of it.I would surely recommend him to friends and family.Salma khan 4 5 
I've been to Meatheads twice since they opened. The first time I had their basic 1/3 lb cheeseburger with all the trimmings ("grilled" onion, lettuce, tomato, mayo, ketchup, and pickles). I also shared a mocha shake. The food arrived fast and the burger was great, except I was certain they made a mistake since the onion on my burger was raw (still crunchy and spicy). Still a good, but greasy burger. The shake was the real star; it tasted like it was made with fresh coffee.My second visit I got the same with the addition of fries. The total was about $12, so it's not the cheapest burger joint in town. Biting into my burger I got the same raw onion taste. So, it seems to me they heat the onions on the grill, but don't actually grill them; it was still white. The second go at the mocha shake was just as good as the first with an intense coffee flavor. The small order of fries was huge, and probably more than I should have eaten.As others have said, parking is a mess. The restaurant probably has twice as many tables as parking spaces. 4 3 
We saw the Food Network's Diners, Dives, and Drive-Ins when my parents were in town.  So, we decided to try it out but went to the Scottsdale location because it was closer than the Phoenix location.  It was on Bell Road right next to the Ice Den.  I guess normally there is a 30 min wait but we got seated right away.  I ordered Omelette #4 (spinach  with tomato, garlic and feta cheese).  It was DELICIOUS!     My mom had the blueberry pancakes and really enjoyed them.  Prices are a little high ($3 for 3 pieces of bacon), but all in all, I thought the food was tasted very good and was filling.  I would definitely go back. 4 3 
Decent prices, authentic food, SPICYWhatever spice lvl you're used to getting, go down about 2-3. I thought I was manly and got a lvl 8 pad-see-ew... was literally tearing, my friend had a good laugh. It depends on the dish though as my friends chicken was fine (also an 8). Definitely recommend if your into Thai food 4 3 
It's good pizza. Happy hour from 3-6 has good prices on both food and drinks. However I have to take a star away for the regular menu prices. We both felt our sicilian pizza was good but certainly not worth $32. We will probably return for strictly happy hour food and drinks but I doubt we'd go back at night. 4 3 
We went for lunch and got there about 11:30.  No one was there except the owner Dan. Since we were early he was able to tell us about his business and his passion for making great pizza and other pasta dishes. He kept us mesmerized with his story of starting his pizza shop and his passion of making award winning food. Great food and an enjoyable owner. I live in West Newton so it takes awhile to get to Castle Shannon.  I will be back this time on Sunday when his mom makes her  gnocchi. Dan said to me when we're out we're out. So get there early. To bad he is not in Westmoreland county. Love Franco's. 4 5 
If you're a fan of poutine then I would recommend coming here. This is the only place I've been to in Toronto thus far that puts a decent amount of cheese on poutine. And I am a fan of cheese. If you agree that there's never enough cheese on your poutine without you having to pay extra- and even then it's still not enough cheese- then this might be your place. I've also tried their fish and chips and they weren't bad. I wasn't particularly fond of the wings I tried but my friends liked it so it's a matter of preference and flavour.My 4 Factors:Food: 35/50Service: 15/20Timeliness: 15/20Good Vibes: 10/10Total: 75/100- BTips:If you'd like to eat in then go to the one on St. Clair, the Kensington location doesn't have much seating and a lot of it is outside.Favourite Dish: PoutineRating System:A- Excellent (80+)B- Good (70-79)C- Tolerable (60-69)D- Something but not good (50-59)F- Not even if I was starving (49-)4 Factors:Food (50%)- How does it taste?Service (20%)- How was I treated?Timeliness (20%)- Did my food get there before I expired?Good Vibes (10%)- Could I relax and eat my food/atmosphere/space? 4 3 
I'm going to go with the 3.5 stars as well.We walked in without a reservation and got a great window seat right away.  I really did like the room, it worked and was warm.  I had the asparagus soup which tasted well nothing like asparagus but it was a winner because the scallop in it was fabulous.  There was also a potato puree involved.  For my entree I had the salmon with crab, bearnaise  sauce, fingerling potatoes and asparagus.  Now my fault for ordering the asparagus soup with potato puree and then having repeat ingredients on my entree.  It kind of peeves me when restaurants have repeat ingredients.  It's a personal thing.  I kind of instantly found the bearnaise sauce a little cold but moved on.  The food was good, old school good.  Like it reminded me of something I'd have years ago at dinner.  Classic French, but I did like it!I found the service a little stuck between two different places. They tried to give good, fine dining service but I found these little upsells that I wasn't really buying into.  Like coming over and trying to sell us a Cognac flight after we both said we didn't drink Cognac.  Weird.  Also giving us INSANE pours of our wine.  Who does that?  We won't drink me just because it is in our glass.  Lastly, the cheese plate seriously needs to be worked on.  Great concept but really generic cheeses.  There were about 7 different types that were the size of practically my fingernail.  They were things like "gouda" and "white cheddar" - I have no idea what they were doing on there.  There was also this one cheese that they made look like a flower.  It was HORRIBLE and quite possibly the worst cheese I have ever tried.  Overall I did like it for a Vegas restaurant.  I could just really do without the little upsells they sneak in or maybe not be so obvious about it. 4 3 
Chuck was great for my husband and I. Allowed us to lay on many mattresses even though we walked in at closing. (We didn't realize it until I started to Yelp) Chuck even left us alone to talk and go back and fourth from mattress to mattress. The experience was so enjoyable without any pressure. 4 5 
They did a good job...I tend to judge it not just by the result but by how much attention the guy is giving your car.  He worked hard, and the interior looked great.  Would definitely return 4 5 
-----------------------------

I took yelps advice and it didnt do me wrong . When i arrived i was greeted by some very friendly staff. I felt very welcomed. Means alot when your traveling alone. First thing i noticed about this place was the cute decor different but i liked it. Especially the use of different kind of chairs. They gave me time to figure out what i wanted and made great suggestions. I ordered food was good and i was full. Only thing that wasnt my favorite was the water but i think thats a city problem . I checked in with yelp to get a free mimosa. Mmmmm. Kinda strong but they dont play in Vegas. My bill was very affordable. The mananger was even nice enough to seat down and give me suggestions on what i can do here. Very nice and sweet of him. Go check them out. 5 4 
i loved the hazelnut coolatta, my son loved the doughnut holes. the quality of the product is what will be will be bringing me back to this location, the staff was a little mixed up but the coolatta and the doughnut holes made up for that. 5 4 
Lovely little coffee shop :) It's cozy and you can get delicious coffee and simple eats. It's great! 5 4 
After calling just about every Westside mechanic and asking about programming my Vance and Hines fuelpak they all said , "nope, haven't done one of those". I finally called Synyster and telling him I had the instructions and settings, he told me to bring the bike by and he would look at it, like now, anytime today. I putted over and Jeremy looked over the instructions, talked with one of his techs and Bam, have a seat, I'll get right on it. Just over an hour later with a miniscule bill of $78 bucks I was cruising down the road with a well running 1200 Sportster. Now you can't do better than that. Give them a shot. I know I will be back 5 1 
After a recent SHITE trip to Streets of New York (which is the most accurate way of describing how their pizza tastes) I really need to vouch for this Domino's. As noted before, they are always fast and friendly. They have the nicest delivery drivers. Unlike Streets. Domino's has never made me sick either. 5 4 
Stopped here for a quick dinner with a friend as we were both craving some Korean fried chicken reminiscent of our time spent in Korea. I have to say, I really wasn't expecting much walking in (mostly just picked this place because it's a really convenient location - just steps from Finch stn), but I left very pleasantly surprised/satisfied!The interior is pretty much your standard Korean restaurant/bar setting - dimmed lights, Korean music, K-pop videos showing on the TV screen. I was pretty happy that the music wasn't turned up overly loud as a lot of bars in the area tend to do so my friend and I could actually hold a conversation. It is not a big space at all but it didn't feel cramped even with another table sitting next to us.The server was very helpful with navigating the menu and we ended up ordering the cheesed corn, standard half+half chicken (fried and sauced) and the spicy grilled chicken(?). They brought out some complimentary popcorn with our drinks and the corn came out pretty quickly - served on a sizzling plate and definitely a nice app to start with! The chicken is of course the most important factor in judging a chicken restaurant and this place did not disappoint! Of all the Korean fried chicken places I've tried in Toronto, I think this place comes the closest to what I remember eating so regularly back in Korea. The fried half was very crispy, perfectly seasoned and made of smallish (but meaty) dark meat pieces. The sauce was the right mix of sweet/spicy and was not used excessively like some places do (on a side note, we did confirm with the server that the side radishes and the sauces for the chicken are both made in-house and not store bought).We barely tried the spicy grilled chicken as we were both so full from the fried chicken but from what little I did try, it was a little too spicy for my tastes but a great complement to the fried chicken, in that it somewhat eases that "greasy" feeling you get after eating a few pieces?All in all, will definitely be coming back here whenever I get a Korean friend chicken craving and would recommend to all looking for the same! 5 4 
The only pizza place we order from in the south of Calgary! Sure delivery takes an hour in peak time but we only order on weekends so we expect it and plan for it. Busy is a good sign that they serve good food! Drivers are always polite, the food is great and exactly what you order is exactly what shows up. Oh yeah, and they don't skimp on FRESH toppings. Keep up the good work. 5 4 
In my last review I was not thrilled with the service. I guess someone noticed. We've been back several times in the last couple of months and now the service is very good. We have also tried several more of their food creations and they are all delicious and nicely presented. They have a special summer menu offering some terrific salads and beverages. Also, their filtered coffee is some of the best in the city, served with a small biscuit drizzled with chocolate on the side! 5 4 
Excellent place with good food, fast service and plenty of screens to watch the game. Prices are affordable and the service was prompt and courteous. 5 4 
Now this is goood stufff it better then any I've had in a long time time.... Good for groups n itss 5starrrrrr 5 4 
Fun place to be...esp.during spring training time. If you're into getting autographs it's easy here during spring training. I'm not even that into sports but I'm originally from Ohio and my friend (ohio friend) comes here esp.for spring training (she loves the Cleveland Indians who train here along with the Cincinatti Reds).  The amount of signatures and pics of players we've gotten over the years is amazing.  The games are fun to watch...I just chill and drink a margarita. The whole ball park is so family friendly. They do events. My family enjoys the halloween event. 5 4 
I Really like this place because it's small, usually not too busy other than occasional weekends and it's so refreshing to have a small farm in the middle of the city. Well worth visiting. Across the street is the necropolis cemetery which is also an arboretum and very pleasant to walk around and look at the old gravestones. We saw a fox walking around on one occasion! 5 4 
Great food and people running it.  I highly recommend the vermicelli bowls as they are like nothing I've found elsewhere. Unfortunately I've moved from the area but whenever I'm back I always try to stop back.  Again: get a Vermicelli bowl. 5 4 
I love this place! Whenever I can convince someone to get up early and eat some awesome biscuits and gravy, it is the best day ever! Seriously, I recommend the biscuits and gravy... plus the atmosphere is pretty neat. Kinda reminds me of a Grandma who hordes country decor lol.... they have great food though. 5 4 
We came here for my mom's 80th bday  It was our first time there. Reservations were made for 10 and we were seated promptly at 7pm on a sunday night. The restaurant was somewhat quiet but we weren't complaining since most restaurants are usually too noisy.We ordered a lot of food. Everyone ordered a plate for themselves and also lots of rolls and sashimi to share. The rolls were amazing and also hugh. One of our guests has never eaten sashimi before and she loved it ( she couldn't believe raw fish can taste so good and not fishy at all). The price was not the cheap but the food and service were very good. Our 20 something kids enjoyed it so much that they went back there a week after for more and introduced a friend to this place.We will definitely come back. 5 4 
As someone who is debatably the most unathletic individual on the east side of Madison, I was thoroughly impressed with how much fun I had at Keva sports. They have a variety of courts, are a great place to check out if you are interested in joining some sort of sports league, and have beer specials almost everyday of the week. 5 4 
It's an Europian coffee shop where u can sit outside and enjoy your drink.They make good machiato(my husband loves it),delicious and healthy smoothies.I love that ginger peach hot tea..We go there almost 3 times a week.But know that my hus is in vacation we will come often.We take his parents too,cause as Europian we like these kind of places.I forgot to mention it,you don't forget to try the gelato,especially the chocolate one... 5 4 
This place is great and has surprisingly great cookies, too. Big portions and good flavor. 5 4 
The food was pretty tasty but what makes this a five star for me is that the staff were also very personalable. The stuffed pepper was oh so good. We got our food to go and had a picnic at the beach (forgot utensils but had napkins) and it was simply a really good experience. 5 4 
Just returned from a weekend getaway with the girlfriends and i must say i was impressed. the hotel is beautiful, rooms are clean and very large with a nice living room added and a bathroom full of mirrors for those selfie enthusiasts! :) but as a new mom who was trying to keep her milk supply, the most impressive part of this hotel had to be the staff. We were leaving sunday night at 11 PM so we had a full 12 hours from check out to leaving Las Vegas. My pump is pretty heavy and bulky so i had to leave it in the large baggage that they stored for us. When i had to pump in the middle of those 12 hours, i went to front desk and asked if they have a small deposit room where i could pump more privately. They've immediately got my old room ready and told me i can stay for as long as i need to do my motherly stuff. I was quite impressed with this as Vegas is a party town and i didn't think they would be so open and friendly about the entire situation. So grateful to those wonderful ladies at the front desk for helping me out! 5 4 
Wicked spoon always has a great selection. Bone marrow with kimchi for dinner is a must. Also if you want a nice dessert bar this is the place to be for dinner. Get there early because there might be a long line. But it should not disappoint 5 4 
This place is too good.there was lots of buffet and different type of food .food is soo tasty.prepration is soo good specially chicken tikka ,saag and dal makhni was too good .if anyone try to eat indian food I suggested this place .service was good it's very good Resturant 5 4 
- If you haven't eaten at The Lakeview, I'd suggest you do.It's quickly become one of my favorite places to go when I'm craving diner food, but want to stay away from the typical greasy spoon diner type-of-place. The Lakeview is open 24 hours-a-day, and that definitely contributes to one of the cool aspects of this place: it isn't that you can eat imaginative diner-esque food at 3 o'clock in the morning on a Tuesday, but also thatyou can eat it at 3 o'clock in the afternoon on aSunday and the experience is entirely different.That's because it's inconsistent, but not in a bad way. It's inconsistent because of the diverse group of peeps you can expect to see there when you go: Sunday afternoon is the brunch crowd, Saturday evening is the daters, Friday late-night is the Ossignton bar crowd. Whenever you go, it's a different sorta experience.It's not just diversity that makes this a kick-ass experience, the food is also spectacular and truly imaginative. The style of upscale-diner definitely comes through on their menu withitems like theCorriander Walnut Pesto Omelette, a Peameal Brie and Havarti Cristo-style sandwich, and the Lakeface Albacore Tuna Melt. It's a genuinely nice blend of the expected and the unexpected. As a side note, I need to mention the impressive veggie burger they've got that's made from black beans and served with a wild mushroom saute and caramelized onions. Spectacular. Whether it's their 24-hour menu or their brunch menu, vegetarian or carnivore items, this place cranks out some delicious food.I'd definitely recommend you check out The Lakeview. They're doing diner food right, 24 hours-a-day. 5 4 
Great cheap sushi.Love the bloor street roll and the wakame salad.Edit: The Bloor Street Roll is sushi with very little rice. A big slab of salmon wraps around the outside with basil and salmon roe in the middle. Really wet. Really fishy. Such a good roll. 5 3 
So my boyfriend and I came here for my birthday ; I have been wanted to try this place since it has opened big fan of Gordon watch him in Hell's Kitchen so I couldn't imagine so where better to celebrate my birthday. Daisy was my server she is so sweet knows the menu very well and suggested great items I didn't even really have to look at the menu I had some fruity cocktail it was very refreshing and her server asst. helped by cleaning items off table and refilling our waters. I got the ribeye medium it was so good ! I ate all it's served with potatoes and my boyfriend had the chicken pot pie chicken was very juicy and gravy was top notch! She suggested the sticky toffee to top it all off it's the best dessert I have ever had I still dream about it served with a vanilla ice cream. I will be back !!!! Thank you daisy for making my birthday special 5 4 
Great food, great coffee. We had a grilled veggie panini and banana zucchini chocolate chip muffin with macchiato. 5 4 
After living in Germany for three years sometimes I'm in the mood for a beer garden. This place is pretty close. Good biergarten food and great beer! Check hours before you go because they're not open every day! 5 4 
I really don't understand all the bad reviews- if you don't want to wait in line or have to say no to a sales pitch take a taxi. I rented a car from here last week for my vacation. We were helped by a woman who I believe was named Murna. She was very helpful and we even chatted about all the bad reviews on here. You get what you pay for- this place has the cheapest cars so expect to wait in line. There was no high pressure sales pitch- they outlined the offers and I responded with a firm no and that was that. 5 3 
I eat here many times. I am that single guy people look at and feel sorry for cause I am reading something and ignoring them, unless she is hot ;)You cannot go wrong with any of the food here. Really.Now that its winter, its PHO and more PHO.As custom men will serve you and the women will take your money, haha.Check it out. 5 4 
Warm atmosphere, smiling faces and cold beer!  Oh and a great menu with excellent food. Try the meatballs and the mignulata. Very delicious. Pizza choices include tasty standards like sausage (from local favorite DeFalco's) and more trendy tastes like fig and goat cheese. I wish it was closer to home. We would have our own permanent table! 5 4 
Great Mexican place in downtown Madison just off State Street. This place strikes you as very authentic (perhaps it was something about the luchador fights on TV in the restaurant with the Spanish commentary).Food was awesome. Had tostadas and gorditas which were both fantastic (chorizo, steak, pastor (pork) - can't go wrong!). You can buy individual tostadas or gorditas for $3.50/$3 each though there are lots more options. Also had this amazing drink that was like milk with cinnamon toast crunch flavoring. Definitely check that out. 5 4 
I've worked for several vet clinics over the years in 3 different states so when I go into a clinic with my own dogs now that I no longer work for a vet I have a list of criteria Im always "hoping" is achieved.1. Cleanliness - my first impression is that they actually look the time and effort to fully decorate the facility and have managed to maintain the aesthetics dispite urine and feces daily, im sure. I noticed clever and cool details like paw prints in the ceiling tiles as well as the decals for the exam rooms and candy for the owners.Professionalism - from my initial phone call to reception to the vet and checkout, you guys rocked it.Knowledge - dr. Zimmerman is awesome, she knows her stuff and I appreciated the fact that she didn't insult my medical intelligence. She also followed thru with calling me with test results, something I have found rare in Vegas.I really appreciated that no one was afraid of my dogs breed or that we were treated like thugs because of it.The prices are competitive and I have found my new vet clinic, thank god!Keep up the great work!Thanks so much,Love Glass, Glynis, Starla and Zero Roades 5 3 
Went back 2nd time very good again my date had the Salmon I had a meatball  Calzone great sauce  will be back 5 4 
I have always found this store clean,friendly and well stocked. The only complainet I have is they are understaffed but thats trure of most places however the folks where are there go out of their way to help.I have been shopping this store since it opened and they are GREAT. 5 4 
One of the best Taco Bells I've been to. I came in around 1230 on a weekday, and it wasn't busy at all. I placed my order and went to wash my hands..by the time I came my food was ready. So you know how you'll take a bite of your food and the contents fall out of the opposite end? Well that's what happened with my beef chalupa (that's a good thing). The food was fresh and they weren't skimpy with the meat or anything lol. Customer service was good as well. No complaints! 5 4 
This is the place for breakfast and brunch slash comfort food. Every week they have a unique flavor of potted bread which is offered as a side to most entrees.  I like the omelette selection.  The wait staff is attentive and very nice. At peak hours there's usually a short 15-30min wait for a table. I like to burn time at Dead Poets Used Bookstore also located in the same strip mall. 5 4 
I F*CKING LOVE BJ'S!  No pun intended. The restaurant is great too. The service is fantastic, but then again, who can say no to BJ's? The food is pretty damn good and the beer selection is awesome. Really though, I always feel treated right, the staff is awesome. The bar tenders are actually pretty cool and personable even when they're busy. Anyone who's read my reviews knows by now, that if it's a good review it's gonna be short and sweet, but my bad reviews are gonna be LONG and very descriptive. This place got the formula right. Great food, great atmosphere, great people, great beer, great desserts, terrible parking lot. The best places always have the worst parking lots. 5 4 
Forget Dunkin' Donuts, where the donuts are the only thing not worth eating, this is the real deal.  A neighborhood donut shop, for reals.  Do the time warp.  Seriously, do it!  Because this place will take you back in time to when donuts were made by...people!First, peruse the nicely varied selection of donuts and other pastries. Then, sidle up to the counter and give your order to the somewhat surly, but efficient server.  Finally, your heaping box of doughy goodness home or take a seat amongst the chatting oldsters.  If you're prone to Homer Simpson style drooling, check yourself.  What are you waiting for?  Get yourself a donut, or three. 5 4 
Brio is always a happy dining experience.  For this specific location, I've only been for happy hour, but I don't see how their regular menu would differ from their location at Town Square.  Their happy hour must be one of the best!  They have a list of items for $2.95.  Don't let the price fool you though.  Their portions are decent sized.  We always order one of everything, and maybe even two of some other things.  (Don't judge us!!)  How could you not though?  Cheap, good food is so hard to pass up!Their service is always amazing.  They check several times to make sure everything is okay and refill drinks before it is necessary. 5 4 
I'm in Pittsburgh at least twice a month and The Proper is my go-to place.  The pizza is very, very good and the bacon candy should be illegal  (in a good way).  The really large draft beer selection is worth the trip by itself. 5 4 
This place is eggcellent (sorry had to do it)    seriously though, check this place out. Great food and good breakfast atmosphere. There are a ton of good choices, and the owner cares and is personally involved. 5 4 
I've eaten at Bad Daddy's a couple times. Always a great atmosphere, great burgers and salads, and good service. Gotta try their Ghirardelli chocolate and peanut butter milkshakes!! 5 4 
Yume is Japanese themed, with a nice selection of sushi rolls and bento boxed lunches, but the best food on the menu is Korean.  The restaurant is small, with a friendly and efficient staff.  Food is served promptly.  Quality control is excellent.    But I know what you're saying, so what?  What's so special about that?  Scottsdale has plenty of good Japanese and/or Korean restaurants, right?I've got three words for you:Bi bim bap.  This dish ranks #30 on the list of the world's most delicious foods and you've probably never heard of it.  You'll probably giggle when you say the name, but for heaven's sake, no matter how fun it is to say bi bim bap over and over, don't do it.  Sure, it's not often you get food with a name that's alliterated, but sadly, most people don't see the beauty in this.  Trust me, I know. What, you ask, is bi bim bap?  In Korean, it means 'mixed rice', but to you and me?  The most excellent beef/rice/veg dish you will ever have.  Seriously.  On the bottom is some nicely seasoned ground beef.  Atop that, steamed white rice.  Then, a rainbow selection of vegetables, some raw, some pickled, some cooked.  Then, the crowning glory, a fried egg - sunny side up, and a garnish of roasted seaweed strips. How to eat it, you ask?  First, there's a red bottle on the table, snag it.  I know what you're thinking, anything could be in that bottle!  Easy tiger, It's chili sauce. Now spiral a bit of sauce over the top of the egg and veg.  Note at this point, that there's a spoon in your bowl, a tablespoon.  You can use in conjunction with your chopsticks or on its own.  Take that handy spoon and break up the egg, letting the yoke flow.  Now mix it!  All of it. Tuck in, mate. You can now die happy. In my opinion, the menu would be complete with just the one item, but the seafood pancake (dinner menu) is also delicious.  It's huge, and as the name implies, filled with seafood.  What seals the deal though, is the sauce.  A thick brown sesame seed, soy, sugar, green onion concoction (ancient Korean secret recipe, no doubt) which probably has enough salt in it to raise your blood pressure.   Just go for it. No worries, life's too short anyway! 5 4 
This place should have a lot more reviews - but I'm glad it doesn't, they don't need to get any busier.Its been there ages, and looks it. If you're all about ambiance, don't bother. If you pretend you're in a movie set in Pittsburgh 30 years ago it works pretty well. The service is sometimes hit or miss. Most of girls are good, one is very slow, one is amazing. They are all friendly and usually a few different people will check in to make sure that you're happy. Everything is made fresh so be prepared that nothing comes flying out of that kitchen - busy times it can take a good while to get food. The food is AWESOME! Worth any little complaints I might think up before it gets there. Once its on the table, I forget them all.-Fish Sandwiich-Salmon (huge and delicious)-Flounder-Shrimp a few ways ("Norfolk" style is oily for my taste, and I never had it growing up in Norfolk.)-Hawkins St Special-Prime Rib (sized for two, watch it)The prices are low, the portions are large, and just about everything on the menu  is delicious. I'm not one to pick a place because they give you a lot of food, but if you like a good value and don't want to compromise on taste, this place is a gem. 5 3 
I shop here regularly and can't believe the variety of what's available, the organization, cleanliness and of course prices. They're always bringing in new items. Sometimes this store gets awfully lined up. This is the cheapest place in town to stock up on plastic left over and lunch containers, stationery, gadgets and candy - if you compare your prices like I do to identical products at the grocery store, mall, etc... 5 4 
A hidden gem. Very nice amenities and reasonably priced. I definitely recommend this place for some good old R&R! 5 4 
Great food with great price. You won't feel you are paying premium for vegetarian food 5 4 
This is the old fashion hardware store on steroids. They have tons of virtually every hardware item in open Bins and with the very knowledgeable, helpful staff. I look here for stuff I can't find at Home Depot. 5 4 
Just by chance I passed by the studio and saw the ad for the 'Hip hop hustle' workshop.  Four sundays in June for $40--never mind that I live an hour away, never mind I'd be out of town for one of those sundays...I. Wanted. To. Live. My. Dream.  Yes, it's a save the last dance/step up kind of dream but dreams are quirky.  You want what you want.I told this all to the husband, he quickly agreed-not because he really wants me to achieve my dream-he didn't mind spending a day in Madison every week.  The dance space is nice, a bit over the top pink but there was a respectable mirror ball.  My instructor, Jeanne, was friendly and, more importantly, helpful.  The first 15 minutes was a little warm up, learning some pretty easy choreography and then the majority of the class was learning a longer hip hop piece.  We learned a chunk every week and put it together at the end.  I felt pretty accomplished by the end of the lessons and wanted to continue the dream...The studio offers lots of different lessons, even a thriller workshop or a britney spears set of classes, and---my next dream: west  african dance.  I had been to Mali and there is really nothing to compare dancing with live drums; you are alive and you are joyful.I either wish I lived closer or they moved here...but moving to beloit? or janesville? hehee....highly unlikely.  I could probably fit a couple more classes but once summer is over, I'll have to put the dream away. 5 2 
Great food and great atmosphere for a family.Very good value! 5 4 
Great place for drinks and a view of the Bellagio fountains from behind. Had drinks there last Monday with a friend around 6pm. No cover, no crowds, and was able to get seating in the lounge area and later at the bar. 5 4 
Although this isn't my home parish this is one of the few parishes around the dioceses of Las Vegas that offers Spanish mass. It is a little bit of an older church but it, like all the other churches around, is very welcoming. I believe my favorite thing is when they do their taco nights. Those tacos are the BOMB DIGGITY!!! Not even taco bell compares to what they sell. The church has floor seating but there is also a second story that offers extra seating. 5 4 
So I have been burned by yelp reviews before, but this time they sent me to a delicious food truck! The jerk  chicken was decadent. If you have a low tolerance for spicy, however, probably stick with the beef patty. I promise it tastes WAY better than it looks. We also got the jerk chicken burrito special, which was all the flavors at once. Highly recommend! 5 4 
I love rebar, there are tons of friendly people here-I almost always make new friends when I come. The drinks are always flowing, and the food is always good! My favorite dishes are the black bean burger, the jicama that comes with the wings, and the grits and shrimp. Definitely a good place for vodka mixers-less options when it comes to wine. 5 4 
This is a quaint, hole-in-the-wall, mom and pops type of place. It's usually not very busy, which baffles me cause they make the best damn baos & dumplings in the city. The owners are very personable and friendly, although there are a few communication problems if you don't speak mandarin. As someone who has had fresh off the steamer bao from vendors in China, I can vouch that this is probably going to be as good as it gets for authentic food in Toronto. I am pretty sure their the flour is home made, and bonus points for their Green Onion Pancakes that doesn't taste like someone dropped the salt while making it.Edit: Pro-tip : be patient or speak mandarin since there might be a language barrier when ordering online! 5 4 
Fair prices. I did not feel like I needed to get several prices after talking to them. They were booked out till 3 days....a good sign they are in demand. He explained to me that the prior repair(only about 3 years ago) had given me cheap small springs. DO NOT GO WITH THE BIG NAME REPAIR COMPANIES) . I recommend these guys and will use them again. 5 4 
Had their standard gyro which was BIG, so much meat on there it could have easily been split into 2-3 individual gyros so they def do not skimp on portions & you get your money's worth. Tasted great, no complaints. 5 4 
I thought my shoes had the biscuit when my puppy chewed them. This shop made the best of a bad situation and I am thoroughly impressed by their work and will return, hopefully for other reasons. 5 4 
I love Terriaco's and I have been going there for years.  There is a big difference in having alterations done at Terriaco's versus a seamstress.  These guys are pros.  They could look at you and know exactly what clothes you should wear.  Domenic and Frank know a lot about clothing and how it is made, and how you should wear your clothes.  I have worked with both Domenic and Frank and both are very honest which I LOVE, but I guess if you are overly sensitive you could get offended.  Personally I like to get someone's opinion...especially a man's opinion on what looks good.  This is the place to go if you want something to wear for a special occasion!!  The clothes at Terriaco's are beautiful, and fit better than dept. store clothes. 5 4 
My husband and I were looking for a fine dining experience - a night away from our toddlers. We took a chance with Firebirds as we had never been. We started the night with the lobster spinach queso, which was amazing with the fresh bread (in lieu of the chips) served prior to the entree (as suggested by our amazing waiter, Sam). He was funny and gave us a great feedback about the dishes and wine. We ordered the slow roasted ribeye, which was perfectly cooked - definitely try it. We also enjoyed the spiced pecan green beans and lobster tail. We ended the night with a warm brownie (it's large and my husband and I shared). The prices were fair and honestly we felt we received a LOT of bang for our buck. Even after leaving a 20% tip, our bill was surprisingly affordable. We loved the high end feel of the restaurant while it was perfectly acceptable to wear jeans. It is casual without pretention. Loved it all! 5 4 
Leaps and bounds better than the average sushi takeout place. Sushi was very fresh and well executed. Portions are not huge, but I would rather quality over quantity anyways. Would definitely eat here again. 5 4 
I had my big olde english sheepdog groomed here and they did a fine job and the price was on par with everyone else. Actually I think the price is about $10 more, but I'll pay the extra money because of the extra service this place provides.I really appreciate that they have a pet taxi, bc of this service my dog gets a ride home for free (but we did tip the driver). Since I have a little child it's hard for me to bring my dog and pick him up on the days I would have time to pick him up, so the taxi is worth it for me. Bc of this service I can now drop off my dog before I go to work and my husband (on days he's caring for my daughter) can be home to let my dog inside. This is easier for me than having to bring my 100+ dog inside while holding my baby.Shauna's is right next to Mountainside Fitness, it's right in Surprise so if you live in Surprise this place will be easy to get to. I also thought the service was great too. I'll definitely be taking my dog back here the next time he needs to get groomed. 5 4 
Stopped in while my boyfriend & I were on our way to Cathedral Gorge. With all the driving we were desperate for a good beer. Friendly staff & we loved the Hop Ride American IOA. We are from San Diego so we basically live off IPA's. Awesome addition of going upstairs and checking out the beer vats and where they brew from the glass wall. Well worth a stop on our drive :)BONUS: We loved all the chalk art. 5 4 
Makers and finders was a hidden gym located in the Fremont District of downtown Las Vegas. The food was very good as well as the different products an atmosphere that we were privy to. I will definitely frequent this location in my near travels to the Las Vegas area and look forward to it. 5 4 
Very nice independent coffee shop near old town Scottsdale.  Usually some great jazz playing on the radio (they have live music too) and it a nice quiet and open feeling space.  Friendly staff - definitely recommend.  It's 'attached' to a church but don't worry - it's independent and nobody has attempted convert me ;) 5 4 
I haven't been here in awhile but I do remember I would get my Chocomaina body scrub and butter here. It was the 3 for 33 deal, absolutely love The Body Shop products my other fav was their perfume mist and the Scent Love Ect. The customer service was great too Joel helped me pick out everything. 5 4 
First time eating authentic Cuban food. We will be coming back for sure next time in Vegas. Try the tasting plate which has three meats, salad, platanos and black beans and rice.  My wife had the Cubano sandwhich with pork. My son had the pollo y arroz. The portions are large for my gordo friends like Juan V.and Trevor T. 5 4 
I've been here a few times with my family and there's really nothing for me to "complain" about.... their service is on point, if not, gets better every time we eat here, the taste of the food is always consistent, and the serving you get for the price is great. I've read plenty of comments about the service..... maybe you guys should make sure your staff is consistent with the service? I'd really hate to come here one day and end up with a server who doesn't take care of us. 5 3 
This place might be a reason for me to move to Montreal. It absolutely beautiful even on a rainy day. It really merges the European and the diverse Canadian culture into one. I love how everything feels very authentic from the architecture down to the cobblestones you walk on. Came here everyday during my weekend stay in Montreal but I would definitely spend a full week just roaming around the port and maybe one day taking a cruise down the river! 5 4 
I've had samples of their ice cream which are also very good, but I always go back to the Ferrero Rocher! 5 4 
Stopped by earlier today because my car desperately needed to be cleaned. I pulled up and a nice girl named Kat helped me pick out what kind of car wash I wanted. They have lots of different things you can do so it's important you understand what comes with each wash, since they're all different types of cleanings . I ended up getting the VIP car wash and added the carpet cleaning. They were doing a promotion at the time so I got $10 off the carpet cleaning and since I had recently gotten my oil changed next door at jiffy lube I also got half off the car wash. So this $54ish wash only cost me around $30. Which was great for me. It took them about 2 hours to finish my car... but like I said it desperately needed a cleaning so I figured it would take longer then normal to clean it up. The cleaning looked great, and the best part for me was watching the detailer, Kayce I think his name was, RUN to get a towel and finish up my car. The hustle really impressed me because I've seen a lot of other  car places where the people are very lackadaisical. So I could tell he worked his butt off cleaning my car. All in all I was very impressed with their service, the people in the store were very nice and helpful, and my car looked great! Cleaner than I had seen it in awhile. I definitely will go back for my next car wash! 5 4 
The girl with the long hair always helps me out in the morning. I get either a Vegas sumo or a build your own bowl with salmon, and she always makes sure to pay special attention that she doesn't touch any of my food with shellfish items (I have a food allergy). Poukei rocks, thanks guys! :) 5 4 
This restaurant opened my mind to the whole vegan/gluten-free thing as a dining option.I mean, I want to be healthy, but I don't want it to be... unpleasant.  Especially when I'm paying for it.  I got the Soup & Salad Combo of Amazingness that everyone here raves about.  And it was.  It was amazingness.  The soup was hearty and rich.  The salad, deceptively filling.  And so well dressed!  Delicious.  Delicious.  I recommend it v. much. 5 4 
Great burger black and bleu Fries good but not fresh cutShrimp cocktail excellent and great homemade horseradish Ice cream sandwich cheap at $3 not bad but straight from the box nothing specialService and burger both excellent 5 4 
It's pretty much already been said so I won't bother repeating. This place runs like a factory. Smiles all around. Great food, although not particularly light food as you may expect from a Japanese place. 5 4 
Great service . Courtney was lovely and cute :) will return for the steak and Mac cheese . 5 4 
So good. Just try it, you'll understand. From what I've tried, the Cream Of Leek Soup is the best item on the menu. 5 4 
I'm new to the city and finally took the plunge to committing to a new hairdresser. I also saw they did nails and was wanting to treat myself. So I booked both on the same day, one after the other. Booked the hair appointment online which was confirmed via email and I replied adding on the manicure. No problem. Effortless. Nails: I'm quite new to having manicures. Last time I went somewhere which was rated 4 star on Yelp and it was ok. But here was miles better. Good customer service. Had little chats now and then. The nails were prepares nicely, and my torn nail repairs perfectly! The drying process well executed. Polished and finished really well too. Lovely shiny nails that I'm getting many compliments on already and I only had them done this afternoon! It feels like excellent quality and have full confidence this will last (better than the other place's manicure). Also I was told to call up if I had any problems or mishaps with them! Great service!Hair: I had Franca I believe. She asked what I wanted, and she full understood. She even suggested an extra touch just to help my fine hair not look so flat. My hair looks just how I wanted it. Spot on! On top of all this the prices are great! Value for money! Will be using as a regular. 5 3 
Okay, this review is long overdue, but I just had the worst experience at Pandora Queens Centre Mall in NYC that I remember the verrrrry nice lady at Pandora Fashion Strip Mall Las Vegas who helped me select my first ever set of charm bracelets in 2012. Until now, I remember her kindness and patience in helping me select my charms. She was very positive and never pressured me. She convinced me, though, to take the Vegas dice because they are limited edition, and it was a good decision. She was a single mom to a teen-age boy who moved to Vegas to start a new life. If ever Pandora is reading this, please promote her to Staff Development Leader...then let her teach the ones at Queens Centre Mall how to do it right. She knows what she is doing and she doing it from her heart. When I return to Vegas, I will sure go back to her and experience a magical purchase again ( one I was robbed of here at Queens Mall NYC).j 5 4 
We went in for Restaurant Week and it was fantastic. We were both happy with the caesar and the mixed green salads. The steak and lobster was a really good deal plus you get a sizable loaded baked potato to go with it. The lobster tail was also larger than either of us anticipated. Our server was extremely helpful and as good as it gets. The bar service was very good as well as we had a couple drinks there first during happy hour ($7 off regular price). I'm sure we'll return. 5 4 
This place is fantastic for Sonora style fried fish and shrimp tacos. The toppings bar is awesome for making your tacos the way you want, and the staff is very friendly. My only knock would be the ventilation isn't amazing and it is a smaller space, so it can get a little stuffy and you'll leave with a full belly but clothes that smell like fried fish. 5 4 
This cute little breakfast spot was a great find on our recent trip to Montreal. The little old man stirring the milk in a pot at the front of the restaurant to make the perfect cafe au lait was a great touch! We had the cheese croissant, pain au chocolat, and butter croissant, and all were delicious! We will definitely be stopping back in this place on our next trip to Montreal. It was quaint, nothing fancy, but you can tell it has seen many years of grateful patronage. The tables in the back are mostly antique sewing tables with push pedals for old sewing machines! 5 4 
Fun after-school stop for me and my daughter. Iced Coffee was so good and she got a chocolate muffin which looked good. I'm happy to see they also carry gluten free baked goods. The guy working was really sweet and let us stay and hang out past 4(closing time) and didn't rush us at all. They almost should stay open until 5 though since it was so busy right around closing time.I've been here twice before and both those times were great too. Friendly staff, cozy seating and great coffee and treats! 5 4 
Pro tip: be prepared to wait. The restaurant is located near the entrance of the Planet Hollywood Casino. I went for dinner at around 6 and was seated at about 7:30 pm, BE PREPARED TO WAIT! Especially for dinner, I had a party of 3. If it's just a couple they will most likely have you wait in line in front of the restaurant. The hostess were very snotty and I was not told any party that's isn't for two must check in with the hostess and they will text you when your table is ready. I waited for about 20 mins before a hostess came to get information for each couple. At that point I was told to give them my information. There was a huge misunderstanding. Be various of the line, it is best to check in with the hostess first.Once we were seated, I started off with the sweet potato fries which where delicious. The food overall was probably one of the best gourmet burgers I had. Although I am not a huge fan of over easy egg, the duck bacon was spot on and the combination of both gave it a great pazzaz.Overall the is a must if your in Vegas. Defiantly worth the wait, it may be pricey for what you are getting but the burger was a mouthful. I would recommend to be spontaneous in what you order because Gordon Ramsey special designed each dish. A job well done! 5 3 
Just came by to check the menu!  But as soon as I walked in; it presented a great atmosphere!  All were kind! They gave me a all day breakfast menu, along with the Lunch Menu.  I had the steak and eggs, it was made just the way I like it!I'll be back to try some more! 5 4 
I really like Cost Plus! The staff are helpful and friendly. So many unique items. Bought a few items for my home and am waiting on an item that was out of stock. 5 4 
I didn't make a reservation but they still have a table for me (party of three). The dishes taste good and the waiters are friendly. It's noisy only because there were so many people inside, not because someone was shouting. We ate a lot of bread and pickle (taste good!) while waiting for the entree. 5 4 
Weekly I stop by Trader Joe's and it comes to mind when I think of a good piece of baguette bread.  Their Garlic & Thyme bread has my name on it...I usually put it in the oven until it's crispy then spread my cream cheese over it or Trader Joe's garlic butter. At least 3 times a week I am strolling their store for either my polenta or garlic bread, kale or turkey meatballs. I keep telling myself to stop shopping but I go for quality when it comes to my food and that's the best quality so far especially if you are into organic or good quality. 5 4 
My most favourite Italian restuarant in the Vaughan area - and this area is full of Italian restaurant.  This is definitely not a typical Italian though - they have eastern twists in various dishes - which make it different in a great way.  The dishes are simply more flavourful.  I love the various pasta sauces and seasoning that use saffron.  The chicken pastas, steak pastas and seafood pastas are all awesome.  I am not a big steak person and have also heard that their steaks are not their strong point.  The two poutines are really great as well - which again also are different from regular poutines as they have hints of eastern flavours.  Awesome restaurant.  If you feel like having Italian, and want to try something different, this is definitely the place. 5 4 
Chill place. Many e-juices to choose from. The attractive woman working helped me to pick a couple of new flavors I really like. Very helpful, extremely courteous. Their mods looked cool as well but I didn't take the time to browse those. Inexpensive tanks and up to the higher quality is there. I like that the juice is all natural and it tastes great, vaps great as well. I'll be back. 5 4 
I did what I could to keep it short for my review of Joel Robuchon, the exalted chef's fine-dining boite at the MGM Grand. I will make no such attempts in conveying my feelings about Chef Robuchon's small-plates restaurant, L'Atelier.Robuchon (the restaurant) could be well personified by Grace Kelly, regal, elegant, breathtaking perfection... L'Atelier de Joel Robuchon might then be personified by Catherine Deneuve... coquettish, modern, a little more casual but no less enthralling. If Grace Kelly belongs on a pedestal to be quite rightly worshipped, then Ms. Deneuve seems a better fit between the sheets on an extended stay at the Hotel Georges V.It would be far simpler a task for me to juggle two Buicks than it would to choose between Kelly and Deneuve. A similar quandary, it follows, to what I face when attempting to choose between Joel Robuchon and L'Atelier. Sometimes, though, these choices must be made and to be quite frank, courting a real Princess for more than a day might grow tiresome in the balance. Reluctantly then, I admit that if forced to, I cast my long-term lot with the fair Ms. Deneuve. In the same light, I would have to confess a slight preference for L'Atelier, a spot at which I would quickly agree to eat every single night. Here's a few reasons why...Le Cocotte- Parsley puree at the bottom of a martini glass, topped with mushroom cream, and a raw egg (stay with me) and then more mushroom cream and a couple of sauteed mushrooms on top. Then they put the whole thing in a steamer until the egg whites *just* set. Creamy, yolky, mushroom-ey.. the richness of it all cut perfectly by the bracing green-ness of the parsley puree.Le Langoustine- the sweetest langoustine you've ever tasted, wrapped with a basil leaf in a thin sheet of brik dough and quickly deep fried. Plated with a micro greens salad and basil pesto. Seriously, I could eat 50 of these.Le Thon Rouge- Thin slices of tuna arranged on a plate with tomato-infused oil and sea salt. You can really taste the tomato in the oil and I don't know how they do that. Perfectly salted and the texture of the tuna is as magical as a first kiss. Le Saumon- A healthy portion of house-smoked salmon, plated with a potato waffle (with really deep wells, more surface area, more CRUNCH) and dill cream. The creamy crunchy potato, the smoky salty salmon, and the cool and herbaceous cream all conspire to create what might just be a perfect plate. 10 out of 10.Le Caille- Quail stuffed with foie gras and coated in a citrus glaze. I am careful, as a gentleman, to confine my profanity to special cases. That said... holy fucking shit this is good. Served with a small pot of truffled potato puree prepared to the following ratio - 1 part potato to 1 part butter. It is not uncommon for a fight to break out over the last spoonful.Le Foie Gras- Raviolis of foie gras in a chicken broth with Thai basil and herb cream. The ravioli are quite salty at first, but then it becomes apparent that they are a perfect foil for the rich chicken broth in which they float. The basil and cream add top notes and bottom notes and once again you are transported by a mere food item to some magical place where the London Philharmonic plays neighborhood concerts and hundred dollar bills rain from the sky.Ris de Veau- Here's where we get to what might be the defining characteristic of a restaurant of this caliber. I wouldn't dare order sweetbreads at just about any other establishment. No thanks. But at L'Atelier? Mais bien sur! Seared on the outside, creamy on the inside, stuck through with a sprig of holly and plated with a lettuce leaf stuffed with onions and butter. One of the best things I've ever eaten and I almost let my prejudice prevent me from ordering it. Shameful.Le Chartreuse- A souffle made with green chartreuse liqueur and topped with pistachio ice cream. Words cannot express how good this is. Eggy, Sweet, and a little flowery. Suffice it to say that it tastes like heaven in a ramekin.Chocolate Sensation- Let's see if I can remember this right... melting Aragani chocolate on the bottom, then a disc of chocolate on top of that, then white chocolate ice cream on top of that, and then oreo cookie crumbs on top of the whole thing. Rob a bank if you have to. Kidnap a rich kid. Sue McDonalds for scorching your naughty bits. It will all be worth the effort to secure a bowl of this.Look, I know I go a little overboard sometimes. I am well aware of my bias. But if you are looking to sample cuisine that is executed at the highest possible level... trust me, if you've got a steady job you can well afford the tariff of a visit here. My precious L'Atelier... that haunts me in my sleep and in my troubled mind weaves daydream tapestries of earthly abandon. Soon, my dear. Soon I will return to your loving arms and we will write epics to make Chaucer blush, and Shakespeare jealous. I am already counting the days. 5 4 
I took our 2011 S550 here for a regular service and to have the backup alarm checked out. The backup alarm was not as loud as it had been before. It essentially was not audible and non functional...UNSAFE!  I had it to MB of Scottsdale twice and was told: "That's how it is.  It can't be adjusted."  The guys at Auto Haus actually checked it out on their computer, and found it was set at only 40%. They turned it up, and what do you know, I can hear it like  it used to be. Huh! So if you actually do the work, you can fix things. I guess some shops don't think this small repair is worth their time. Auto Haus is a professional shop. Chris and Travis made my car right and care about what they do . They have earned my business. 5 stars. Score: Auto Haus 1; Dealer 0 5 1 
Just Baked Cupcakes & Coffee House has the most creative variety of cupcakes I've ever seen. The cupcakes are delicious, and have an artistic and creative presentation. The first thing I noticed when I came into the shop, however, was the hospitality of the owners and how happy the customers were who were sitting at the tables. It's actually a two-story house that they've refurbished, and there's nice art on the walls, along with antique furniture everywhere. The rooms have comfortable seating and the atmosphere is very relaxed. The owner is great at making creative designs in the coffee, and the cupcakes are the best I've ever tasted. (I think they're good enough to go on the show "Cupcake Wars.") This has turned into one of my favorite places to go to for a real treat. In fact, I work at the nearby college, and my co-workers and I sometimes come here to conduct business meetings, we love it so much.  Their wireless is free, and we've had no problem with our computers and iPads working during our meetings. To sum up:  great food, great drinks, great service.  Love it! 5 4 
Have you ever walked into a restaurant and thought to yourself, "Well, this is going to be different"? It's an exciting feeling that doesn't happen all that often; but, walking into Guu Izakaya on Church St., I was definitely overcome by that thought.  Everyone who enters and exits gets a loud greeting and goodbye from the entire staff. A bit overwhelming, but it certainly sets the tone for your evening. The place is an absolute nuthouse in the best possible way.That evening, my two companions and I were lucky enough to get seats within a few minutes upon arriving, a rare feat as I understand it. Guu features communal dining, with long tables that seat around 15 - 20 people, as well as seats at the bar where you can watch the chefs work. There is a two-hour time limit for diners and often a 1-2 hour wait for a seat. If you can, go early or prepare to cool your heels for a while. I promise you that it will be worth it.My friends had been to Guu before so they did the bulk of the ordering. They chose the best dishes they'd had before and also took cues from our tablemates who'd ordered some fascinating fare. The menu is set up tapas-style, a fantastic way to sample all sorts of delicious creations. We ordered eight dishes for the three of us which was just about right and all were quite reasonably priced.The first to arrive was the decidedly (and awesomely) decadent deep-fried brie served with a mango and blueberry sauce.  The four pyramid-shaped morsels were golden and crispy on the outside and gooey, rich deliciousness on the inside. Like, eyes-rolling-in-the-back-of-your-head-good. Next up: the salmon sashimi. Melt in your mouth greatness. It's one of those simple dishes that really sings based on the merits of great, high quality ingredients.On to the bacon-wrapped scallops and enoki mushrooms. Holy. Smokes. Bacon-wrapped anything is a winner in my books but here the contrasting textures played against each other so beautifully. Paired with the salty pork, the sweet scallop and earthy mushrooms, this dish was so good that it was tempting to cancel the rest of our order and have nothing but this for the rest of the night.The beef carpaccio was placed before our wide eyes next and it was a lovely, bright contrast to the richness of the dish before. Served with with ponzu, wasabi, mayo & garlic chips, this rare beef was light and, somehow, refreshing. It was nice to have a lighter bite after the richness of the scallops before.It was at this point in our meal that I noticed a crowd of waiters pause from their constant, frenetic activity. Then I spotted a server with a slice of cake with a candle in it. Guu's birthday celebrations put Chuck E. Cheese to shame. Not only did the wait staff lead the entire restaurant in a rousing rendition of "Happy Birthday", encouraging everyone to clap and sing along, but even the insanely busy chefs joined in. At one point, they had the lights flickering on and off. Utter celebrational pandemonium and it was amazing.Once the place had settled down a little (to be clear, Guu is the least settled place on the planet), the strangest creation of the evening appeared at our table. It was roughly the size of a softball, deep fried and had a wooden knife protruding from the centre. We wracked our brains trying to figure out if we had actually ordered it, decided we hadn't and dug in anyway. What it turned out to be was a Japanese scotch egg with a layer of pureed pumpkin surrounding a hard-boiled egg. While I was skeptical initially - I'm not a big pumpkin fan, much to the horror of many of my friends - the combination of the creamy pumpkin, rich egg, crispy exterior and tangy sauce was downright addictive. We just about scraped the plate without chopsticks long after other dishes had been cleared away.When the spare ribs arrived, it was all I could do to refrain from gobbling them all up myself. The marinated beef was tender and salty, having surely been marinated for quite some time. If you're a fan of spare ribs, these are a can't-miss.The final dishes of the night were the decadent, baked oysters and the light, miso-glazed black cod. We ordered the oysters because we saw them arrive for another group at our table and they looked so unique! Kind of a twist on oysters Rockefeller, they're served with spinach and mushrooms, smothered in a potent mayo-garlic sauce and topped with melted cheese...all in a giant shell. This was a thing of glorious, messy beauty. The mushrooms nestled in there made for an umami bomb of a bite. Definitely give this one a shot, my friends. It's weird and tasty and I've never seen it anywhere else.Not only was this one of the best meals I've had all year, it was by far and away the most fun. Unquestionably, the company helped but the atmosphere at Guu is like none other. It's not the place to go for a quiet, intimate dinner; it's the place to go when you want to try innovative, playful and truly remarkable dishes. 5 4 
Went there last night and was very pleased with the selection and quality of food. There was a large selection of fancy, small portioned dishes such as gnocchi, mushroom risotto, sushi items, French onion soup, wedge salads, Caesar salads with little anchovies on top, BBQ ribs with a great char flavor (also had chicken and pork shoulder), shrimp flavored rice paper which was fun and tasty, salmon, and sooo many delicious and fun desserts including a gelato selection. The crab legs were just ok, but we had gone near to closing time so I can't complain. Alcohol is not included. Great atmosphere and great food overall and I definitely recommend it! 5 4 
So, whenever you have a California gurl in a Mexican Restaurant, it has to be good.  My weary tummy has not had anything substantial all day, and having read the best of the best about the amazing La Tolteca, I decided to let me feet hit the street & check out this local flor in the rough.  Well, I have to say the reviews are all TRUTH.  The green enchilada's were my choice as I've not ever been huge fan of the red sauce, in addition to a full range of all that one could feast your immediate appetite too, there is also fresh tortillas, candy, the bakery which is a temptation I did avoid (thank you P90X) and yes, I did say it, the temptation is the BAKERY,  the smells hit your nose before you even step in, yeast, sugar and spices, La Raza!  Enjoy your time, don't rush, I wandered around and grabbed my favorite Fanta to connect the true flavors of home, Cali and my youth, thanks for the great time La Tolteca, and you'd better be sure that I'll be stopping in again with re-inforcements.   Gracias & Happy Eating 5 3 
Very tasty quick stop. Carne asada tacos were delicious. Portion sizes were huge, so go there hungry. 5 4 
I really liked this place! You go in and the server is exceptionally nice. He suggested a dish he said would be spicy but it was slightly mild but very flavorful. They use Lemon Grass sticks as the "bone". This place actually rivals my favorite vegetarian restaurant in Portland. The price is right and the food is great! If you're considering not going...GO! Don't be scared off by the ghetto neighborhood and trashy strip mall. This place is a diamond in the rough. 5 4 
I definitely recommend this place for parents to bring their kids. My daughter loved it!!! They have several activities for them to enjoy. Price wasn't bad, environment was clean. 5 4 
As a pizza lover, Salvatore's Tomato Pies are unique and flavorful. We ordered the bacon and fig pizza which was the perfect melding of savory and sweet.  The menu offered a variety of choices, making it hard to decide what type of pie we wanted to order. The venue is pretty small, so it would be smart to order takeout on the busier nights or try and beat the dinner rush. Due to the small size of then venue it is a little loud when crowded. We are definitely planning to go back to try some of the other menu options! 5 4 
Tehran is a wonderful establishment.I've been an infrequent visitor for the past 10 years. I always wish I'd go more often.The menu doesn't have too many options. But the choices you have are so flavourful that you won't feel lacking.The plate sizes are quite large, though I have noticed that portions decreased a bit recently, and prices went up. Worry not, you'll still be stuffed and not spend too much.Everyone should give Tehran a try. The food is delicious and the service is quick. And shame on someone rating a restaurant they've never been to and making a judgment based on hearsay. 5 4 
I want to write the review for the entire city of Montreal but unfortunately I can't do that. Instead I'll just have to write about each location I went to. Let's just say this is one of my favorites! The sphere is beautiful and I really loved learning about the environment and biodiversity.  The little park across from it is peaceful and beautiful too. Montreal is the best city i've ever been to!!!! 5 4 
Exposed brick, checkBad local art, checkRock and roll tunes, checkSpeedy wifi, checkDelicious Mistos, checkCool crowd reading magazines and working away on macbooks, checkPLENTY of outlets, sweet!This place seems pretty swell. Exactly what you'd want for a cafe work sesh or a man date. 5 3 
Went for the first time this weekend.  Amazing looking women.  The cocktails were good too. Great looking female bartenders. A must do if you're single and attractive. 5 4 
The quintessential French bistro in Montreal. Still buzzing and still serving up classic french bistro fare.   As all the new restaurants in Montreal delight in serving ever more exotic dishes, L'Express stands out as a bastion of what a classic dinner in Montreal can be. 5 4 
Took a large group here last night and everyone enjoyed the pizzas.  Or was it the super friendly waitress shelly. Just about the friendliest I've ver seen. Dessert were amazing as well starting with the tiramisu. 5 4 
I came here to paddleboard with Outdoor Afro group. We learned how to paddle board and enjoy the beautiful weather. They had an opening tonight with free food and drinks. 5 4 
The latte is one of the best I've had in the city.  The tables out front offer a great view of 17th Ave. 5 4 
Waffles, sandwiches, and beer! Who ever thought of that!? Really random, but it works! The interior is more appealing than the exterior. I came in for a light dessert, and what I ordered was perfect. I love how light and fluffy these waffles were. I will have to go back to try the chicken and waffle sandwich. 5 4 
I honestly don't understand how and why people could find so many complains from this place, if this place is so bed then why is it that they are the only hotel who hosts miss USA and American idol among so many other venues. Where in the world can you find top of the line hotel 4 1/2 stars for 90 $ per night in a hotel less then few years old. i had my family there for 7 days for New Years and there was not one time that they did not deliver anything we had asked for. My friend who booked the room in UK and who owns the share had nothing but great things to say. So if you have a problem with a view then move up and pay the 360 $ a night on a Friday. I have stayed there before when it was PH and I did pay a lot less through Priceline ( 65$ ) and for the room you get I don't care if my shower thing is loose or anything else. this lady who complained about not getting her bill ready, are you serious, couldn't she just check her bank statement or is it the hotels fault cause she had no time to check out at the front desk, not just that, complaining about housekeeping picking up trash, whatever, when is it enough. 5 2 
The Nutella crepe with bananas and strawberries was great!  My husband got the bagel sandwich with egg and cheese.  I was a little disappointed in the lack of vegetarian options if you weren't in the mood for something sweet.  They had tons of combo options that looked delicious but not a single one was veggie - boo. We enjoyed our breakfast. 5 4 
Found this great spot on yelp. Traveling and needed a quick pedi. Probably one of the best pedicures I have had. Skilled technician and nice people. Worth every dime. 5 4 
Eating a whataburger. It's fantastic. Haven't had one in years. It's a perfect compliment to a football game that may be a blowout. My burger had no less that 8 pickles on it. I'm sick of this one pickle bullshit. The bacon could have been thicker, but this burger was easily 1.8x larger than a McDonald's burger. French fries could have been crispier but the had a good flavor. And they offer spicy ketchup. What a burger 5 4 
Delicious, clean and the conveyor belt was a hit with the kids.   Lots of different types of sushi, salads and dessert items to choose from.  Regular/kids menu available for the anti-sushi appetite.   We will be back.   Such a fun experience! 5 4 
I was told about a possible brake issue around 200.00. I said go ahead and fix it. When I arrived, he found that the actual problem was something minor and only charged me 40.00!!! No mechanic has ever been this honest with me before. Oh yeah, be sure you talk to Gary. 5 1 
Yummmmmy, a little pricy folks but the toppings on the burger, the bun, those fry things, etc all very very good. Still mayhem with the new store in town but wow yum!!! I tried Carl's in Idaho a  few years ago & Penticton a couple years ago and very good burgers. You order your burger exactly how you like it including toppings and then find a place to sit if you can and they bring it out to you - it's as fresh as fresh can get, no sitting under a heat lamp here! Yummy :) 5 4 
We tried this place for the first time today after reading the reviews on Yelp and it did not disappoint. They were slammed when we walked in, but they were so friendly and attentive that the wait didn't seem as long. There were so many tantalizing options on the menu, but we decided on the Huevos Rancheros, Chilaquiles and the Bacon Burger. I am a Chilaquiles connoisseur and for not being a Mexican restaurant, these were delicious! My family thoroughly enjoyed their dishes as well. The attentiveness and service was great even though it did take a little more time than normal to get our food. It was definitely worth the wait. We will be back soon and we are happy to have found our new go-to brunch spot!Highly recommend!! 5 4 
Joso's definitely offers a unique dining experience. We always drove past it's beautiful patio and always wanted to try it. On our visit we were seated inside, very interesting decor all around will entertain you until your food comes. The menu is pricey but I would say worth the experience. You can pick and chose different things on the menu as you like. Staff is very helpful in making suggestions and extremely professional. The only negative for me was the smell of seafood. I know its asking for too much since this is a seafood restaurant but I hate the smell of fish while waiting to eat, it's kinda unappetizing for me. 5 4 
I have shopped here since 1998 when I got back into keeping tropical fish in a live plant environment. after a few year's off.I like that incoming livestock are kept in quarantine after arriving, that I can ask to be told when a particular species becomes available, that the staff are so knowledgeable and enjoy discussing the hobby, even though I notice some impatient shoppers just wanting to grab and go. Reminds me of the now closed Pirrhana on Avenue Road that was run by a hobbyist, or Fintastic in the east end run by Mike.Harold the head guy has saved a couple ailing fish with clear advice.Just in case this seems too high a rating, keep in mind that I have seen a lot of fish shops since I began the hobby sixty years ago.And plant and fish prices seem as fair as elsewhere. 5 4 
Excellent view on the observation deck.  Had a great time, don't miss it. 5 4 
Great spot, with a limited but good menu.  Very hidden, but somehow I have found this place 2 times by accident...so maybe the placement is genius...  Anyhow good beer selection, and great staff. 5 4 
Friendly, fast, $2 discount immediately honored, but gave him $20 anyway. Will give them my business again next time. Thanks, keep it up! 5 4 
So one thing that really stands out to me: one of the employees (John I believe) emailed me a copy of my inspection before coming out to talk to me. And the email included pictures! I've never seen this before. Maybe I'm behind, but before coming here I always went to Honda of Concord and Scott Clark Honda (wouldn't recommend either) and I've never seen this. I'm always cautious due to receiving false info regarding needed car repairs. This definitely gave me a peace of mind. This is my third or fourth time coming here and I'll definitely be back. The only downside for me is the business hours of 8-5 but aside from that I love this place. 5 3 
Adobado Tacos are THE BEST tacos they have here!!!  i'll go through 6 of them easy... the area here late at night is kinda sketchy... while lining up for tacos, the drunk people behind me got into a heated argument and nearly started a slug fest... too bad it didn't get ugly or else I would have lost my spot in line... 5 4 
I really liked this hooters. i am visiting, and the hooters from my town isn't that great. Hot girls and decent priced beer. I plan to go back before I leave. 5 4 
-----------------------------

